{"content":" SCHEME INFORMATION DOCUMENT. . 
ICICI PRUDENTIAL BANK ETF. . 
(An open-ended Exchange Traded Fund tracking Nifty Bank Index). 
ICICI Prudential Bank ETF is suitable for investors who are seeking*: 
Long term wealth creation. 
An exchange traded fund that aims to provide 
returns that closely correspond to the returns 
provided by Nifty Bank Index, subject to 
tracking error. 
Continuous Offer of Units at NAV based prices on an on-going basis. 
INVESTMENT MANAGER. . 
Name of Asset Management Company: ICICI Prudential Asset Management Company. 
Corporate Identity Number: U99999DL1993PLC054135. 
Registered Office:           Corporate Office:        Central Service Office: 
website:www.icicipruamc.com, 
email id: enquiry@icicipruamc.com. 
Name of Trustee Company: ICICI Prudential Trust Limited. 
Corporate Identity Number: U74899DL1993PLC054134. 
The particulars of ICICI Prudential Bank ETF (the Scheme) has been prepared in 
accordance with the Securities and Exchange Board of India (Mutual Funds) Regulations 
1996, (hereinafter referred to as SEBI (MF) Regulations) as amended till date, and filed 
with SEBI, along with a Due Diligence Certificate from the AMC. The units being offered 
for public subscription have not been approved or recommended by SEBI nor has SEBI 
certified the accuracy or adequacy of the Scheme Information Document (SID). 
The Scheme Information Document (SID) sets forth concisely the information about the. 
Scheme that a prospective investor ought to know before investing. Before investing, 
investors should also ascertain about any further changes pertaining to the Scheme 
such as features, load structure, etc. made to this SID by issue of addenda / notice after. 
Centres/Website/Distributors or Brokers. 
The investors are advised to refer to the Statement of Additional Information (SAI) for 
details of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund, Tax and Legal issues and general information on 
www.icicipruamc.com. 
SAI is incorporated by reference (is legally a part of the Scheme Information Document). 
For a free copy of the current SAI, please contact your nearest Investor Service Centre or 
log on to our website. 
The SID should be read in conjunction with the SAI and not in isolation. 
This Scheme Information Document is dated July 15, 2019. 
Disclaimer of BSE Limited: 
BSE Limited (the Exchange) has given vide its letter dated April 08, 2019 permission 
to ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund to use the Exchanges name in this SID as one of the. 
Stock Exchanges on which this Mutual Funds Units are proposed to be listed. The. 
Exchange has scrutinized this SID for its limited internal purpose of deciding on the 
matter of granting the aforesaid permission to ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund. The. 
Exchange does not in any manner:- 
i.     warrant, certify or endorse the correctness or completeness of any of the contents 
of this SID. or 
ii)    warrant that this schemes unit will be listed or will continue to be listed on the. 
iii)   take any responsibility for the financial or other soundness of this Mutual fund, its 
promoters, its management or any scheme or project of this Mutual Fund. 
and it should not for any reason be deemed or construed that this SID has been cleared 
or approved by the Exchange. Every person who desires to apply for or otherwise 
acquires any unit of ICICI Prudential Bank ETF of this Mutual Fund may do so pursuant to 
independent inquiry, investigation and analysis and shall not have any claim against the. 
Exchange whatsoever by reason of any loss which may be suffered by such person 
consequent to or in connection with such subscription/acquisition whether by reason of 
anything stated or omitted to be stated herein or for any reason whatsoever. 
Disclaimer of National Stock Exchange of India Limited: 
As required, a copy of this Scheme Information Document has been submitted to. 
National Stock Exchange of India Limited (hereinafter referred to as NSE). NSE has given 
vide its letter NSE/LIST/5129 dated April 08, 2019 permission to the Mutual Fund to use 
the Exchanges name in this Scheme Information Document as one of the stock 
exchanges on which the Mutual Funds units are proposed to be listed subject to, the. 
Mutual Fund fulfilling various criteria for listing. The Exchange has scrutinized this. 
Scheme Information Document for its limited internal purpose of deciding on the matter 
of granting the aforesaid permission to the Mutual Fund. It is to be distinctly understood 
that the aforesaid permission given by NSE should not in any way be deemed or 
construed that the Scheme Information Document has been cleared or approved by. 
NSE. nor does it in any manner warrant, certify or endorse the correctness or 
completeness of any of the contents of this Scheme Information Document. nor does it 
warrant that the Mutual Funds units will be listed or will continue to be listed on the. 
Exchange. nor does it take any responsibility for the financial or other soundness of the. 
Mutual Fund, its sponsors, its management or any scheme of the Mutual Fund. 
Every person who desires to apply for or otherwise acquire any units of the Mutual Fund 
may do so pursuant to independent inquiry, investigation and analysis and shall not have 
any claim against the Exchange whatsoever by reason of any loss which may be 
suffered by such person consequent to or in connection with such subscription 
/acquisition whether by reason of anything stated or omitted to be stated herein or any 
other reason whatsoever. 
Disclaimer of NSE Indices Limited (NSE Indices): 
The Product(s) are not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by NSE Indices Limited (. 
NSE Indices). NSE Indices does not make any representation or warranty, express or 
implied, to the owners of the Product(s) or any member of the public regarding the 
advisability of investing in securities generally or in the Product(s) particularly or the 
ability of the Nifty Bank Index to track general stock market performance in India. The 
relationship of NSE Indices to the Issuer is only in respect of the licensing of certain 
trademarks and trade names of its Index which is determined, composed and calculated 
by NSE Indices without regard to the Issuer or the Product(s). NSE Indices does not have 
any obligation to take the needs of the Issuer or the owners of the Product(s) into 
consideration in determining, composing or calculating the Nifty Bank Index. NSE. 
Indices is not responsible for or has participated in the determination of the timing of, 
prices at, or quantities of the Product(s) to be issued or in the determination or 
calculation of the equation by which the Product(s) is to be converted into cash. NSE. 
Indices has no obligation or liability in connection with the administration, marketing or 
trading of the Product(s). 
NSE Indices do not guarantee the accuracy and/or the completeness of the Nifty Bank. 
Index or any data included therein and they shall have no liability for any errors, 
omissions, or interruptions therein. NSE Indices does not make any warranty, express or 
implied, as to results to be obtained by the Issuer, owners of the product(s), or any other 
person or entity from the use of the Nifty Bank Index or any data included therein. NSE. 
Indices makes no express or implied warranties, and expressly disclaim all warranties of 
merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose or use with respect to the index or any 
data included therein. Without limiting any of the foregoing, NSE Indices expressly 
disclaim any and all liability for any damages or losses arising out of or related to the. 
Products, including any and all direct, special, punitive, indirect, or consequential 
damages (including lost profits), even if notified of the possibility of such damages. 
TABLE OF CONTENTS. . 
ABBREVIATIONS. 5. . 
HIGHLIGHTS/SUMMARY OF THE SCHEME . 6. . 
I. INTRODUCTION . 9. . 
A. RISK FACTORS . 9. . 
B. REQUIREMENT OF MINIMUM INVESTORS IN THE SCHEME . 17. . 
C. SPECIAL CONSIDERATIONS, if any . 17. 
D. DEFINITIONS . 18. . 
E. DUE DILIGENCE BY THE ASSET MANAGEMENT COMPANY . 22. . 
II. INFORMATION ABOUT THE SCHEME . 23. . 
A. TYPE OF THE SCHEME . 23. . 
B. WHAT IS THE INVESTMENT OBJECTIVE OF THE SCHEME? . 23. . 
C. HOW WILL THE SCHEME ALLOCATE ITS ASSETS? . 23. . 
D. WHERE WILL THE SCHEME INVEST? . 24. . 
E. WHAT ARE THE INVESTMENT STRATEGIES? . 30. . 
F: FUNDAMENTAL ATTRIBUTES . 36. . 
G. HOW WILL THE SCHEME BENCHMARK ITS PERFORMANCE? . 37. . 
H. WHO MANAGES THE SCHEME? . 37. . 
I. WHAT ARE THE INVESTMENT RESTRICTIONS? . 38. . 
J. HOW HAS THE SCHEME PERFORMED?. 40. . 
K. ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES . 40. . 
L. HOW IS THE SCHEME IS DIFFERENT FROM OTHER SCHEMES . 40. . 
III. UNITS AND OFFER . 46. . 
A. NEW FUND OFFER DETAILS . Error! Bookmark not defined. 
B. ONGOING OFFER DETAILS . 46. . 
C. PERIODIC DISCLOSURES . 60. . 
D. COMPUTATION OF NAV: . 64. . 
IV. FEES AND EXPENSES . 65. . 
A. NEW FUND OFFER (NFO) EXPENSES . 65. . 
B. ANNUAL SCHEME RECURRING EXPENSES . 65. . 
C. LOAD STRUCTURE . 67. . 
D. WAIVER OF LOAD FOR DIRECT APPLICATIONS. 69. . 
V. RIGHTS OF UNITHOLDERS . 69. . 
VI. PENALTIES, PENDING LITIGATION OR PROCEEDINGS, FINDINGS OF INSPECTIONS. . 
OR INVESTIGATIONS FOR WHICH ACTION MAY HAVE BEEN TAKEN OR IS IN THE. . 
PROCESS OF BEING TAKEN BY ANY REGULATORY AUTHORITY . 69. . 
AMC                              ICICI Prudential Asset Management Company Limited. 
AML                              Anti Money Laundering. 
BSE                              BSE Limited. 
DP                               Depository Participant. 
FPI                              Foreign Portfolio Investors. 
NAV                              Net Asset Value. 
NSE                              National Stock Exchange of India Limited. 
NRI                              Non-Resident Indian. 
SID                              Scheme Information Document. 
RBI                              Reserve Bank of India. 
IMA                              Investment Management Agreement. 
Regulations, 1996, as amended from time to time. 
For all purposes of this SID, except as otherwise expressly provided or unless the 
context otherwise requires: 
The terms defined in this SID include the plural as well as the singular. 
Pronouns having a masculine or feminine gender shall be deemed to include the. 
All references to US$ refer to United States Dollars and Rs./INR/ ` refer to. 
Indian Rupees. A Crore means ten million and a Lakh means a hundred 
Words not defined here has the same meaning as defined in The Regulations. 
HIGHLIGHTS/SUMMARY OF THE SCHEME. . 
Name of the Scheme ICICI Prudential Bank ETF. 
Type of the Scheme An open-ended Exchange Traded Fund tracking Nifty Bank Index. 
underlying index subject to tracking errors. 
However, there can be no assurance or guarantee that the 
investment objective of the Scheme would be achieved. 
BSE Limited and National Stock Exchange of India Limited (NSE). 
Buying or selling of units of the Scheme by investors can be 
done on all the Trading Days of the stock exchanges. The 
minimum number of units that can be bought or sold is 1 (one). 
Directly with the Fund: Authorised Participant(s)/ Investor(s) can 
subscribe/redeem the units of the Scheme directly with the Fund 
only in creation unit size i.e. 10,000 units and in multiples thereof. 
The subscription & redemption of units would be based on the 
portfolio deposit & cash component as defined by the Fund for 
that respective business day. The Fund may allow cash 
purchases/cash redemption of the units of the Scheme or by 
depositing basket of securities comprising the underlying index 
in Creation Unit Size by Authorised Participant(s)/ Investor(s). 
Purchase/redemption request shall be made by such investors to 
the Fund whereupon the Fund shall arrange to buy/sell the 
underlying portfolio of securities on behalf of the investor. In 
case of shares bought and sold by the AMC on behalf of the 
investor, entire proceeds of portfolio deposit and other cost and 
charges related to the purchase and sale of basket of underlying 
securities for servicing the subscription or redemption 
transaction would be borne by the investor. 
Investors, other than Authorised Participants, can sell units in less 
than Creation Unit Size of the Scheme directly to the Mutual Fund 
without any exit load in the certain cases. Kindly refer to the 
section Load Structure for more details. 
Nifty Bank Index. 
For more details on the benchmark, kindly refer Information on. 
Nifty Bank Index. 
schemes under a separate head on the AMCs website and on 
the website of AMFI. NAV will be determined on every Business. 
Day except in special circumstances. NAV of the Scheme shall be 
made available at all Customer Service Centres of the AMC. 
AMC shall update the NAV on the website of Association of. 
Mutual Funds in India - AMFI (www.amfiindia.com) and AMC 
website (www.icicipruamc.com) by 9.00 p.m. on every business 
day. In case of any delay, the reasons for such delay would be 
explained to AMFI and SEBI by the next day. If the NAVs are not 
available before commencement of business hours on the 
following day due to any reason, the Fund shall issue a press 
release providing reasons and explaining when the Fund would 
be able to publish the NAVs. 
The AMC shall disclose portfolio of the scheme (along with ISIN) 
as on the last day of the month / half-year on AMCs website i.e. 
www.icicipruamc.com and on the website of AMFI within 10 days 
from the close of each month / half-year respectively. Since the. 
Scheme is a new scheme, Top 10 holdings and sector wise 
holdings are not available. 
The AMC shall publish an advertisement in all India edition of at 
least two daily newspapers, one each in English and Hindi, every 
half year disclosing the hosting of the half-yearly statement of the 
schemes portfolio on the AMCs website and on the website of. 
The AMC shall send via email both the monthly and half-yearly 
statement of scheme portfolio within 10 days from the close of 
each month / half-year respectively. The unitholders whose e- 
mail addresses are not registered with the Fund are requested to 
update / provide their email address to the Fund for updating the. 
The AMC shall provide a physical copy of the statement of 
scheme portfolio, without charging any cost, on specific request 
received from a unit holder. 
In terms of circular no. SEBI/IMD/CIR No. 4/168230/09 dated June 
30, 2009, SEBI has notified that, w.e.f. August 01, 2009 there will 
be no entry load charged to the schemes of the Fund and the 
upfront commission to distributors will be paid by the investor 
directly to the distributor, based on his assessment of various 
factors including the service rendered by the distributor. 
Exit Load. 
There will be no exit load for units sold through the secondary 
market on the stock exchanges where the Scheme will be listed. 
Currently, the Scheme is listed on BSE and NSE. Investors shall 
note that the brokerage on sales of the units of the scheme on 
the stock exchanges shall be borne by the investors. 
Redemption of units can be made directly with the Fund in 
creation unit size. Currently there is no exit load applicable for the 
said transactions. 
For more details on Loads, please refer section on Load. 
for     Application/ in round lot of 1 unit and in multiples thereof. 
An investor can buy/ sell units on a continuous basis in the 
normal market segment of National Stock Exchange of India. 
Limited (NSE)/ BSE Limited or any other stock exchange where 
the Scheme will be listed, during the trading hours like any other 
publicly traded stock at prices which are quoted on the stock 
exchanges. These prices may be close to the actual NAV of the. 
Scheme. There is no minimum investment, although units are to 
be purchased in lots of 1 (one) unit. 
Directly with the Mutual Fund: Authorised Participant(s)/. 
Investor(s) can buy/sell units of the Scheme in Creation Unit Size 
viz. 10,000 units and in multiples thereof. 
For more details of the Underlying Index, refer section on. 
Information on Nifty Bank Index. 
ongoing basis and would seek to minimize tracking error to the 
maximum extent possible. Under normal circumstances, the. 
AMC will endeavour that the tracking error of the Scheme does 
not exceed 2% per annum. However, this may vary due to 
various reasons mentioned below or any other reasons that may 
arise and particularly when the markets are very volatile. 
For more details on Tracking Error, kindly refer Tracking Error. 
Risk under Scheme Specific Risk Factors. 
I. INTRODUCTION. . 
A. RISK FACTORS. . 
Standard Risk Factors: 
Investment in Mutual Fund Units involve investment risks such as trading volumes, 
settlement risks, liquidity risks, default risks, including the possible loss of principal. 
Mutual Funds and securities investments are subject to market risks and there is no 
assurance or guarantee that the objectives of the Scheme will be achieved. 
As the price/value/interest rates of the securities in which the Scheme invests 
fluctuates, the value of your investements in the Scheme may go up or down. 
The past performance of the mutual funds managed by the Sponsors / Mutual Fund /. 
Asset Management Company and their affiliates/associates does not guarantee 
future performance of the Scheme. 
The name of the Scheme and do not in any manner indicate either the quality of the. 
Scheme or its future prospects and returns. 
The Sponsors are not responsible or liable for any loss resulting from the operation 
of the Scheme beyond the contribution of an amount of Rs. 22.2 lakhs collectively 
made by them towards setting up the Fund and such other accretions and additions 
to the corpus set up by the Sponsors. 
The present scheme is not a guranteed scheme or assured return scheme. 
The Scheme is an Exchange Traded Fund (ETF).There can be no assurance that an 
active secondary market will develop or be maintained. 
The NAV of the Scheme may be affected by changes in the general level of interest 
rates and trading volumes. 
The NAV of the Scheme may be affected by settlement periods and transfer. 
In the event of receipt of inordinately large number of redemption requests or of a 
restructuring of the Schemes portfolios, there may be delays in the redemption of. 
The Liquidity of the Schemes investments is inherently restricted by trading. 
Investors in the Scheme are not being offered any guaranteed returns. 
Mutual funds being vehicles of securities investments are subject to market and 
other risks and there can be no guarantee against loss resulting from investing in the. 
Scheme. The various factors which impact the value of the Schemes investments 
include, but are not limited to, fluctuations in interest rates, prevailing political and 
economic environment, changes in government policy, factors specific to the issuer 
of the securities, tax laws, liquidity of the underlying instruments, settlement periods, 
trading volumes etc. 
Investment decisions made by the AMC may not always be profitable. 
From time to time and subject to the Regulations, the Sponsors, the Mutual Funds 
and investment companies managed by them, their affiliates, their associate 
companies, subsidiaries of the Sponsors, and the AMC may invest either directly or 
indirectly in any or all the Schemes. The funds managed by these affiliates, 
associates, the Sponsors, subsidiaries of the Sponsors and /or the AMC may acquire 
a substantial portion of the Schemes Units and collectively constitute a major 
investor in the Scheme. Accordingly, redemption of Units held by such funds, 
affiliates/associates and Sponsors might have an adverse impact on the Units of the. 
Scheme because the timing of such redemption may impact the ability of other Unit 
holders to redeem their Units. 
Further, as per the Regulation, in case the AMC invests in any of the Schemes 
managed by it, it shall not be entitled to charge any fees on such investments. 
The Scheme may invest in other schemes managed by the AMC or in the schemes of 
any other Mutual Funds, provided it is in conformity with the investment objective of 
the Scheme and in terms of the prevailing Regulations. As per the Regulations, no 
investment management fees will be charged for such investments and the 
aggregate inter-scheme investment made by all Schemes of the Fund or in Schemes 
under the management of other asset management companies shall not exceed 5% 
of the Net Asset Value of the Mutual Fund. 
Scheme Specific Risk Factors: 
1. Risks associated with investing in Equities. 
The value of the Schemes investments, may be affected generally by factors affecting 
securities markets, such as trading volumes, settlement periods and transfer procedures, 
price and volume volatility in the capital markets, interest rates, currency exchange rates, 
changes in policies of the Governments, taxation laws or any other appropriate authority 
policies and other political and economic developments which may have an adverse 
bearing on individual securities, a specific sector or all sectors including equity and debt 
markets. Consequently, the NAV of the Units of the Scheme may fluctuate and can go 
up or down. 
Market Risk. 
The Schemes NAV will react to the stock market movements. The Investors could lose 
money over short periods due to fluctuation in the Schemes NAV in response to factors 
such as economic and political developments, changes in interest rates and perceived 
trends in stock prices and market movements, and over longer periods during market. 
Absence of Prior Active Market: Although units of the Scheme are to be listed on the. 
Exchanges, there can be no assurance that an active secondary market will develop 
or be maintained. 
Lack of Market Liquidity: Trading in units of the respective Scheme on the Exchange 
may be halted because of market conditions or for reasons that in the view of the. 
Market Authorities or SEBI, trading in units of the Scheme are not advisable. In 
addition, trading in units of the Scheme is subject to trading halts caused by 
extraordinary market volatility and pursuant to BSE/NSE and SEBI circuit filter 
rules. There can be no assurance that the requirements of the Market necessary to 
maintain the listing of units of the Scheme will continue to be met or will remain. 
Units of the Scheme may trade at Prices Other than NAV: Units of the Scheme may 
trade above or below its NAV. The NAV of the Scheme will fluctuate with changes in 
the market value of Schemes holdings. The trading prices of units of the Scheme will 
fluctuate in accordance with changes in their NAVs as well as market supply and 
demand of units of the Scheme. However, given that units can be created and 
redeemed only in Creation Units directly with the Fund, it is expected that large. 
discounts or premiums to the NAVs of the Scheme will not sustain due to arbitrage 
possibility available. 
Regulatory Risk: Any changes in trading regulations by the Stock Exchange/s or SEBI 
may affect the ability of market maker to arbitrage resulting into wider premium/ 
discount to NAV. Although, the units are listed on BSE and NSE, the AMC and the. 
Trustees will not be liable for delay in listing of Units of the Scheme on the stock 
exchanges / or due to connectivity problems with the depositories and/or due to the 
occurrence of any event beyond their control. 
Settlement Risk: In certain cases, settlement periods may be extended significantly 
by unforeseen circumstances. The inability of the Scheme to make intended 
securities purchases due to settlement problems could cause the Scheme to miss 
certain investment opportunities as in certain cases, settlement periods may be 
extended significantly by unforeseen circumstances. Similarly, the inability to sell 
securities held in the Scheme portfolio may result, at times, in potential losses to the. 
Scheme, and there can be a subsequent decline in the value of the securities held in 
the Schemes portfolio. 
Portfolio Concentration Risk. 
To the extent that the Scheme may concentrate its investments in the Securities of 
companies of certain sectors, the Scheme will therefore be subject to the risks 
associated with such concentration. In addition, the Scheme may be exposed to higher 
levels of volatility and risk than would generally be the case in a more diverse fund 
portfolio of equity Securities. Such risks may impact the Scheme to the extent that it 
invests in particular sectors even in cases where the investment objective is more. 
The equity markets and derivative markets are volatile and the value of securities, 
derivative contracts and other instruments correlated with the equity markets may 
fluctuate dramatically from day to day. This volatility may cause the value of investment 
in the Scheme to decrease. 
Redemption Risk. 
Investors should note that even though the Scheme is an open ended Scheme, 
subscription/redemptions directly with the Fund would be limited to such investors who 
have the ability to subscribe/redeem the units of the Scheme in the creation unit size. 
Generally, this lot size is larger as compared to normal funds. However, investors 
wishing to subscribe/redeem units in other than specific lot size can do so by 
buying/selling the same on the Stock Exchange. Investors can also approach the Fund 
directly for redemption in other than Creation Unit Size on occurrence of various events 
as listed in this document. 
Passive Investments. 
The Scheme is a passively managed scheme and may be affected by a general decline in 
the Indian markets relating to its Underlying Index. The Scheme invests in the securities 
included in its Underlying Index regardless of their investment merit. The AMC does not 
attempt to individually select stocks or to take defensive positions in declining markets. 
Tracking Error Risk. 
Factors such as the fees and expenses of the Scheme, corporate actions, cash balance, 
changes to the Underlying Index and regulatory policies may affect the AMCs ability to 
achieve close correlation with the Underlying Index of the Scheme. The Schemes 
returns may therefore deviate from those of their Underlying Index. Tracking Error is 
defined as the standard deviation of the difference between daily returns of the index 
and the NAV of the Scheme. Tracking Error may arise due to the following reasons: -. 
Expenditure incurred by the Scheme. 
Any delay experienced in the purchase or sale of shares due to illiquidity of the 
market, settlement and realization of sale proceeds and the registration of any 
securities transferred and any delays in receiving cash and dividends and resulting 
delays in reinvesting them. 
Securities trading may halt temporarily due to circuit filters. 
The underlying index reflects the prices of securities at close of business hours. 
However, the Fund may buy or sell the securities at different points of time during 
the trading session at the then prevailing prices which may not correspond to the 
closing prices on the exchange. 
Index Service Provider undertakes the periodical review of the scrips that comprise 
the underlying index and may either drop or include new securities. In such an event, 
the Fund will endeavor to reallocate its portfolio but the available investment/ 
disinvestment opportunities may not permit precise mirroring of the Index. 
The potential for trades to fail which may result in the Scheme not having acquired 
shares at a price necessary to track the index. 
The holding of a cash position (0-5% of the Net Assets to meet the redemptions and 
other liquidity requirements) and accrued income prior to distribution and accrued. 
Disinvestments to meet redemptions, recurring expenses, dividend payouts etc. 
Under normal circumstances, such tracking errors are not expected to exceed 2% per 
annum. However, this may vary due to the reasons mentioned above or any other 
reasons that may arise and particularly when the markets are very volatile. The AMC 
would monitor the tracking error of the Scheme on an ongoing basis and would seek to 
minimize tracking error to the maximum extent possible. 
1.   Interest Rate risk: This risk is associated with movements in interest rate, which 
depend on various factors such as government borrowing, inflation, economic 
performance etc. The values of investments will appreciate/depreciate if the interest 
rates fall/rise. 
2.   Credit risk: This risk arises due to any uncertainty in counterpartys ability or 
willingness to meet its contractual obligations. This risk pertains to the risk of default 
of payment of principal and interest. 
3.   Liquidity risk: The liquidity of a security may change depending on market conditions 
leading to changes in the liquidity premium linked to the price of the security. At the 
time of selling the security, the security can become illiquid leading to loss in the 
value of the portfolio. 
3. Risks associated with investing in ADR/ GDR/ Foreign securities: 
The Scheme will not invest in ADR/GDR/Foreign securities. 
4. Risks associated with investing in Derivatives: 
The Schemes may use various derivative products as permitted by the Regulations. 
Use of derivatives requires an understanding of not only the underlying instrument 
but also of the derivative itself. Other risks include the risk of mis-pricing or improper 
valuation and the inability of derivatives to correlate perfectly with underlying assets, 
rates and indices. 
The Scheme may use derivatives instruments like Stock Index Futures or other 
derivative instruments for the purpose of hedging and portfolio balancing, as 
permitted under the Regulations and guidelines. Usage of derivatives will expose the. 
Schemes to certain risks inherent to such derivatives. 
Derivative products are leveraged instruments and can provide disproportionate 
gains as well as disproportionate losses to the investor. Execution of such strategies 
depends upon the ability of the fund manager to identify such opportunities. 
Identification and execution of the strategies to be pursued by the fund manager 
involve uncertainty and decision of fund manager may not always be profitable. No 
assurance can be given that the fund manager will be able to identify or execute such. 
Thus, derivatives are highly leveraged instruments. Even a small price movement in 
the underlying security could have a large impact on their value. Also, the market for 
derivative instruments is nascent in India. 
The specific risk factors arising out of a derivative strategy used by the Fund Manager 
may be as below: 
Lack of opportunity available in the market. 
The risk of mispricing or improper valuation and the inability of derivatives to 
correlate perfectly with underlying assets, rates and indices. 
Execution Risk: The prices which are seen on the screen need not be the same at 
which execution will take place. 
The Scheme will not have any exposure to Debt Derivatives. Please refer section on. 
Derivatives for further details. 
5. Risks associated with investing in securitzed debt: 
The Scheme will not invest in securitized debt. 
6. Risks associated with Short Selling. 
7. Risks associated with Securities Lending and Borrowing: 
The Scheme may engage in Securities Lending activity. 
Securities lending is lending of securities through an approved intermediary to a 
borrower under an agreement for a specified period with the condition that the borrower 
will return equivalent securities of the same type or class at the end of the specified 
period along with the corporate benefits accruing on the securities borrowed. 
The risks in security lending consist of the failure of intermediary / counterparty, to 
comply with the terms of agreement entered into between the lender of securities i.e. the. 
Scheme and the intermediary / counterparty. Such failure to comply can result in the 
possible loss of rights in the collateral put up by the borrower of the securities, the 
inability of the approved intermediary to return the securities deposited by the lender 
and the possible loss of any corporate benefits accruing to the lender from the securities 
deposited with the approved intermediary. The scheme may not be able to sell lent out 
securities, which can lead to temporary illiquidity & loss of opportunity. 
Investors are requested to refer to section How will the Scheme allocate its assets? for 
maximum permissible exposure to Securities Lending. 
The AMC shall report to the Trustee on a quarterly basis as to the level of lending in 
terms of value, volume and the names of the intermediaries and the earnings/losses 
arising out of the transactions, the value of collateral security offered etc. The Trustees 
shall offer their comments on the above aspect in the report filed with SEBI under sub- 
regulation 23(a) of Regulation 18. 
8. Risks associated with investing in Tri Party Repo through CCIL (TREPS): 
The mutual fund is a member of securities segment and Tri-party Repo trade 
settlement of the Clearing Corporation of India (CCIL). All transactions of the 
mutual fund in government securities and in Tri-party Repo trades are settled 
centrally through the infrastructure and settlement systems provided by CCIL. 
thus reducing the settlement and counterparty risks considerably for transactions 
in the said segments. 
CCIL maintains prefunded resources in all the clearing segments to cover 
potential losses arising from the default member. In the event of a clearing 
member failing to honour his settlement obligations, the default Fund is utilized to 
complete the settlement. The sequence in which the above resources are used is 
known as the Default Waterfall. 
As per the waterfall mechanism, after the defaulters margins and the defaulters 
contribution to the default fund have been appropriated, CCILs contribution is 
used to meet the losses. Post utilization of CCILs contribution if there is a residual 
loss, it is appropriated from the default fund contributions of the non-defaulting. 
Thus the scheme is subject to risk of the initial margin and default fund 
contribution being invoked in the event of failure of any settlement obligations. In 
addition, the fund contribution is allowed to be used to meet the residual loss in 
case of default by the other clearing member (the defaulting member). 
However, it may be noted that a member shall have the right to submit 
resignation from the membership of the Security segment if it has taken a loss 
through replenishment of its contribution to the default fund for the segments 
and a loss threshold as notified have been reached. The maximum contribution. 
of a member towards replenishment of its contribution to the default fund in the 7 
days (30 days in case of securities segment) period immediately after the afore- 
mentioned loss threshold having been reached shall not exceed 5 times of its 
contribution to the Default Fund based on the last re-computation of the Default. 
Fund or specified amount, whichever is lower. 
Further, it may be noted that, CCIL periodically prescribes a list of securities 
eligible for contributions as collateral by members. Presently, all Central. 
Government securities and Treasury bills are accepted as collateral by CCIL. The 
risk factors may undergo change in case the CCIL notifies securities other than. 
Government of India securities as eligible for contribution as collateral. 
RISK MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES. . 
The Fund by utilizing a holistic risk management strategy will endeavor to manage risks 
associated with investing in equity markets. The risk control process involves identifying 
& measuring the risk through various risk measurement tools. 
Risks associated with Equity investment. 
Market Risk. 
Scheme. The value of the underlying. 
Scheme investments, may be affected 
generally by factors affecting securities 
markets, such as price and volume, volatility 
in the capital markets, interest rates, currency 
exchange rates, changes in policies of the. 
Government, taxation laws or any other 
appropriate authority policies and other 
political and economic developments which 
may have an adverse bearing on individual 
securities, a specific sector or all sectors 
including equity and debt markets. 
the underlying stocks. 
risk):                                              Concentration risk): 
Scheme are to closely track the 
performance of the Underlying Index. 
Risk and Description. 
Risks associated with Equity investment. 
As and when the Scheme trades in the 
derivatives market there are risk factors and 
issues concerning the use of derivatives 
since derivative products are specialized 
techniques and risk analyses different from 
those associated with stocks and bonds. 
Risks associated with Debt investment. 
Market Risk/ Interest Rate Risk. 
As with all debt securities, changes in 
interest rates may affect the Schemes Net. 
Asset Value as the prices of securities 
generally increase as interest rates decline 
and generally decrease as interest rates 
rise. Prices of long-term securities generally 
fluctuate more in response to interest rate 
changes than do short-term securities. 
Indian debt markets can be volatile leading 
to the possibility of price movements up or 
down in fixed income securities and 
thereby to possible movements in the NAV. 
Liquidity or Marketability Risk. 
This refers to the ease with which a security 
can be sold at or near to its valuation yield- 
to-maturity (YTM). 
Credit Risk. 
Credit risk or default risk refers to the risk 
that an issuer of a fixed income security 
may default (i.e., will be unable to make 
timely principal and interest payments on 
the security). 
Risk mitigants / management strategy 
over the same period, subject to 
tracking error. The Scheme would 
endeavor to maintain a low tracking 
error by actively aligning the portfolio 
in line with the Index. 
Derivatives will be used in the form of. 
Index Options, Index Futures and 
other Instruments as may be 
permitted by SEBI. All derivatives 
trade will be done only on the 
exchange with guaranteed settlement. 
No OTC contracts will be entered into. 
The Scheme may invest only in 
money market instruments having a 
residual maturity upto 91 days 
volatility due to interest rate 
changes generally associated with 
long-term securities. 
The Scheme may invest only in 
government securities and money 
market instruments. The liquidity 
risk for government securities, 
money market instruments is 
generally low. 
Management analysis will be used 
for identifying company specific 
risks. Managements past track 
record will also be studied. In order 
to assess financial risk a detailed 
assessment of the issuers financial 
statements will be undertaken to 
review its ability to undergo stress 
on cash flows and asset quality. A 
detailed evaluation of accounting 
comments and disclosure standards 
will also be made to assess the 
overall financial risk of the potential. 
B. REQUIREMENT OF MINIMUM INVESTORS IN THE SCHEME. . 
Investors in the Scheme are not being offered any guaranteed returns. 
Investors are advised to consult their Legal /Tax and other Professional Advisors 
in regard to tax/legal implications relating to their investments in the Scheme and 
before making decision to invest in or redeem the Units. 
Investors are urged to study the terms of the SID carefully before investing in the. 
Scheme, and to retain this SID for future reference. 
The Mutual Fund/AMC have not authorised any person to give any information or 
make any representations, either oral or written, not stated in this SID in 
connection with issue of Units under the Scheme. Prospective investors are 
advised not to rely upon any information or representations not incorporated in 
this SID as the same have not been authorised by the Mutual Fund or the AMC. 
Any subscription, purchase or sale made by any person on the basis of 
statements or representations which are not contained in this SID or which are 
inconsistent with the information contained herein shall be solely at the risk of 
the investor. 
Suspicious Transaction Reporting: If after due diligence, the AMC believes that 
any transaction is suspicious in nature as regards money laundering, the AMC 
shall report any such suspicious transactions to competent authorities under. 
PMLA and rules / guidelines issued there under by SEBI and / or RBI, furnish of 
any such information in connection therewith to such authorities and take any 
other actions as may be required for the purposes of fulfilling its obligations 
under PMLA and rules / guidelines issued there under by SEBI and / or RBI 
without obtaining the prior approval of the investor / Unit Holder / any other. 
The AMC is also engaged in portfolio management services (PMS) since October 
2000 under SEBI Registration No. INP000000373. The AMC is also rendering. 
Advisory Services to SEBI registered foreign portfolio investors (FPIs) and their 
sub-accounts. The AMC is also providing investment management services to. 
Alternative Investment Funds registered under SEBI (Alternative Investment. 
Funds) Regulations, 2012. The AMC has a common research team. These 
activities are not in conflict with the activities of the Mutual Fund. In the situations 
of unavoidable conflicts of interest, the AMC undertakes that it shall satisfy itself 
that adequate disclosures are made of sources of conflict, potential material risk 
or damage to investor interest and develop parameters for the same. 
The Mutual Fund may disclose details of the investors account and transactions 
thereunder to those intermediaries whose stamp appears on the application 
form. In addition, the Mutual Fund may disclose such details to the bankers / its 
agents, as may be necessary for the purpose of effecting payments to the 
investor. Further, the Mutual Fund may disclose details of the investors account 
and transactions thereunder to any Regulatory/Statutory entities as per the 
provisions of law. 
D. DEFINITIONS :. . 
In this Scheme Information Document, the following words and expressions shall have 
the meaning specified herein, unless the context otherwise requires: 
As the Scheme is an Exchange Traded Fund (ETF) and the units 
of the Scheme are listed on the stock exchanges, in the interest 
of the investors/ unitholders, the operational processes of the. 
Schemes with respect to all the provisions of Uniform cut-off 
timings for applicability of Net Asset Value (NAV) issued by SEBI 
from time to time shall stand modified. 
Unless otherwise stated in this document, Applicable NAV is the. 
Net Asset Value per Unit of the Scheme as declared by the Fund 
and applicable for valid Purchase/ Redemption of Units of the. 
Scheme, based on the Business Day and Cut-off time at which 
the application is received and accepted and also subject to 
compliance with other conditions as mentioned in this. 
AMC            or for the schemes of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund. 
and their nominated entities/ person or any other person(s) who 
is/ would be appointed by the AMC/Fund to act as Authorised. 
Business Day / A day other than. 
2. a day on which the Stock Exchange, Mumbai and National. 
Stock Exchange are closed whether or not Banks are open. or 
3. a day on which the Sale and Redemption of Units is 
suspended by the Trustee. 
However, AMC reserves the right to declare any day as a non- 
business day at any of its locations at its sole discretion. 
Cash Component The Cash Component represents the difference between the 
for Creation Unit applicable net asset value of a Creation Unit and the market value 
of the Portfolio Deposit. This difference may include accrued 
dividends, accrued annual charges including management fees 
and residual cash in the Scheme. In addition, the Cash. 
Component may include transaction cost as charged by the. 
Custodian/Depository Participant, equalization of dividend, effect 
of rounding-off of number of shares in portfolio Deposit and 
other incidental expenses for Creating Units. The Cash. 
Component will vary from time to time and will be computed and. 
announced by the AMC on its website every Business Day. 
exchanged for a basket of securities underlying the index called 
the Portfolio Deposit and a Cash Component or equivalent value 
in terms of cash. 
Creation Unit for the Scheme is 10,000 units. 
The Portfolio Deposit and Cash Component will change from 
time to time. The Creation Unit Size may be changed by the AMC 
at its discretion and the notice of the same shall be published on. 
AMCs website. 
acting as Custodian of the Scheme, or any other custodian who 
is approved by the Trustee. 
For details about the custodian, refer Statement of Additional. 
Cut-off time for Investors / Unit holders to note that the below mentioned Cut-off 
transactions undertaken at the Official Points of Acceptance. 
As the Scheme is an Exchange Traded Fund (ETFs) and the units 
of the Scheme are listed on the stock exchanges, in the interest 
of the investors/ unitholders, the operational processes of the. 
Scheme with respect to all the provisions of Uniform cut-off 
timings for applicability of Net Asset Value (NAV) issued by SEBI 
from time to time shall stand modified. 
The Fund may allow subscription/ redemption in Creation Unit. 
Size and in multiples thereof by investor(s)/ authorised 
participant(s) based on the Portfolio Deposit/ equivalent amount 
of cash and Cash Component as defined by the Fund for that 
respective Business Day. 
The Cut-off time for receipt of valid application for subscriptions/ 
redemptions is 3.00 p.m. on any business day. 
which may be close to the NAV of the Scheme. 
ETFs (Exchange Traded Funds) predominantly invests in stocks 
constituting an underlying index. They just trade like stocks so 
they are essentially index stocks that combine the benefits of a 
mutual fund with a listed stock. They are passively managed 
funds providing exposure to the performance of that index. 
Foreign Portfolio Foreign portfolio investor means a person who satisfies the. 
and Exchange Board of India (Foreign Portfolio Investors). 
Regulations, 2014. Any foreign institutional investor or qualified 
foreign investor who holds a valid certificate of registration shall 
be deemed to be a foreign portfolio investor till the expiry of the 
block of three years for which fees have been paid as per the. 
Securities and Exchange Board of India (Foreign Institutional. 
Investors) Regulations, 1995. 
ICICI Prudential ICICI Prudential Bank ETF, an Exchange Traded Fund tracking. 
Investor Service The Investor Service Centres as may be designated by the AMC. 
NAV               Net Asset Value of the Units of Scheme, calculated on every. 
Business Day in the manner provided in this Scheme Information. 
Document or as may be prescribed by Regulations from time to. 
investment, which gives an updated measure of the value of the 
investment based on its assets less its liabilities. An investments. 
NAV is usually calculated at the end of the trading day, but the 
indicative NAV measure gives a more real-time view of this. 
NRI               Non-Resident Indian. 
NSE/ NSE Ltd/ National Stock Exchange of India Limited. 
Portfolio Deposit This is a pre-defined basket of securities that constitute Nifty. 
Prudential Bank. 
requires, its wholly owned subsidiary Prudential Corporation. 
Holdings Limited. 
RBI               Reserve Bank of India, established under the Reserve Bank of. 
India Act, 1934, as amended from time to time. 
dated March 25, 2019, retail investors would mean individual 
investors from whom inflows into the Scheme amount upto Rs. 
2,00,000/- per transaction. 
Underlying Index Nifty Bank Index. 
notice money, certificate of deposit, usance bill and any other like 
instruments as specified by the Reserve Bank of India from time 
to time. 
Securities and Exchange Board of India Act, 1992, as amended 
from time to time. 
Mutual Fund. 
Trading Day. 
Transaction 
handling charges transaction tax, regulatory charges if any, depository participant. 
Unit. 
Unitholder(s). 
Expressions. 
Document and 
not defined. 
of the Indian Trusts Act, 1882. The Fund is registered with SEBI 
vide Registration No.MF/003/93/6 dated October 12, 1993 as ICICI. 
Mutual Fund and has obtained approval from SEBI for change in 
name to Prudential ICICI Mutual Fund vide SEBIs letter dated. 
April 16, 1998. The change of name of the Fund to ICICI. 
Prudential Mutual Fund was approved by SEBI vide Letter No. 
IMD/PM/90170/07 dated April 02, 2007. 
Securities and Exchange Board of India (Mutual Funds). 
Regulations, 1996 as amended from time to time. 
ICICI Prudential Trust Limited, a company set up under the. 
Companies Act, 1956, and approved by SEBI to act as the. 
Trustee for the schemes of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund. 
Tracking Error is defined as the standard deviation of the 
difference between daily returns of the index and the NAV of the. 
A day on which BSE/NSE is open for trading of securities. 
Transaction handling charges include brokerage, Securities 
charges, uploading charges and such other charges that the. 
Fund may have to incur in the course of cash 
subscription/redemption or accepting the portfolio deposit or for 
giving a portfolio of securities as consideration for a redemption 
request. Such transaction handling charges shall be recoverable 
from the transacting Authorised Participant or Investor. 
The Trust Deed dated August 25, 1993 establishing ICICI Mutual. 
Fund (subsequently renamed ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund), as 
amended from time to time. 
Amounts settled/contributed by the Sponsors towards the 
corpus of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund and additions/accretions. 
The interest of an investor, which consists of, one undivided 
share in the Net Assets of the respective Scheme. 
A holder of Units in the Scheme of ICICI Prudential Bank ETF as 
contained in this Scheme Information Document. 
E. DUE DILIGENCE BY THE ASSET MANAGEMENT COMPANY. . 
It is confirmed that: 
(i) the Scheme Information Document (SID) forwarded to SEBI is in accordance with the. 
SEBI (Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996 and the guidelines and directives issued by. 
SEBI from time to time. 
(ii) all legal requirements connected with the launching of the Scheme as also the 
guidelines, instructions, etc., issued by the Government and any other competent 
authority in this behalf, have been duly complied with. 
(iii) the disclosures made in the Scheme Information Document are true, fair and 
adequate to enable the investors to make a well informed decision regarding 
investment in the proposed Scheme. 
Supriya Sapre. 
Sd/-. 
II. INFORMATION ABOUT THE SCHEME. . 
A. TYPE OF THE SCHEME. . 
An open-ended Exchange Traded Fund tracking Nifty Bank Index. 
B. WHAT IS THE INVESTMENT OBJECTIVE OF THE SCHEME?. . 
The investment objective of the scheme is to provide returns before expenses that 
closely correspond to the total return of the underlying index subject to tracking errors. 
However, there can be no assurance or guarantee that the investment objective of the. 
Scheme would be achieved. 
C. HOW WILL THE SCHEME ALLOCATE ITS ASSETS?. . 
Under normal circumstances, the asset allocation under the Scheme will be as follows: 
(% of total assets). 
index (Nifty Bank Index). 
maturity not exceeding 91 
days), including TREPS#, cash & 
cash equivalents. 
Derivative instruments on underlying index (stock/ index futures) up to 5% of the. 
Net Assets. Investment in derivatives shall be made in accordance with the SEBI. 
Circular No. Cir/ IMD/ DF/ 11/ 2010 dated August 18, 2010 and such other guidelines 
on derivatives as issued by SEBI from time to time. 
Stock lending up to 20% of its Net Assets. 
The cumulative gross exposure across various asset classes should not exceed 100% of 
the net assets of the scheme. 
In case of any variation of the portfolio from the above asset allocation, the portfolio 
shall be rebalanced within 7 Days to ensure adherence to the above norms. In the event 
of involuntary corporate action, the Fund shall dispose the security not forming part of 
the Underlying index within 7 business days from the date of allotment/ listing. 
The AMC would monitor the tracking error of the Scheme on an ongoing basis and 
would seek to minimize tracking error to the maximum extent possible. Under normal 
circumstances, the AMC will endeavour that the tracking error of the Scheme does not 
exceed 2% per annum. However, this may vary due to various reasons mentioned 
below or any other reasons that may arise and particularly when the markets are very. 
For more details on Tracking Error, kindly refer Tracking Error Risk under Scheme. 
Specific Risk Factors. 
The Scheme does not intend to undertake/ invest/ engage in: 
Repos in corporate debt securities. 
Short selling of securities. 
Unrated instruments (except TREPS/ Government Securities/ T- Bills / Repo and. 
Reverse Repo in Government Securities). 
Foreign securities/ADR/GDR. and. 
Securitised debts. 
Change in Investment Pattern. 
As an index linked ETF, the scheme is passively managed. However, as elsewhere stated 
in this scheme information document, the investment pattern and the percentages stated 
are indicative, and may change for short duration and defensive considerations with the 
intention to protect the interests of the Unit holders. In the event the underlying index is 
dissolved or is withdrawn by index service provider or is not published due to any 
reason whatsoever, the Trustees reserve the right to modify the Scheme so as to track a 
different and suitable index or to suspend tracking the underlying index and appropriate 
intimation will be sent to the Unit holders of the Scheme. In such a case, the investment 
pattern will be modified suitably to match the composition of the securities that are 
included in the new index to be tracked and the Scheme will be subject to tracking 
errors during the intervening period. 
Provided further and subject to the above, any change in the asset allocation affecting 
the investment profile of the Scheme shall be effected only in accordance with the 
provisions of sub regulation (15A) of Regulation 18 of the Regulations. 
D. WHERE WILL THE SCHEME INVEST?. . 
The Scheme invests in the securities included in the Underlying Index regardless of their 
investment merit. 
Subject to the Regulations and the disclosures as made under the Section How the. 
Scheme will allocate its Assets, the corpus of the Scheme can be invested in any (but 
not exclusive) of the following securities/ instruments: 
1) Equity and equity related securities forming part of underlying index, including 
warrants carrying the right to obtain equity shares. 
2) Money market instruments as defined under SEBI (Mutual Funds) Regulations, 
1996, having maturities of up to 91 Days, or in alternative investment for the call 
money market or any other instruments/securities as permitted by SEBI/RBI from 
time to time. 
3) Derivative instruments like, Stock / Index Futures, Stock / Index Options and such 
other derivative instruments permitted by SEBI. 
4) Units of Liquid schemes of the Fund, subject to applicable regulations. 
Or similar instruments as may be permitted by SEBI/RBI from time to time. 
Subject to the Regulations, the securities mentioned above could be listed, privately 
placed, secured, unsecured, rated or unrated and of varying maturity. 
The Scheme may invest in other schemes managed by the AMC or in the schemes of 
any other Mutual Funds, provided it is in conformity with the investment objective of the. 
Scheme and in terms of the prevailing Regulations. As per the Regulations, no 
investment management fees will be charged for such investments and the aggregate 
inter-scheme investment made by all Schemes of the Fund or in Schemes under the 
management of other asset management companies shall not exceed 5% of the Net. 
Asset Value of the Mutual Fund. 
The Scheme may use derivatives instruments like Stock/ Index Futures or such other 
derivative instruments as may be introduced from time to time, within the limit specified 
under HOW WILL THE SCHEME ALLOCATE ITS ASSETS which may be increased as 
permitted under the Regulations from time to time. 
The following information provides a basic idea as to the nature of the derivative 
instruments proposed to be used by the Scheme and the risks attached there with. 
Equity Derivatives. 
The Scheme intends to use derivatives for purposes that may be permitted by the. 
Regulations from time to time. Derivatives instruments may take the form of Futures, 
Options, Swaps or any other instrument, as may be permitted from time to time. 
Position limits for investment in Derivative instruments: 
SEBI has vide its Circular DNPD/Cir-29/2005 dated September 14, 2005 and DNPD/Cir- 
29/2005 dated January 20, 2006 and CIR/IMD/DF/11/2010 dated August 18, 2010 
specified the guidelines pertaining to trading by Mutual Fund in Exchange trades 
derivatives. All Derivative positions taken in the portfolio would be guided by the 
following principles: 
Position limit for the Fund in index options contracts. 
The Fund position limit in all index options contracts on a particular underlying 
index shall be Rs. 500 crore or 15% of the total open interest of the market in index 
options, whichever is higher per Stock Exchange. 
This limit would be applicable on open positions in all options contracts on a 
particular underlying index. 
Position limit for the Fund in index futures contract. 
The Fund position limit in all index futures contracts on a particular underlying 
index shall be Rs. 500 crore or 15% of the total open interest of the market in index 
futures, whichever is higher, per Stock Exchange. 
This limit would be applicable on open positions in all futures contracts on a 
particular underlying index. 
Additional position limit for hedging. 
In addition to the position limits mentioned above, Fund may take exposure in equity 
index derivatives subject to the following limits: 
Short positions in index derivatives (short futures, short calls and long puts) shall 
not exceed (in notional value) the Funds holding of stocks. 
Long positions in index derivatives (long futures, long calls and short puts) shall 
not exceed (in notional value) the Funds holding of cash, government securities, T-. 
Bills and similar instruments. 
Position limit for the Fund for stock based derivative contracts. 
The Fund position limit in a derivative contract on a particular underlying stock, 
i.e. stock option contracts and stock futures contracts, :- 
a. The combined futures and options position limit shall be 20% of the 
applicable Market Wide Position Limit (MWPL). 
b. The MWPL and client level position limits however would remain the same 
as prescribed. 
Position limit for the Scheme. 
The position limits for the Scheme and disclosure requirements are as follow. For 
stock option and stock futures contracts, the gross open position across all 
derivative contracts on a particular underlying stock of a scheme of a Fund shall 
not exceed the higher of: 
1% of the free float market capitalisation (in terms of number of shares). 
5% of the open interest in the derivative contracts on a particular underlying stock 
(in terms of number of contracts. 
This position limit shall be applicable on the combined position in all derivative 
contracts on an underlying stock at a Stock Exchange. 
For index based contracts, the Fund shall disclose the total open interest held by its 
scheme or all schemes put together in a particular underlying index, if such open 
interest equals to or exceeds 15% of the open interest of all derivative contracts on 
that underlying index. 
Various Derivatives Strategies: 
If and where Derivative strategies are used under the Scheme, the Fund Manager will 
employ a combination of the following strategies: 
1.      Index Arbitrage: 
As the Index derives its value from the underlying stocks, the underlying stocks can be 
used to create a synthetic index matching the Index levels. Also, theoretically, the fair 
value of a stock/ index futures is equal to the spot price plus the cost of carry i.e. the 
interest rate prevailing for an equivalent credit risk, in this case is the Clearing. 
Corporation of the NSE/BSE. 
Theoretically, therefore, the pricing of Index futures should be equal to the pricing of the 
synthetic index created by futures on the underlying stocks. However, due to market 
imperfections, the index futures may not exactly correspond to the synthetic index. 
The Index futures normally trades at a discount to the synthetic Index due to large 
volumes of stock hedging being done using the Index futures giving rise to arbitrage. 
The fund manager shall aim to capture such arbitrage opportunities by taking long 
positions in the Index futures and short positions in the synthetic index. The strategy is 
attractive if this price differential (post all costs) is higher than the investors cost-of-. 
Risks Associated with this Strategy. 
Lack of opportunity available in the market. 
The risk of mispricing or improper valuation and the inability of derivatives to 
correlate perfectly with underlying assets, rates and indices. 
Execution Risk: The prices which are seen on the screen need not be the same at 
which execution will take place. 
2.     Cash Futures Arbitrage: (Only one way as the schemes are not allowed to short in 
the cash market). 
The Scheme would look for market opportunities between the spot and the futures 
market. The cash futures arbitrage strategy can be employed when the price of the 
futures exceeds the price of the underlying stock. 
The Scheme will first buy the stocks in cash market and then sell in the futures market to 
lock the spread known as arbitrage return. 
Buying the stock in cash market and selling the futures results into a hedge where the. 
Scheme has locked in a spread and is not affected by the price movement of cash 
market and futures market. The arbitrage position can be continued till expiry of the 
future contracts. The future contracts are settled based on the last half an hours 
weighted average trade of the cash market. Thus, there is a convergence between the 
cash market and the futures market on expiry. This convergence helps the Scheme to 
generate the arbitrage return locked in earlier. However, the position could even be 
closed earlier in case the price differential is realized before expiry or better 
opportunities are available in other stocks. The strategy is attractive if this price 
differential (post all costs) is higher than the investors cost-of-capital. 
Objective of the Strategy. 
The objective of the strategy is to lock-in the arbitrage gains. 
Risk Associated with this Strategy. 
Lack of opportunity available in the market. 
The risk of mispricing or improper valuation and the inability of derivatives to 
correlate perfectly with underlying assets, rates and indices. 
Execution Risk: The prices which are seen on the screen need not be the same at 
which execution will take place 
3.     Hedging and alpha strategy: The Scheme will use exchange-traded derivatives to 
hedge the equity portfolio. The hedging could be either partial or complete depending 
upon the fund managers perception of the markets. The fund manager shall either use 
index futures and options or stock futures and options to hedge the stocks in the. 
portfolio. The Scheme will seek to generate alpha by superior stock selection and 
removing market risks by selling appropriate index. For example, one can seek to 
generate positive alpha by buying an IT stock and selling Nifty IT Index future or a bank 
stock and selling Bank Index futures or buying a stock and selling the Nifty Index. 
Objective of the Strategy. 
The objective of the strategy is to generate alpha by superior stock selection and 
removing market risks by hedging with appropriate index. 
Risk Associated with this Strategy. 
The stock selection under this strategy may under-perform the market and generate 
a negative alpha. 
The risk of mispricing or improper valuation and the inability of derivatives to 
correlate perfectly with underlying assets, rates and indices. 
Execution Risk: The prices which are seen on the screen need not be the same at 
which execution will take place. 
4.      Other Derivative Strategies: As allowed under the Regulations on derivatives, the 
fund manager will employ various other stock and index derivative strategies by buying 
or selling stock/index futures and/or options. 
Objective of the Strategy. 
The objective of the strategy is to earn low volatility consistent returns. 
Risk Associated with this Strategy. 
The risk of mispricing or improper valuation and the inability of derivatives to 
correlate perfectly with underlying assets, rates and indices. 
Execution Risk: The prices which are seen on the screen need not be the same at 
which execution will take place. 
Illustrations of some derivative transactions 
i. Index Futures: 
Benefits 
a. Investment in Stock Index Futures can give exposure to the index without directly 
buying the individual stocks. Appreciation in Index stocks can be effectively captured 
through investment in Stock Index Futures. 
b. The Scheme can sell futures to hedge against market movements effectively without 
actually selling the stocks it holds. 
The Stock Index futures are instruments designed to give exposure to the equity market 
indices. BSE Limited and National Stock Exchange of India Limited have started trading 
in index futures of 1, 2 and 3-month maturities. The pricing of an index future is the 
function of the underlying index and interest rates. 
Spot Index: 1070 
1 month Nifty Future Price on day 1: 1075. 
Fund buys 100 lots. 
Each lot has a nominal value equivalent to 200 units of the underlying index. 
Let us say that on the date of settlement, the future price = Closing spot price = 1085. 
Profits for the Scheme = (1085-1075)* 100 lots * 200 = Rs 200,000. 
Please note that the above example is given for illustration purposes only. 
The net impact for the Scheme will be in terms of the difference between the closing 
price of the index and cost price (ignoring margins for the sake of simplicity). Thus, it is 
clear from the example that the profit or loss for the Fund will be the difference of the 
closing price (which can be higher or lower than the purchase price) and the purchase 
price. The risks associated with index futures are similar to the one with equity 
investments. Additional risks could be on account of illiquidity and hence mispricing of 
the future at the time of purchase. 
ii) Buying Options: 
Benefits of buying a call option: 
Buying a call option on a stock or index gives the owner the right, but not the obligation, 
to buy the underlying stock / index at the designated strike price. Here the downside 
risks are limited to the premium paid to purchase the option. 
For example, if the scheme buys a one month call option on ABC Limited at a strike of. 
Rs. 150, the current market price being say Rs.151. The scheme will have to pay a 
premium of say Rs. 15 to buy this call. If the stock price goes below Rs. 150 during the 
tenure of the call, the scheme avoids the loss it would have incurred had it straightaway 
bought the stock instead of the call option. The scheme gives up the premium of Rs. 15 
that has to be paid in order to protect the scheme from this probable downside. If the 
stock goes above Rs. 150, it can exercise its right and own ABC Limited at a cost price of. 
Rs. 150, thereby participating in the upside of the stock. 
Benefits of buying a put option. 
Buying a put option on a stock originally held by the buyer gives him/her the right, but 
not the obligation, to sell the underlying stock at the designated strike price. Here the 
downside risks are limited to the premium paid to purchase the option. 
For example, if the scheme owns ABC Limited and also buys a three month put option 
on ABC Limited at a strike of Rs. 150, the current market price being say Rs.151. The 
scheme will have to pay a premium of say Rs. 12 to buy this put. If the stock price goes 
below Rs. 150 during the tenure of the put, the scheme can still exercise the put and sell 
the stock at Rs. 150, avoiding therefore any downside on the stock below Rs. 150. The 
scheme gives up the fixed premium of Rs. 12 that has to be paid in order to protect the 
scheme from this probable downside. If the stock goes above Rs. 150, say to Rs. 170, it 
will not exercise its option. The scheme will participate in the upside of the stock, since it 
can now sell the stock at the prevailing market price of Rs. 170. 
The Scheme will not have any exposure to Debt Derivatives. 
Valuation of Derivative Products: 
I.   The traded derivatives shall be valued at market price in conformity with the 
valuation policy of the Mutual Fund. 
valuation method for untraded investments prescribed in sub clauses (i) and (ii) of 
clause 2 of the Eighth Schedule to the Securities and Exchange Board of India 
(Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996 as amended from time to time. 
E.   WHAT ARE THE INVESTMENT STRATEGIES?. . 
The corpus of the Scheme will be invested predominantly in stocks constituting the 
underlying index in the same proportion as in the Index and endeavor to track the 
benchmark index. A very small portion (0-5% of the Net Assets) of the fund may be kept 
liquid to meet the liquidity and expense requirements. The fund may also use various 
derivatives and hedging instruments from time to time, as would be available and 
permitted by SEBI, in an attempt to protect the value of the portfolio and enhance. 
Unitholders interest. 
The performance of the Scheme may not be commensurate with the performance of the 
underlying index on any given day or over any given period. Such variations are 
commonly referred to as the tracking error. The Scheme intends to maintain a low 
tracking error by closely aligning the portfolio in line with the index. The stocks 
comprising the underlying index are periodically reviewed by Index Service Provider. A 
particular stock may be dropped or new securities may be included as a constituent of 
the index. In such an event, the Fund will endeavor to reallocate its portfolio but the 
available investment/ disinvestment opportunities may not permit precise mirroring of 
the underlying index immediately. Similarly, in the event of a constituent stock being 
demerged / merged / delisted from the exchange or due to a major corporate action in a 
constituent stock, the fund may have to reallocate the portfolio and seek to minimize the 
variation from the index. In such events, it may be more prudent for the fund to take 
exposure through derivatives of the index itself or its constituent stocks in order to 
minimize the long term tracking error. 
Equities and equity related instruments: 
The Scheme would invest in stocks comprising the underlying index and endeavor to 
track the benchmark index. 
Fixed Income Securities: 
The Scheme may also invest in units of liquid schemes, money market instrument (with 
maturity not exceeding 91 days), including TREPS, cash & cash equivalents , in 
compliance with Regulations to meet liquidity requirements. The scheme may also 
invest in liquid schemes of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund or other schemes which has 
objective to invest in debt and money market instruments. Money Market Instruments 
include commercial papers, commercial bills, treasury bills, and Government securities 
having an unexpired maturity up to one year, call or notice money, certificate of deposit, 
usance bills, CBLOs and any other like instruments as specified by the Reserve Bank of. 
India from time to time. 
Investment in Derivatives: 
The Scheme may take an exposure to equity derivatives of constituents of the 
underlying Basket when securities of the Basket are unavailable, insufficient or for 
rebalancing at the time of change in Basket or in case of corporate actions, for a short 
period of time. The Scheme may use derivative instruments such as stock futures and 
options contracts, warrants, convertible securities, swap agreements or any other 
derivative instruments that are permissible or may be permissible in future under 
applicable regulations and such investments shall be in accordance with the investment 
objective of the Scheme. 
Implementation of Policies. 
The Scheme, in general, will hold all of the securities that comprise the Underlying Index 
in the same proportion as the index. Expectation is that, over time, the tracking error of 
the Scheme relative to the performance of the Underlying Index will be relatively low. 
The Investment Manager would monitor the tracking error of the Scheme on an ongoing 
basis and would seek to minimize tracking error to the maximum extent possible. There 
can be no assurance or guarantee that the Scheme will achieve any particular level of 
tracking error relative to performance of the Underlying Index. 
Investment Process. 
The Scheme will track the Underlying Index and is a passively managed scheme. The 
investment Decisions will be determined as per the Underlying Index. In case of any 
change in the index due to corporate actions or change in the constituents of the. 
Underlying Index (as communicated by the Index Service Provider), relevant investment 
decisions will be determined considering the composition of the Underlying Index. 
The Scheme may invest in other schemes managed by the AMC or in the schemes of 
any other Mutual Funds, provided it is in conformity with the investment objective of the. 
Scheme and in terms of the prevailing Regulations. As per the Regulations, no 
investment management fees will be charged for such investments and the aggregate 
inter-scheme investment made by all Schemes of the Fund or in Schemes under the 
management of other asset management companies shall not exceed 5% of the Net. 
Asset Value of the Mutual Fund. 
Portfolio Turnover. 
Portfolio turnover is defined as the lower of purchases and sales divided by the average 
assets under management of the respective Scheme during a specified period of time. 
Generally, portfolio turnover of the Scheme will be confined to rebalancing of portfolio 
on account of change in the composition and corporate actions of the Underlying Index. 
INFORMATION ON NIFTY BANK INDEX. . 
Nifty Bank Index is an index comprised of the most liquid and large capitalised Indian. 
Banking stocks. It provides investors and market intermediaries with a benchmark that 
captures the capital market performance of Indian Banks. The index has 12 stocks from 
the banking sector which trade on the National Stock Exchange. 
Constituent weightings. 
Constituents of Nifty Bank Index as on June 18, 2019 is given below: 
Tracking Error. 
The AMC would monitor the tracking error of the Scheme on an ongoing basis and 
would seek to minimize tracking error to the maximum extent possible. Under normal 
circumstances, the AMC will endeavour that the tracking error of the Scheme does not 
exceed 2% per annum. However, this may vary due to various reasons mentioned 
below or any other reasons that may arise and particularly when the markets are very. 
PROCEDURE FOR CREATION OF UNITS. . 
Issue of Units 
1. Each unit of the Scheme will be approximately equal to 1/100th of the Underlying. 
Index closing on the date of allotment. The units being offered will be issued at a 
premium approximately equal to the difference between face value and allotment 
2. As the Scheme will be listed on BSE/NSE, subsequent buying or selling by investors 
can be made from the secondary market on BSE/NSE. The minimum number of units 
that can be bought or sold is 1 (one) unit. 
3. Authorised Participant(s)/ Investor(s) can directly buy / sell in blocks from the Fund in. 
Creation Unit Size. 
Creation of Units: 
Creation Unit is a fixed number of Units of the Scheme, which is exchanged for a 
predefined basket of shares underlying the index called the Portfolio Deposit and a. 
Cash Component. The facility of creating / redeeming units in Creation Unit size is 
available to the Authorised Participant and Investors. 
The number of units, that investors can create / redeem in exchange of the Portfolio. 
Deposit and Cash Component, is 10,000 Units and in multiples thereof. The Portfolio. 
Deposit and Cash Component are defined as follows:- 
a. Portfolio Deposit: This is a pre-defined basket of securities that represent the. 
Underlying Index. Portfolio Deposit can change from time to time. 
Creation Unit and the market value of the Portfolio Deposit. This difference may 
include accrued dividends, accrued annual charges including management fees and 
residual cash in the Scheme. In addition, the Cash Component may include 
transaction cost as charged by the Custodian/Depository Participant, equalization of 
dividend, effect of rounding-off of number of shares in Portfolio Deposit and other 
incidental expenses for Creating Units. The Cash Component will vary from time to 
time and will be computed and announced by the AMC on its website every Business. 
The Creation Unit is made up of 2 components i.e. the Portfolio Deposit and the Cash. 
Component. The Portfolio Deposit will be determined by the Fund as per the weightages 
of each security in the Underlying Index. The value of this portfolio deposit will change 
due to change in prices during the day. The number of shares of each security that 
constitute the portfolio deposit will remain constant unless there is any corporate action 
in the Underlying Index/ change in the constituents of the Underlying Index. 
Example of Creation of Units as on: 
B    Hypothetical NAV (1/100th of Index). 
C    Unit Creation Size. 
F    Cash Component per creation unit size (D-E) 
(figures are for illustrative purposes only) 
#Value of Portfolio Deposit is arrived as follows: 
June 18, 2019 
(In Rs.). 
30,526.50. . 
305.27. . 
10,000.00. . 
2,717.45. . 
The above is just an example to illustrate the calculation of Cash Component. Cash. 
Component will vary depending upon the actual charges incurred like Custodial Charges 
and other incidental charges for creating units. 
Portfolio Concentration Norms: 
Pursuant to provisions of SEBI Circular no. SEBI/HO/IMD/DF3/CIR/P/2019/011 dated. 
January 10, 2019, the Scheme complies with following portfolio concentration norms : 
1. The index shall have a minimum of 10 stocks as its constituents. 
2. For a sectoral/ thematic Index, no single stock shall have more than 35% weight 
in the index. For other than sectoral/ thematic indices, no single stock shall have 
more than 25% weight in the index. 
3. The weightage of the top three constituents of the index, cumulatively shall not 
be more than 65% of the Index. 
Procedure followed for Investment decisions. 
Please refer to Statement of Additional Information (SAI) for details. 
POSITION OF EQUITY MARKET IN INDIA. . 
The Indian stock market is one of the worlds largest stock market. There are two leading 
stock exchanges in India, i.e. BSE Limited (BSE) and National Stock Exchange of India. 
Limited (NSE). BSE was established in 1875 and is the oldest stock exchange in Asia. 
NSE, a more recent establishment which came into existence in 1992, is the largest and 
most advanced stock market in India and is also one of the biggest stock exchanges in. 
Asia in terms of transactions. NSEs flagship index, NIFTY 50, is used extensively by 
investors in India and around the world to take exposure to the Indian equities market. 
BSE has a large number of scrips which are listed. The Indian stock market scene really 
picked up after the opening up of the economy in the early nineties. NSE changed the 
way the Indian markets function, in the early nineties, by replacing floor based trading 
with nationwide screen based electronic trading, which took trading to the doorstep of 
the investor. NSE was mainly set up to bring in transparency in the markets. Instead of 
trading membership being confined to a group of brokers, NSE ensured that anyone 
who was qualified, experienced and met minimum financial requirements was allowed 
to trade. The price information which could earlier be accessed only by a handful of 
people could now be seen by a client in a remote location with the same ease. The 
paper based settlement was replaced by electronic depository based accounts and 
settlement of trades was always done on time. One of the most critical changes was that 
a robust risk management system was set in place, so that settlement guarantees could 
protect investors against broker defaults. The corporate governance rules were gradually 
put in place which initiated the process of bringing the listed companies at a uniform. 
Movement of Nifty 50 Index since inception:*. 
Nifty 50 
*Source for the chart is https://www.nseindia.com and data is as on June 30, 2019. Data 
is of the Total Return Variant of the Index. 
POSITION OF DEBT MARKET IN INDIA. . 
Indian debt markets, in the early nineties, were characterised by controls on pricing of 
assets, segmentation of markets and barriers to entry, low levels of liquidity, limited 
number of players, near lack of transparency, and high transactions cost. Financial 
reforms have significantly changed the Indian debt markets for the better. Most debt 
instruments are now priced freely on the markets. trading mechanisms have been 
altered to provide for higher levels of transparency, higher liquidity, and lower 
transactions costs. new participants have entered the markets, broad basing the types of 
players in the markets. methods of security issuance, and innovation in the structure of 
instruments have taken place. and there has been a significant improvement in the 
dissemination of market information. There are three main segments in the debt markets 
in India, viz., Government Securities, Public Sector Units (PSU) bonds, and corporate 
securities. A bulk of the debt market consists of Government Securities. Other 
instruments available currently include Corporate Debentures, Bonds issued by Financial. 
Institutions, Commercial Paper, Certificates of Deposits and Securitized Debt. Securities 
in the Debt market typically vary based on their tenure and rating. Government. 
Securities have tenures from one year to thirty years whereas the maturity period of the. 
Corporate Debt now goes upto sixty years and more (perpetual). Perpetual bonds are 
now issued by banks as well. Securities may be both listed and unlisted and there is 
increasing trend of securities of maturities of over one year being listed by issuers. While 
in the corporate bond market, deals are conducted over telephone and are entered on 
principal-to-principal basis, due to the introduction of the Reserve Bank of Indias NDS-. 
Order Matching system a significant proportion of the government securities market is 
trading on the new system. 
The yields and liquidity on various securities as on June 30, 2019 are as under: 
F: FUNDAMENTAL ATTRIBUTES. . 
Following are the Fundamental Attributes of the Scheme, in terms of Regulation 18 (15A) 
of the SEBI (MF) Regulations: 
(A) Type of a Scheme. 
Kindly refer INFORMATION ABOUT THE SCHEME para. 
(B) (i) Investment Objective: Kindly refer INFORMATION ABOUT THE SCHEME para. 
(ii) Investment Pattern: Kindly refer to section on HOW WILL THE SCHEME. 
ALLOCATE ITS ASSETS?. . 
(iii) Terms of Issue. 
Kindly refer HIGHLIGHTS/SUMMARY OF THE SCHEME para. 
The Scheme is proposed to be listed and traded on BSE and NSE. However the. 
Trustee reserves the right to list the units of Scheme on any other Stock. 
Exchange without any change in the Fundamental Attribute. 
Aggregate fees and expenses charged to the Scheme: 
Kindly refer section on Fees and Expenses. 
Any safety net or guarantee provided: The present Scheme is not guaranteed or 
assured return scheme. 
Changes in Fundamental Attributes. 
In accordance with Regulation 18(15A) of the SEBI (MF) Regulations, the Trustees shall 
ensure that no change in the fundamental attributes of the Scheme(s) or the trust or fee 
and expenses payable or any other change which would modify the Scheme(s) and 
affect the interests of Unitholders is carried out unless: 
A written communication about the proposed change is sent to each Unitholder and 
an advertisement is given in one English daily newspaper having nationwide 
circulation as well as in a newspaper published in the language of the region where 
the Head Office of the AMC is situated. and. 
The Unitholders are given an option for a period of 30 days to exit at the prevailing. 
Net Asset Value without any exit load. 
G. HOW WILL THE SCHEME BENCHMARK ITS PERFORMANCE?. . 
The performance of the Scheme will be benchmarked against Nifty Bank Index. 
For more details on the benchmark, kindly refer Information on Nifty Bank Index. 
H. WHO MANAGES THE SCHEME?. . 
The investments under the Scheme will be managed by Mr. Kayzad Eghlim. His 
qualifications and experience are as under: 
Manager / Age /. 
~ IDFC Investment Advisors. 
Ltd    - Dealer Equities -. 
September 2006 to June 
1. December 2003 to August. 
Manager - June 2003 to. 
October 2003. 
~ Canbank Mutual Fund -. 
Equity Dealer - June 2000 to. 
June 2003. 
~ Canbank Mutual Fund : 
Assisting the Fund Manager - 
1994 to1997. 
~ Canbank Mutual Fund -. 
Department (IPO) - 1991 to. 
Fund. 
ICICI Prudential Equity : 
ICICI Prudential Nifty 100 ETF. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty Index. 
Fund. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty ETF. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty Low Vol 
30 ETF. . 
ICICI Prudential Nifty Next 50. 
Index Fund. 
ICICI Prudential Sensex Index. 
ICICI Prudential NV20 ETF. 
ICICI Prudential Sensex ETF. 
ICICI Prudential Midcap Select. 
ICICI Prudential S&P BSE 500. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty Next 50. 
ICICI Prudential Bharat 22 FOF. 
I. WHAT ARE THE INVESTMENT RESTRICTIONS?. . 
Pursuant to the Regulations and amendments thereto and subject to the investment 
pattern of the Scheme, following investment restrictions are presently applicable to the. 
Scheme: 
1) The Fund under all its schemes shall not own more than 10% of any companys 
paid up capital carrying voting rights. 
Provided, investment in the asset management company or the trustee company 
of a mutual fund shall be governed by clause (a), of sub-regulation (1), of 
regulation 7B 
2) Transfer of investments from one scheme to another scheme in the same Mutual. 
Fund is permitted provided: 
a. Such transfers are done at the prevailing market price for quoted instruments 
on spot basis (spot basis shall have the same meaning as specified by a Stock. 
Exchange for spot transactions). and 
b. The securities so transferred shall be in conformity with the investment 
objective of the scheme to which such transfer has been made. 
Further the inter scheme transfer of investments shall be in accordance with the 
provisions contained in clause Inter-Scheme transfer of investments, contained in. 
Statement of Additional Information. 
3) The Fund shall get the securities purchased transferred in the name of the Fund 
on account of the concerned scheme, wherever investments are intended to be 
of a long-term nature. 
4) The Fund shall buy and sell securities on the basis of deliveries and shall in all 
cases of purchases, take delivery of relative securities and in all cases of sale, 
deliver the securities and will not make any short sales or engage in carry forward 
transaction or badla finance. Provided that mutual funds shall enter into 
derivatives transactions in a recognised stock exchange for the purpose of 
hedging and portfolio balancing, in accordance with the Regulations. 
5) No loans for any purpose can be advanced by the Scheme. 
6) The Fund shall not borrow except to meet temporary liquidity needs of the Fund 
for the purpose of repurchase/ redemption of units or payment of interest and 
dividend to the Unitholders. Such borrowings shall not exceed more than 20% 
of the net assets of the individual scheme and the duration of the borrowing shall 
not exceed a period of 6 months. 
7) The Fund having an aggregate of securities which are worth Rs.10 crores or 
more, as on the latest balance sheet date, shall subject to such instructions as 
may be issued from time to time by the Board, settle their transactions entered 
on or after January 15, 1998 only through dematerialised securities. Further, all 
transactions in government securities shall be in dematerialised form. 
9) The Scheme may invest in other Schemes under the same AMC or any other. 
Mutual Fund without charging any fees, provided the aggregate inter-Scheme 
investment made by all the Schemes under the same management or in. 
Schemes under management of any other asset management company shall not 
exceed 5% of the Net Asset Value of the Fund. No investment management fees 
shall be charged for investing in other Schemes of the Fund or in the Schemes of 
any other mutual fund. 
10) The Scheme will comply with provisions specified in Circular dated August 18, 
2010 related to overall exposure limits applicable for derivative transactions as 
stated below: 
a. The cumulative gross exposure through equity, debt and derivative positions 
should not exceed 100% of the net assets of the scheme. 
b. Mutual Funds shall not write options or purchase instruments with embedded 
written options. 
c. The total exposure related to option premium paid must not exceed 20% of 
the net assets of the scheme. 
d. Cash or cash equivalents with residual maturity of less than 91 days may be 
treated as not creating any exposure. 
e. Exposure due to hedging positions may not be included in the above 
mentioned limits subject to the following: 
i.   Hedging positions are the derivative positions that reduce possible 
losses on an existing position in securities and till the existing 
position remains. 
ii.   Hedging positions cannot be taken for existing derivative positions. 
Exposure due to such positions shall have to be added and treated 
under limits mentioned in Point 1. 
iii.   Any derivative instrument used to hedge has the same underlying 
security as the existing position being hedged. 
iv.    The quantity of underlying associated with the derivative position 
taken for hedging purpose does not exceed the quantity of the 
existing position against which hedge has been taken. 
f. Exposure due to derivative positions taken for hedging purposes in excess of 
the underlying position against which the hedging position has been taken, 
shall be treated under the limits mentioned in point (i) above. 
g. Definition of Exposure in case of Derivative Positions - Each position taken in 
derivatives shall have an associated exposure as defined under. Exposure is 
the maximum possible loss that may occur on a position. However, certain 
derivative positions may theoretically have unlimited possible loss. Exposure 
in derivative positions shall be computed as follows: 
All investment restrictions shall be applicable at the time of making investment. 
J. HOW HAS THE SCHEME PERFORMED?. . 
This Scheme is a new scheme and does not have any performance track record. 
K. ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES. . 
i. SCHEME PORTFOLIO HOLDINGS 
a. Top 10 holdings: Not Available 
b. Sector wise holdings: Not Available. 
Since the Scheme is a new Scheme, Portfolio Holdings and Sector wise holdings are 
not available. 
ii. PORTFOLIO TURNOVER RATIO. 
Since the Scheme is a new Scheme, Portfolio Turnover ratio is not available. 
iii. INVESTMENT DETAILS: The aggregate investment in the Scheme under the following 
categories: 
a. AMCs Board of Directors 
b. Schemes Fund Manager(s) and 
c. Other key managerial personnel. 
Since the Scheme is a new Scheme, the above Investment Details are not available. 
L. HOW IS THE SCHEME IS DIFFERENT FROM OTHER SCHEMES. . 
In the category of ETF, ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund (the Mutual Fund) offers eleven (11) 
schemes, out of which ten (10) schemes are Index ETF and one is Gold Exchange. 
Traded Fund (a commodity ETF). Index ETF tracks specific Index of the exchange. In the 
nature of open ended Index ETF, the Fund offers the below schemes which track 
different Index as given below: 
The details of other existing Exchange Traded Fund of the Mutual Fund are provided below. 
ICICI Prudential Midcap. 
SENSEX.     residual 
maturity 
The Scheme can take 
exposure upto 20% of 
net assets in stock. 
correspond to the total 
returns of the securities 
as represented by the. 
performance of Scheme 
may differ from that of 
the underlying index due 
to tracking error. There 
can be no assurance or 
investment objective of 
the Scheme will be. 
Management 
(as on June. 
as on June. 
ICICI Prudential Gold ETFICICI Prudential Midcap. 
Select ETF. 
by SEBI 
exposure allowed to the 
debt instruments as per 
above asset allocation. 
gold due to tracking error. 
assurance or guarantee 
objective of the Scheme 
will be achieved. 
The fund is not actively 
managed. It does not 
engage in any activities 
designed to obtain a 
ameliorate losses caused 
by, changes in the price 
of gold. 
tracking Nifty 50 Index. 
Index)           maturity 
upto 91 
The Scheme can take 
exposure upto 20% of 
net assets in stock. 
is to provide returns 
before expenses that 
closely correspond to 
the total return of the. 
errors. However, there 
can be no assurance or 
investment objective of 
the Scheme would be. 
Managemen 
t (as on June. 
as on June. 
tracking Nifty 100 Low. 
Volitility 30 Index. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty 100. 
An open ended exchange 
traded fund tracking Nifty 
100 Index. 
Securities Money Market 
of          Instruments 
companie having 
s           residual 
ng Nifty 91 days 
100 Index. 
Underlyin 
g Index). 
The Scheme can take The Scheme can take 
exposure upto 20% of net exposure upto 20% of net 
assets in stock lending. assets in stock lending. 
The investment objective 
of the Scheme is to 
provide returns before 
expenses that closely 
correspond to the total 
return of the Underlying. 
Index, subject to tracking 
errors. However, there can 
be no assurance or 
investment objective of 
the Scheme would be. 
Rs. 5.13 crore. 
An open ended exchange 
traded fund investing in. 
S&P BSE Bharat 22 Index 
of            Liquid/Money 
s             Mutual Fund. 
ICICI Prudential NV20 ETF. 
An open ended exchange 
traded fund tracking Nifty 
50 Value 20 Index. 
s       of Money Market 
compani Instruments 
es         with maturity 
constituti of upto 91 
ng     the days only. 
Underlyi 
ng Index. 
Value 20. 
The investment objective 
of the scheme is to 
provide returns before 
correspond to the total 
return of the Underlying. 
Index subject to tracking. 
However, there can be no 
assurance or guarantee 
objective of the Scheme 
would be achieved. 
Rs. 5.78 crore. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty Next 
50 ETF. . 
An open ended exchange 
traded fund replicating / 
tracking NIFTY Next 50. 
Equity Units of Liquid 
and      schemes, Money. 
Equity Market. 
Features of 
the Scheme. 
Assets 
Managemen 
t (as on June. 
No. of folios 
as on June. 
Type of Scheme. 
ETF                         ETF. . 
Scheme may differ from 
that of underlying index 
due to tracking error. 
assurance or guarantee 
objective of the Scheme 
would be achieved. 
An open ended exchange traded fund An open ended exchange traded 
tracking / replicating S&P BSE 500 Index fund tracking S&P BSE Liquid. 
Rate Index. 
constituting the Market Instruments 
underlying Index (with maturity not 
(S&P BSE 500 exceeding 91 days), 
The Scheme may also take exposure to: 
Derivative instruments up to 5% of 
the Net Assets. Investment in 
accordance with the SEBI Circular No. 
Cir/ IMD/ DF/ 11/ 2010 dated August 
18, 2010 and such other guidelines on 
derivatives as issued by SEBI from 
time to time. 
Stock lending up to 20% of its Net. 
that closely correspond to the total 
return of the underlying index subject to 
tracking errors. However, there can be 
no assurance or guarantee that the 
investment objective of the Scheme 
would be achieved. 
Management (as 
on June 30, 2019. 
Type of Scheme An open ended exchange traded fund tracking Nifty Bank Index. 
Asset Allocation Equity and Equity related securities Units of Liquid schemes, Money 
as per SID (in %) of companies constituting the Market Instruments (with maturity not. 
TREPS , cash & cash equivalents. 
Or similar instruments as may be permitted by SEBI/RBI from time to time. 
The Scheme may also take exposure to: 
Derivative instruments on underlying index (stock/ index futures) up to. 
schemes, Money. 
Instruments 
not exceeding 91 
days), cash & 
cash equivalents. 
dated January 19, 2009, the. 
Scheme shall make investments 
in / purchase debt and money 
market securities with maturity of 
up to 91 days only. 
The Cumulative Gross Exposure 
will not exceed 100% of the Net. 
Assets of the Scheme. 
The investment objective of the. 
Scheme is to invest in TREPS. 
The Scheme aims to provide 
returns before expenses that 
closely correspond to the returns 
of S&P BSE Liquid Rate Index, 
subject to tracking errors. 
However, there can be no 
assurance or guarantee that the 
investment objective of the. 
Scheme would be achieved. 
Rs. 88.62 crore. 
Features of the. 
Management (as. 
ICICI Prudential Bank ETF 
5% of the Net Assets. Investment in derivatives shall be made in 
accordance with the SEBI Circular No. Cir/ IMD/ DF/ 11/ 2010 dated. 
August 18, 2010 and such other guidelines on derivatives as issued by. 
SEBI from time to time. 
Stock lending up to 20% of its Net Assets. 
The cumulative gross exposure across various asset classes should not 
exceed 100% of the net assets of the scheme. 
The investment objective of the scheme is to provide returns before 
expenses that closely correspond to the total return of the underlying index 
subject to tracking errors. However, there can be no assurance or guarantee 
that the investment objective of the Scheme would be achieved. 
III. UNITS AND OFFER. . 
This section provides details you need to know for investing in the Scheme. 
A. NEW FUND OFFER DETAILS. . 
B. ONGOING OFFER DETAILS. . 
Ongoing Offer Period 
(This is the date from which 
the scheme will reopen for. 
Subscription / Redemption 
after the closure of the NFO. 
subscription/redemption by 
investors. 
This is the price you need to 
pay for purchase /. 
This is the price you will 
receive for redemptions. 
The units of the Scheme are listed on the BSE and. 
NSE. All investors, including Authorised Participant(s) 
may sell their units in the stock exchange(s) on which 
these units are listed on all the Trading Days of the 
stock exchanges. The Fund will repurchase units from. 
Authorised Participant(s) and Investors on any. 
Business Day provided the value of units offered for 
repurchase is not less than Creation Unit Size. The 
redemption consideration shall normally be the basket 
of securities represented by the Underlying Index in 
the same weightage as in the Index or the equivalent 
value of basket in cash and the Cash Component. 
The AMC will not extend credit facility to the. 
participants or investors will get the NAV as and when 
they bring the Portfolio Deposit/ equivalent amount of 
cash and Cash Component. 
Investors, other than Authorised Participants, can sell 
units in less than Creation Unit Size of the Scheme 
directly to the Fund, without any exit load in the certain 
cases. Please refer to the section Load Structure for 
more information. 
The Authorized Participant(s)/ Investor(s) can 
subscribe/redeem the units of the Scheme directly 
with the Fund only in creation unit size and in multiples 
thereof. The subscription & redemption of units would 
be based on the portfolio deposit & cash component 
as defined by the Fund for the respective business 
day. The Fund may allow cash purchases/cash 
redemption of the units of the Scheme in Creation Unit. 
Size by Investor(s)/Authorized Participant(s). 
Purchase/redemption request shall be made by such 
investors to the Fund whereupon the Fund shall 
arrange to buy/sell the underlying portfolio of 
securities on behalf of the investor. In case of shares 
bought and sold by the AMC on behalf of the investor, 
entire proceeds of portfolio deposit and other cost and 
charges related to the purchase and sale of basket of 
underlying securities for servicing the subscription or 
redemption transaction would be borne by the. 
The units would be initially listed on the BSE & NSE to 
provide liquidity through secondary market. It may 
also list on any other exchanges subsequently. All 
categories of Investors may purchase the units 
through secondary market on any trading day. The. 
AMC will appoint Authorized Participant(s) to provide 
liquidity in secondary market on an ongoing basis. The. 
Authorized Participant(s) envisage to offer daily two- 
way quote on exchange. 
The AMC will not extend credit facility to the. 
participants or investors will get the NAV as and when 
they bring the Portfolio Deposit/ equivalent amount of 
cash and Cash Component. 
There is no exit load currently. However transaction 
charges payable to Custodian/ Depository Participants, 
and other incidental charges relating to conversion of 
units into basket of securities may be deducted from 
redemption proceeds. The charges will be notified on 
www.icicipruamc.com from time to time. Investors 
other than Authorized Participant may redeem units at 
the market price plus transaction handling charges on 
stock exchange. 
The Fund shall ensure that the Redemption Price is not 
lower than 93% of the NAV and the Purchase Price is 
not higher than 107% of the NAV, provided that the 
difference between the Redemption Price and. 
Purchase Price of the Units shall not exceed the 
permissible limit of 7% of the Purchase Price, as 
provided for under the Regulations. 
For more details on Loads refer section on Load. 
Payment of Proceeds. 
All redemption requests received prior to the cut-off 
time on any Business Day at the Official Points of. 
Acceptance of Transactions will be considered 
accepted on that Business Day, subject to the 
redemption requests being complete in all respects, 
and will be priced on the basis of Redemption Price for 
that day. Requests received after the cut-off time will 
be treated as though they were accepted on the next. 
Business Day. 
As per the Regulations, the Fund shall dispatch 
redemption proceeds within 10 Business Days 
(working days) of receiving the redemption request. 
Trustees reserve the right to alter or modify the 
number of days taken for redemption of Units under 
the Fund after taking into consideration the actual 
settlement cycle, when announced, as also the 
changes in the settlement cycles that may be 
announced by the Principal Stock Exchanges from 
time to time. 
As per the Regulations, in the event of failure to 
dispatch the redemption or repurchase proceeds 
within 10 working days, the AMC is liable to pay 
interest to the Unit holders @ 15% p.a. SEBI has 
further advised the Funds that in the event of payment 
of interest to the Unit holders, such Unit holders 
should be informed about the rate and the amount of 
interest paid to them. 
credit/ECS/cheque or any other mode as may be 
decided by AMC in the interest of investors. 
subscriptions/ redemptions/ mentioned Cut-off time are not applicable to 
transactions undertaken on a recognised Stock. 
This is the time before which Exchange and are only applicable to transactions 
your application (complete undertaken at the Official Points of Acceptance. 
in all respects) should reach 
acceptance.                    and the units of the Scheme are listed on the stock 
exchanges, in the interest of the investors/ unitholders, 
the operational processes of the Schemes with respect 
to all the provisions of Uniform cut-off timings for 
applicability of Net Asset Value (NAV) issued by SEBI 
from time to time shall stand modified. 
The Fund may allow subscription/ redemption in. 
Creation Unit Size and in multiples thereof by 
investor(s)/ authorised participant(s) based on the. 
Portfolio Deposit/ equivalent amount of cash and Cash. 
Component as defined by the Fund for that respective. 
Business Day. 
The Cut-off time for receipt of valid application for 
subscriptions/ redemptions/ is 3.00 p.m. on any 
business day. 
Switch into the Scheme. 
Other 
requirements/processes. 
Special Products / facilities Not Available 
Where can the applications Duly completed Application Form(s) / Transaction 
for purchase/redemption be Form(s) (along with the instrument for payment, as 
submitted?. 
Purchase/Redemption. 
Not Applicable. 
Transactions without Scheme Name. 
In case of fresh/additional purchases, if the name of a 
particular Scheme on the application form/transaction 
slip differs from the name on the Cheque/Demand. 
Draft, then ICICI Prudential Asset Management. 
Company Limited (the AMC) will process the 
application and allot units at the applicable Net Asset. 
Value, under the Scheme which is mentioned on the 
application form/transaction slip duly signed by the 
investor(s). The AMC reserves the right to call for 
other additional documents as may be required, for 
processing such transactions. The AMC also reserves 
the right to reject such transactions. 
The AMC thereafter shall not be responsible for any 
loss suffered by the investor due to the discrepancy of 
a Scheme name mentioned in the application 
form/transaction slip and Cheque/Demand Draft. 
applicable) for the Purchase / Redemption of Units of 
the Scheme in Creation Unit Size during the Ongoing. 
Offer Period may be submitted to any of the Official. 
Points of Acceptance as notified by the AMC. For 
details, please refer back cover of this SID. 
The AMC has the right to designate additional centers 
as the Official Points of Acceptance during the. 
Ongoing Offer Period and change such centers, if it 
deems fit. 
An investor can buy/ sell units on a continuous basis 
in the normal market segment of BSE/National Stock. 
Exchange of India Limited, or any other stock 
exchange where the Scheme is listed, during the 
trading hours like any other publicly traded stock at 
prices which are quoted on the stock exchanges. 
These prices may be close to the actual NAV of the. 
Scheme. There is no minimum investment, although 
units are to be purchased in lots of 1 (one) unit. 
for On Stock Exchange(s): Investor can buy / sell units of 
the Scheme in round lot of 1 unit and in multiples. 
Participant(s)/Investor(s) can buy/sell units of the. 
Scheme in Creation Unit Size viz. 10,000 units and in 
multiples thereof. 
An investor can buy/ sell units on a continuous basis in 
the normal market segment of BSE Limited/National. 
Stock Exchange of India Limited (NSE) or any other 
stock exchange where the Scheme is listed, during the 
trading hours like any other publicly traded stock at 
prices which are quoted on the stock exchanges. 
These prices may be close to the actual NAV of the. 
Scheme. There is no minimum investment, although 
units are to be purchased in lots of 1 (one) unit. 
settled in dematerialized (electronic) form, the 
statement of holding of the beneficiary account holder 
will be sent by the respective Depository Participant. 
unitholders within 30 days of the date of declaration of 
the dividend. 
In the event of failure to dispatch dividend within 30 
days, the AMC shall be liable to pay interest at 15% 
per annum to the unit holders. 
The treatment of unclaimed redemption & dividend 
amount will be as per SEBI circular dated Feb 25, 2016. 
Plans/options under the Currently, there are no plans/ options under the. 
Units of the Scheme may also be listed on such other 
stock exchange(s) as may be decided from time to 
time. The trading will be as per the normal settlement. 
Investment by Sponsors/ The sponsors or AMC will invest not less than one. 
AMC                       percent of the amount which would be raised in the 
new fund offer or fifty lakh rupees, whichever is less, in 
the growth option of the Scheme and such investment 
will not be redeemed unless the Scheme is wound up. 
Application form for instructions. 
dispatched to the Unit holders within 10 Working Days 
from the date of Redemption or repurchase. 
Settlement of Purchase / Buying / Selling units of the Scheme on the stock. 
Sale on stock exchange(s) exchange is similar to buying / selling of any other 
listed securities. If an investor has bought units, the 
investor has to pay the purchase amount to the broker 
/ sub-broker such that the amount paid is realized 
before funds pay-in day of the settlement cycle on the 
exchange. If an investor has sold units, the investor 
has to deliver the units to the broker/ sub-broker 
before the securities pay-in day of the settlement cycle 
on the exchange. The units (in case of units bought) 
and the funds (in the case of units sold) are paid out to 
the broker on the payout day of the settlement cycle 
on the exchange. The trading member would pay the 
money or units to the investor in accordance with the. 
Rolling Settlement 
time prescribed by the stock exchange regulation. If an 
investor has bought units, he/she should give standing 
instructions for Delivery-In to his/her DP for accepting 
units in his/her beneficiary account. An investor should 
give the details of his/her beneficiary account and the. 
DP-ID of his/her DP to his/her trading member. The 
trading member will transfer the units directly to 
his/her beneficiary account on receipt of the same 
from exchanges clearing corporation. 
An investor who has sold units should instruct his/her. 
Depository Participant (DP) to give Delivery Out 
instructions to transfer the units from his/her 
beneficiary account to the Pool Account of his/her 
trading member through whom he/she has sold the 
units. The details of the Pool Account of investors 
trading member to which the units are to be 
transferred, unit quantity, etc. should be mentioned in 
the delivery out instructions given by him/her to the. 
DP. The instructions should be given well before the 
prescribed securities pay-in day. The exchange 
regulations stipulate that the trading member should 
pay the money or units to the investor within 24 hours 
of the payout. 
All investors including Authorized Participants, may 
sell their units in the stock exchange(s) on which these 
units are listed on all the Trading Days of the stock 
exchange. The Fund will repurchase units from. 
Authorised Participant(s)/Investor(s) on any Business. 
Day provided the units offered for repurchase is not 
less than the Creation Unit Size and multiples. 
The Fund intends to follow the settlement pattern and 
practices of BSE and NSE as per the trade/s executed 
on the respective exchange. 
Rolling Settlement. 
As per the SEBIs circular dated March 4, 2003, the 
rolling settlement on T+2 basis for all trades has 
commenced from April 1, 2003 onwards. The Pay-in 
and Pay-out of funds and the units will take place 2 
working days after the trading date. 
The pay-in and pay-out days for funds and securities 
are prescribed as per the Settlement Cycle. A typical. 
Settlement Cycle of Rolling Settlement is given below: 
Day Activity. 
Day     Activity. 
T       The day on which the transaction is 
executed by a trading member. 
T+1     Confirmation of all trades including. 
Procedure for Purchasing in Creation of Units. 
Creation Unit Size 
custodial trades by 11.00 a.m. 
T+1     Processing and downloading of obligation 
files to brokers /custodians by 1.30 p.m. 
T+2     Pay-in of funds and securities by 11.00 a.m. 
T+2     Pay out of funds and securities by 1.30 p.m. 
While calculating the days from the Trading Day (Day. 
T., weekend days (i.e. Saturday and Sundays) and. 
Bank holidays are not taken into consideration. 
All investors including Authorized Participants, may 
sell their units, in the stock exchange(s) on which 
these units are listed on all the trading days of the 
stock exchange. Mutual fund will repurchase units 
from Authorized Participants on any business day 
provided the units offered for repurchase is not less 
than the creation unit size and multiples thereafter. 
of The Authorised Participant(s)/Investor(s) can directly. 
The Fund creates/ redeems units of the Scheme in 
large blocks known as Creation Unit. The value of the. 
Creation Unit is the basket of the Underlying Index 
securities called as the Portfolio Deposit and a Cash. 
Component which will be exchanged for a fixed 
number of units of the Scheme. The Portfolio Deposit 
and the Cash Component, which defines the Creation. 
Unit are defined separately. The Portfolio Deposit and. 
Cash Component may change from time to time and 
will be announced by AMC/Fund through its website 
and other data providers. 
Note: Units of the Scheme if less than Creation Unit 
cannot be purchased/ redeemed directly with the Fund 
except for certain circumstances as listed in this 
document. In case of redemptions by NRIs, requisite. 
TDS will be deducted from the respective redemption 
The requisite securities constituting the Portfolio. 
Deposit have to be transferred to the DP account of 
the respective Scheme on the day of receipt of the 
application, while the Cash Component, as applicable 
on that business day. has to be paid to the Fund. On 
confirmation of the receipt of Portfolio Deposit/ 
equivalent amount of cash by the Custodian/ AMC, the. 
AMC will credit the equivalent number of units of the. 
Scheme into the investors DP account. 
In case of cash subscription of units of the Schemes in. 
Creation Unit Size, the purchase request for creation 
of units shall be made by such investor to the. 
Fund/AMC where upon the Fund/AMC will arrange to. 
Procedure for Redeeming in Redemption of Units : 
Creation Unit Size 
buy the underlying portfolio of securities on behalf of 
the investor. In case of shares bought by the AMC on 
behalf of the investor, entire proceeds of portfolio 
deposit and other cost and charges related to the 
purchase of basket of underlying securities for 
servicing the subscription transaction would be borne 
by the investor. 
The Portfolio Deposit and Cash Component for units of 
the Scheme may change from time to time due to 
changes in the Underlying Index on account of 
corporate actions and changes to the index. 
The creation request can be made to the AMC/ Fund in 
a duly filled application form. Application Forms for. 
Creation of units can be obtained from any of the. 
Official Points of Acceptance as notified by the AMC. 
For details, refer back cover of the SID. 
The AMC will not extend credit facility to the. 
participants or investors will get the NAV as and when 
they bring the Portfolio Deposit/ equivalent amount of 
cash and Cash Component. 
The requisite number of units of the Scheme 
equivalent to the Creation Unit lot size has to be 
transferred to the DP account of the respective. 
Scheme, while the Cash Component, as applicable on 
that business day to be paid to the Scheme. On 
confirmation of the receipt of unit of the Schemes by 
the Custodian/ AMC, the AMC shall extinguish the 
units and credit the Portfolio Deposit to the investors. 
DP account and pay the Cash Component, as. 
The Fund may allow cash redemption of the units of 
the Scheme in Creation Unit Size. Redemption request 
shall be made by such investor to the Fund before the 
stipulated cut-off time whereupon the Fund shall 
arrange to sell the underlying portfolio of securities on 
behalf of the investor. In case of shares sold by the. 
AMC on behalf of the investor, entire proceeds of 
portfolio deposit and other cost and charges related to 
the sale of basket of underlying securities for servicing 
the redemption transaction would be borne by the 
investor. Payment will then be made to the Investor 
net of all the above mentioned charges. 
The Portfolio Deposit and Cash Component for the 
units of the Scheme may change from time to time 
due to changes in the Underlying Index on account of. 
Transaction Charges 
corporate actions and changes to the index. 
Unit holders to note that the Trustee may declare. 
Dividend from time to time in accordance with the. 
Dividend Policy set out below. 
Dividend Policy: The Trustee may declare Dividend to 
the Unit holders under the Scheme subject to the 
availability of distributable surplus and the actual 
distribution of Dividends and the frequency of 
distribution will be entirely at the discretion of the. 
Trustee. Such Dividend will be payable to the Unit 
holders whose names appear on the register of Unit 
holders on the record date as fixed for the respective. 
Schemes. The Dividend declared will be paid net of 
tax deducted at source, wherever applicable, to the. 
Unit holders within 30 days from the declaration of 
the Dividend. There is no assurance or guarantee to 
the Unit holders as to the rate of Dividend distribution 
nor that will the Dividend be paid regularly. If the Fund 
declares Dividend, the NAV of the respective. 
Schemes will stand reduced by the amount of. 
Dividend and Dividend distribution tax (if applicable) 
paid. All the Dividend payments shall be in 
accordance and compliance with SEBI Regulations, as 
applicable from time to time. 
1. Units of the Scheme will be available only in the. 
Dematerialized form. 
2. The applicant under the Scheme will be required to 
have a beneficiary account with a Depository. 
Participant of NSDL/CDSL and will be required to 
indicate in the application the DPs name, DP ID. 
Number and its beneficiary account number with 
3. The units of the Scheme are to be held, issued/ 
dematerialized form. 
4. Application forms without relevant depository 
details or inactive status of their depository 
account are liable to be rejected. 
Currently, the AMC is not accepting cash investments. 
Notice shall be provided in this regard as and when 
the facility is made available. 
Pursuant to SEBI Circular No. Cir/ IMD/ DF/13/ 2011 
dated August 22, 2011 the transaction charge per 
subscription of Rs.10,000/- and above may be charged 
in the following manner: 
i. The existing investors may be charged Rs. 100/- as 
transaction charge per subscription of Rs.10,000/- and 
above. 
Transfer 
transaction charge per subscription of Rs.10,000/- and. 
There shall be no transaction charge on subscription 
below Rs. 10,000/- and on transactions other than 
purchases/ subscriptions relating to new inflows. 
However, the option to charge transaction charges is 
at the discretion of the distributors. Investors may note 
that distributors can opt to receive transaction charges 
based on type of the Scheme. Accordingly, the 
transaction charges would be deducted from the 
subscription amounts, as applicable. 
Transaction charges shall also be deducted on 
purchases/subscriptions received through non-demat 
mode from the investors investing through a valid. 
ARN holder i.e. AMFI Registered Distributor (provided 
the distributor has opted-in to receive the transaction 
charges) in respect of transactions routed through. 
Stock Exchange(s) platform viz. NSE Mutual Fund. 
Platform (NMF-II) and BSE Mutual Fund Platform 
(BSE STAR MF). . 
The aforesaid transaction charge shall be deducted by 
the Asset Management Company from the 
subscription amount and paid to the distributor, as the 
case may be and the balance amount shall be invested 
subject to deduction of Goods and Services Tax. 
However, upfront commission to distributors will be 
paid by the investor directly to the distributor, based 
on his assessment of various factors including the 
service rendered by such distributor. 
Transaction Charges shall not be deducted if: 
Purchase/Subscription made directly with the fund 
through any mode (i.e. not through any 
distributor/agent). 
Purchase/ subscription made in demat mode 
through stock Exchanges, irrespective of investment 
CAS/ Statement of account shall state the net 
investment (i.e. gross subscription less transaction 
charge) and the number of units allotted against the 
net investment. 
Transfer of units is permissible as per following 
provisions: 
1. Units of the Scheme are transferable. 
2. Transfer would be only in favor of transferees who 
are capable of holding units. The Fund shall not be 
bound to recognize any other transfer. 
This is an indicative list and 
you are requested to consult 
your financial advisor to 
scheme is suitable to your 
risk profile. 
3. The Fund will affect transfer only in electronic form 
provided the intended transferee is otherwise 
eligible to hold the units under the Scheme. 
4. The delivery instructions for transfer of units will 
have to be lodged with the DP in the requisite form 
as may be required from time to time and transfer 
will be effected in accordance with such 
rules/regulations as may be in force governing 
transfer of securities in dematerialized mode. 
The Units can be pledged by the Unitholders as 
security for raising loans subject to the conditions of 
the lending institution and the terms and conditions 
laid down by the Depositories. The Registrar will take 
note of such pledge / charge in its records on. 
As per the directives issued by SEBI, it is mandatory 
for applicants to mention their bank account numbers 
in their applications for purchase or redemption of. 
Units. If the Unit-holder fails to provide the Bank 
mandate, the request for redemption would be 
considered as not valid and the Scheme retains the 
right to withhold the redemption until a proper bank 
mandate is furnished by the Unit-holder and the 
provision with respect of penal interest in such cases 
will not be applicable/ entertained. 
For provisions related to Bank Account Details, 
investors are requested to refer Statement of. 
Additional Information. 
The following persons are eligible and may apply for 
subscription to the Units of the Scheme (subject, 
wherever relevant, to purchase of units of Mutual. 
Funds being permitted under respective constitutions 
and relevant statutory regulations): 
Resident adult individual either singly or jointly(not 
exceeding Four). 
Minor through parent/lawful guardian. 
Companies, Bodies Corporate, Public Sector. 
Undertakings, association of persons or bodies of 
individuals and societies registered under the. 
Societies Registration Act, 1860 (so long as the 
purchase of units is permitted under the respective. 
Religious and Charitable Trusts under the provisions 
of 11(5)(xii) of Income-tax Act, 1961 read with Rule 
17C of Income-Tax Rules, 1962 subject to the 
provisions of the respective constitutions under 
which they are established permits to invest. 
Partnership Firms. 
Karta of Hindu Undivided Family (HUF). 
Banks & Financial Institutions. 
Non-resident Indians/Persons of Indian origin 
residing abroad (NRIs) on full repatriation basis or. 
purchases/ switches in any. 
Schemes of ICICI Prudential. 
Mutual Fund 
on non-repatriation basis. 
Army, Air Force, Navy and other para-military funds. 
Scientific and Industrial Research Organizations. 
Mutual fund schemes, as may be permitted by SEBI 
from time to time. 
Foreign Portfolio Investor (FPI) subject to the 
applicable regulations. 
Any other category of investor who may be notified 
by Trustees from time to time by display on the 
website of the AMC. 
The following persons are not eligible to invest in the. 
Scheme and apply for subscription to the units of the. 
Scheme: 
A person who falls within the definition of the term. 
U.S. Person under Regulation S promulgated 
under the Securities Act of 1933 of the United. 
States, as amended, and corporations or other 
entities organised under the laws of the U.S. are 
not eligible to invest in the schemes and apply for 
subscription to the units of the schemes, except for 
lump sum subscription, systematic transactions 
and switch transactions requests received from. 
Non-resident Indians/Persons of Indian origin who 
at the time of such investment, are present in India 
and submit a physical transaction request along 
with such documents as may be prescribed by. 
ICICI Prudential Asset Management Company. 
Limited (the AMC)/ICICI Prudential Trust Limited 
(the Trustee) from time to time. 
The AMC shall accept such investments subject to 
the applicable laws and such other terms and 
conditions as may be notified by the AMC/the. 
Trustee. The investor shall be responsible for 
complying with all the applicable laws for such. 
The AMC reserves the right to put the transaction 
request/reverse allotted units, as the case may be, 
as and when identified by the AMC, which are not 
in compliance with the terms and conditions 
notified in this regard. 
A person who is resident of Canada. 
Such other individuals/institutions/body corporate 
etc., as may be decided by the AMC from time to. 
A person who falls within the definition of the term. 
U.S. Person as defined in Regulation S 
promulagated under the Securities Act of 1933, as 
amended, and corporations or other entities organised 
under the laws of the U.S. are not eligible to invest in 
the schemes and apply for subscription to the units of 
the schemes, except for lump sum subscription,. 
Third party Cheques 
systematic transactions and switch transactions 
requests received from Non-resident Indians/Persons 
of Indian origin who at the time of such investment, 
are present in India and submit a physical transaction 
request along with such documents as may be 
prescribed by ICICI Prudential Asset Management. 
Company Limited (the AMC)/ICICI Prudential Trust. 
Limited (the Trustee) from time to time. 
The AMC shall accept such investments subject to the 
applicable laws and such other terms and conditions 
as may be notified by the AMC/the Trustee. The 
investor shall be responsible for complying with all the 
applicable laws for such investments. 
The AMC reserves the right to put the transaction 
requests on hold/reject the transaction request/reverse 
allotted units, as the case may be, as and when 
identified by the AMC, which are not in compliance 
with the terms and conditions notified in this regard. 
Investment/subscription made through third party 
cheque(s) will not be accepted for investments in the 
units of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund. 
Third party cheque(s) for this purpose are defined as: 
i. Investment made through instruments issued from 
an account other than that of the beneficiary 
investor, 
ii) in case the investment is made from a joint bank 
account, the first holder of the mutual fund folio is 
not one of the joint holders of the bank account 
from which payment is made. Third party cheque(s) 
for investment/subscription shall be accepted, only 
in exceptional circumstances, as detailed below: 
1. Payment by Parents/Grand-Parents/related persons 
on behalf of a minor in consideration of natural love 
and affection or as gift. However, this restriction 
will not be applicable for payment made by a 
guardian whose name is registered in the records 
of Mutual Fund in that folio. 
2. Payment by Employer on behalf of employee under. 
Systematic Investment Plans or lump sum/one-time 
subscription through Payroll deductions or 
deductions out of expense reimbursements. 
3. Custodian on behalf of a Foreign Institutional. 
Investor (FII) or a client. 
4. Payment made by the AMC to a Distributor 
empanelled with it on account of commission, 
incentive, etc. in the form of the Mutual Fund units 
of the Schemes managed by such AMC through. 
SIP or lump sum/one time subscription, subject to 
compliance with SEBI Regulations and Guidelines 
issued by AMFI, from time to time. 
redemption / 
repurchase 
proceeds/Refund. 
Updation of Email address Investors are requested to update their own email 
and mobile number. 
Seeding of Aadhaar number Investors are advised to refer to Statement of 
5. Payment made by a Corporate to its. 
Agent/Distributor/Dealer (similar arrangement with. 
Principal-agent relationship) account of commission 
or incentive payable for sale of its goods/services, 
in the form of Mutual Fund units of the Schemes 
managed by such AMC through SIP or lump 
sum/one time subscription, subject to compliance 
with SEBI Regulations and Guidelines issued by. 
AMFI, from time to time. 
6. Payment by registered Stock brokers of recognized 
stock exchanges for their clients having demat. 
The above mentioned exception cases will be 
processed after carrying out necessary checks and 
verification of documents attached along with the 
purchase transaction slip/application form, as stated 
below: 
1. Determining the identity of the Investor and the 
person making payment i.e. mandatory now Your. 
Client (KYC) for Investor and the person making the 
2. Obtaining necessary declaration from the. 
Investor/unitholder and the person making the 
payment. Declaration by the person making the 
payment should give details of the bank account 
from which the payment is made and the 
relationship with the beneficiary. 
3. Verifying the source of funds to ensure that funds 
have come from the drawers account only. 
Please visit www.icicipruamc.com for further details. 
The unit holder/ investor can register multiple bank 
account details under its existing folio by submitting 
separate form available on the website of the AMC at 
www.icicipruamc.com. 
Individuals/HuF can register upto 5 different bank 
accounts for a folio, whereas non-individuals can 
register upto 10 different bank accounts for a folio. 
all investors for making investments in Mutual Funds, 
for more information refer SAI. 
of The Asset Management Company shall be liable to pay 
interest to the unitholders at such rate as may be 
specified by SEBI for the period of such delay 
(presently @ 15% per annum). 
address and mobile number for speed and ease of 
communication in a convenient and cost-effective 
manner, and to help prevent fraudulent transactions. 
Additional Information (SAI) available on website of 
the AMC i.e. www.icicipruamc.com. 
C. PERIODIC DISCLOSURES. . 
Net Asset Value 
scheme on a particular day. 
You can ascertain the value of 
multiplying the NAV with your 
unit balance. 
Portfolio. 
The NAV will be calculated and disclosed at the close 
of every Business Day. The AMC shall prominently 
head on the AMCs website and on the website of. 
AMFI. NAV will be determined on every Business Day 
shall be made available at all Customer Service. 
Centers of the AMC. 
AMC shall update the NAVs on the website of. 
Association of Mutual Funds in India - AMFI 
(www.amfiindia.com) and on the mutual fund website 
: (www.icicipruamc.com) by 9:00 p.m. every Business. 
Day. In case of any delay, the reasons for such delay 
would be explained to AMFI and SEBI by the next day. 
If the NAVs are not available before commencement of 
business hours on the following day due to any 
reason, the Fund shall issue a press release providing 
reasons and explaining when the Fund would be able 
to publish the NAVs. 
In addition to above, the indicative NAV will be 
updated on AMCs website during market hours, on 
regular 1 minute interval basis. 
with ISIN) as on the last day of the month / half-year on. 
AMCs website i.e. www.icicipruamc.com and on the 
website of AMFI within 10 days from the close of each 
month / half-year respectively. Since the Scheme is a 
new Scheme, Top 10 Holdings and Sector wise 
holdings are not available. 
The AMC shall publish an advertisement in all India 
edition of at least two daily newspapers, one each in. 
English and Hindi, every half year disclosing the 
hosting of the half-yearly statement of the schemes 
portfolio on the AMCs website and on the website of. 
The AMC shall send via email both the monthly and 
half-yearly statement of scheme portfolio within 10 
days from the close of each month / half-year 
respectively. The unitholders whose e-mail addresses 
are not registered with the Fund are requested to 
update / provide their email address to the Fund for 
updating the database. 
The AMC shall provide a physical copy of the 
statement of scheme portfolio, without charging any 
cost, on specific request received from a unit holder. 
Half Yearly Financial Results. 
Associate Transactions. 
In terms of Regulations 59 and SEBI circular no. 
CIR/IMD/DF/21/2012 dated September 13, 2012, the. 
AMC shall within one month from the close of each 
half year, that is on 31st March and on 30th. 
September, host a soft copy of its unaudited financial 
results on their website. The half-yearly unaudited 
report shall contain details as specified in Twelfth. 
Schedule and such other details as are necessary for 
the purpose of providing a true and fair view of the 
operations of the Fund. Further, the AMC shall publish 
an advertisement disclosing the hosting of such 
financial results on their website, in atleast one English 
daily newspaper having nationwide circulation and in a 
newspaper having wide circulation published in the 
language of the region where the Head Office of the. 
Fund is situated. 
The scheme wise annual report shall be hosted on the 
website of the AMC and on the website of the AMFI 
soon as may be possible but not later than four 
months from the date of closure of the relevant 
accounts year. The AMC shall publish an 
advertisement every year in all India edition of at least 
two daily newspapers, one each in English and Hindi, 
disclosing the hosting of the scheme wise annual 
report on the website of the AMC. 
The AMC shall display prominently on the AMCs 
website link of the scheme wise annual report and 
physical copy of the same shall be made available to 
the unitholders at the registered / corporate office of 
the AMC at all times. 
The AMC shall email the annual report or an abridged 
summary thereof to the unitholders whose email 
addresses are registered with the Fund. The 
unitholders whose e-mail addresses are not registered 
with the Fund are requested to update / provide their 
email address to the Fund for updating the database. 
Physical copy of scheme wise annual report or 
abridged summary shall be provided to investors who 
have opted to receive the same. 
The AMC shall also provide a physical copy of the 
abridged summary of the Annual Report, without 
charging any cost, on specific request received from. 
As per regulation 56(3A) of the Regulations, copy of. 
Schemewise Annual Report shall be also made 
available to unitholder on payment of nominal fees. 
Please refer to Statement of Additional Information 
(SAI). . 
Equity Scheme(s) will also attract Securities. 
Transaction Tax (STT) at applicable rates. 
Notes: 
1. Income of the Mutual Fund is exempt from 
income tax in accordance with the provisions of. 
Section 10(23D) of the Income-tax Act, 1961 
(the Act). 
2. Under the terms of the Scheme Information. 
Document, this Scheme is classified as equity 
oriented fund. 
As per clause (a) of the explanation to section 
112A, an Equity oriented fund has been 
defined to mean a fund set up under a scheme 
of a mutual fund specified under clause (23D) of 
section 10 and,. 
(i) in a case where the fund invests in the units of 
another fund which is traded on a recognised 
stock exchange,. 
(A) a minimum of ninety per cent of the total 
proceeds of such fund is invested in the units 
of such other fund. and. 
(B) such other fund also invests a minimum of 
ninety per cent of its total proceeds in the 
equity shares of domestic companies listed. 
dividend 
on a recognised stock exchange. and. 
(ii) in any other case, a minimum of sixty-five per 
cent of the total proceeds of such fund is 
invested in the equity shares of domestic 
companies listed on a recognised stock 
Further it is stated that the percentage of equity 
shareholding or unit held in respect of the fund, as the 
case may be, shall be computed with reference to the 
annual average of the monthly averages of the opening 
and closing figures 
3. If the total income of a resident investor (being 
individual or HUF) [without considering such. 
Long-term capital Gains / short term capital 
gains] is less than the basic exemption limit, 
then such Long-term capital gains/short-term 
capital gains should be first adjusted towards 
basic exemption limit and only excess should 
be chargeable to tax. 
4. Non-resident investors may be subject to a 
separate of tax regime / eligible to benefits 
under Tax Treaties, depending upon the facts of 
the case. The same has not been captured 
5. A rebate of up to Rs. 12,500 is available for 
resident individuals whose total income does 
not exceed Rs. 5,00,000. 
* For the purposes of determining the additional 
income-tax payable in accordance with section 115R, 
the amount of distributed income referred therein shall 
be increased to such amount as would, after reduction 
of the additional income-tax on such increased amount 
at the rate specified in section 115R, be equal to the 
amount of income distributed by the mutual fund. The 
rate provided is after grossing up. 
**Aggregate long term capital gains exceeding one 
lakh rupees in a financial year, arising from the transfer 
of units of an equity oriented fund, equity shares and 
units of business trust are chargeable to tax at 10 per 
cent (plus the applicable surcharge, health and 
education cess). 
#excluding applicable surcharge and cess. 
For further details on taxation please refer to the. 
Section on Tax Benefits of investing in the Mutual. 
Fund provided in Statement of Additional Information 
(SAI). . 
and Registrar on complaints and enquiries received 
from investors for resolving them promptly. 
For this purpose, Mr. Yatin Suvarna has been 
appointed the Investor Relations Officer. He can be 
contacted at the Central Service Office of the AMC. The 
address and phone numbers are: 
2nd Floor, Block B-2, Nirlon Knowledge Park, Western. 
Express Highway, Goregaon (East), 
Fax No.: 022-2686 8313 
e-mail - enquiry@ICICIpruamc.com. 
D. COMPUTATION OF NAV:. . 
The NAV of the Units of the Scheme will be computed by dividing the net assets of the. 
Scheme by the number of Units outstanding on the valuation date. The Fund shall value 
its investments according to the valuation norms, as specified in Schedule VIII of the. 
Regulations, or such norms as may be prescribed by SEBI from time to time and as 
stipulated in the Valuation Policy and Procedures of the Fund, provided in SAI. 
The NAV of the Scheme shall be rounded off upto two decimals. 
NAV of units under the Scheme shall be calculated as shown below: 
Market or Fair Value of Schemes investments + Current Assets 
1. Current Liabilities and Provision. 
NAV (Rs.) =______________________________________________________________. 
No. of Units outstanding under Scheme. 
IV. FEES AND EXPENSES. . 
This section outlines the expenses that will be charged to the scheme. 
A. NEW FUND OFFER (NFO) EXPENSES. . 
These expenses are incurred for the purpose of various activities related to the NFO like 
marketing and advertising, registrar expenses, printing and stationary, bank charges etc. 
In accordance with the provisions of SEBI Circular no. SEBI/IMD/CIR No. 1/64057/06 
dated April 04, 2006, no New Fund Offer Expenses will be charged to the Scheme. New. 
Fund Offer Expenses incurred for the Scheme would be borne by the AMC. 
B. ANNUAL SCHEME RECURRING EXPENSES. . 
These are the fees and expenses for operating the scheme. These expenses include. 
Investment Management and Advisory Fee charged by the AMC, Registrar and Transfer. 
Agents fee, marketing and selling costs etc. as given in the table below: 
The AMC has estimated that following percentage of the daily net assets of the scheme 
will be charged to the scheme as expenses. For the actual current expenses being 
charged, the investor should refer to the website of the Fund. The Fund would update 
the current expense ratios on the website at least three working days prior to the 
https://www.icicipruamc.com/Downloads/total-expense-ratio.aspx for Total Expense. 
Ratio (TER) details. 
Estimated Annual Recurring Expenses. 
Bank ETF 
(% p.a. of 
Investment Management and Advisory Fees. 
Trustee fee. 
Audit fees. 
Custodian fees. 
Registrar & Transfer Agents Fees. 
Marketing & Selling expense (including Costs of statutory. 
Advertisements)#. 
Cost related to investor communications. 
Cost of fund transfer from location to location. 
Upto 1.00. 
Cost of providing account statements and dividend redemption 
cheques and warrants. 
Cost towards investor education & awareness (at least 2 bps). 
Brokerage & transaction cost over and above 12 bps and 5 bps for 
cash and derivative market trades respectively. 
Goods and Services tax on expenses other than investment and 
advisory fees. 
Goods and Services tax on brokerage and transaction cost. 
Other Expenses$*. 
(more specifically elaborated below). 
The aforesaid does not include Goods and Services tax on investment management 
and advisory fees. The same is more specifically elaborated below. 
*As permitted under the Regulation 52 of SEBI (MF) Regulations, 1996 and pursuant to. 
SEBI/HO/IMD/DF2/CIR/P/2018/137 dated October 22, 2018 and SEBI (Mutual Funds). 
Second Amendment Regulations, 2012 and Securities and Exchange Board of India 
(Mutual Funds) (Fourth Amendment) Regulations, 2018. 
$ Including exchange listing fee 
#The Scheme shall not incur any distribution expenses/ commision. 
The purpose of the above table is to assist the investor in understanding the various 
costs and expenses that an investor in the Scheme will bear. The above expenses may 
increase/decrease as per actual and/or any change in the Regulations. 
These estimates have been made in good faith as per information available to the. 
Investment Manager based on past experience. Types of expenses charged shall be as 
per the SEBI (MF) Regulations. 
The Scheme can charge expenses within overall maximum limits prescribed under SEBI. 
(MF) Regulations, without any internal cap allocated to any of the expense heads 
specified in the above table. 
As per the Regulations, the maximum recurring expenses that can be charged to the. 
Scheme shall not exceed one percent (1.00%) of daily net assets. 
Pursuant to SEBI circulars no. CIR/IMD/DF/21/2012 dated September 13, 2012, 
SEBI/HO/IMD/DF2/CIR/P/2018/137 dated October 22, 2018 and SEBI (Mutual Funds). 
Second Amendment Regulations, 2012, following additional costs or expenses may be 
charged to the scheme, namely: 
(i) The AMC may charge Goods and Services tax on investment and advisory fees to 
the scheme of the Fund in addition to the maximum limit of total expenses ratio as 
prescribed in Regulation 52 of the Regulations, whereas Goods and Services tax on 
other than investment and advisory fees, if any, shall be borne by the scheme within 
the maximum limit as per regulation 52 of the Regulations. 
(ii) expenses not exceeding of 0.30 per cent of daily net assets, if the new inflows from 
retail investors from B30 cities or as may be specified by the Securities and. 
Exchange Board of India, from time to time are at least : 
30 per cent of the gross new inflows from retail investors from B30 cities into 
the scheme, or. 
15 per cent of the average assets under management (year to date) of the 
scheme,. 
Provided that if inflows from retail investors from B30 cities are less than the higher 
of the above, such expenses on daily net assets of the scheme shall be charged on 
proportionate basis. 
Provided further that expenses charged under this clause shall be utilised for 
distribution expenses incurred for bringing inflows from retail investors from B30 
Provided further that amount incurred as expense on account of inflows from retail 
investors from B30 cities shall be credited back to the scheme in case the said 
inflows are redeemed within a period of one year from the date of investment. 
For above purposes, B30 cities shall be beyond Top 30 cities as at the end of the 
previous financial year as communicated by AMFI. Retail investors would mean 
individual investors from whom inflows into the Scheme amount upto Rs. 2,00,000/- per. 
Further, the brokerage and transaction cost incurred for the purpose of execution of 
trade may be capitalized to the extent of 12bps and 5bps for cash market transactions 
and derivatives transactions respectively. Any payment towards brokerage and 
transaction cost, over and above the said 12 bps and 5bps for cash market transactions 
and derivatives transactions respectively may be charged to the scheme within the 
maximum limit of Total Expense Ratio as prescribed under regulation 52 of the SEBI 
(Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996. Goods and Services tax on brokerage and transaction 
cost paid for execution of trade, if any, shall be within the limit prescribed under 
regulation 52 of the Regulations. 
Expenses over and above the prescribed limit shall be charged / borne in accordance 
with the Regulations prevailing from time to time. 
Illustration impact of expense ratio on schemes return (to be revised once the 
percentage of total expenses is finalized). 
C. LOAD STRUCTURE. . 
care of other marketing and selling expenses. Load amounts are variable and are subject 
to change from time to time. For the current applicable structure, please refer to the 
website of the AMC (www.icicipruamc.com) or may call your distributor. 
Entry Load: 
Not Applicable. In terms of SEBI circular no. SEBI/IMD/CIR No. 4/168230/09 dated June 
30, 2009 has notified that, w.e.f. August 01, 2009, there will be no entry load charged to 
the schemes of the Fund and the upfront commission to distributors will be paid by the 
investor directly to the distributor, based on his assessment of various factors including 
the service rendered by the distributor. 
Exit Load: 
There will be no exit load for units sold through the secondary market on the BSE/NSE. 
Investors shall note that the brokerage on sales of the units of the scheme on the stock 
exchanges shall be borne by the investors. 
However, during the process of creation/redemption there may be transaction costs 
and/or other incidental expenses (forming part of the Cash Component), which are liable 
to be borne by the investors/Authorized Participants. 
Investors, other than Authorised Participants, can sell units in less than Creation Unit. 
Size of the Scheme directly to the Fund/the AMC, without any exit load in the following 
cases: 
if the traded price of the ETF units is at a discount of more than 3% to the NAV for 
continuous 30 days. 
if discount of bid price to applicable NAV is more than 3% over a period of 7 
consecutive trading days. 
if no quotes are available on exchange(s) for 3 consecutive trading days. 
when the total bid size on the exchange(s) is less than half creation unit size daily, 
averaged over a period of 7 consecutive trading days. 
Under these circumstances, investors, as specified above and can redeem units of the. 
Scheme directly with the the Fund/the AMC without any exit load. The aforesaid criteria 
for the direct redemption with the the Fund/the AMC are also available at the website of 
the AMC. The Fund/the AMC will track the aforesaid liquidity criteria and display it on its 
website viz., www.icicipruamc.com if the same is triggered, no exit load would be 
applicable in such cases. 
Any imposition or enhancement in the load shall be applicable on prospective 
investments only. However, AMC shall not charge any load on issue of units allotted on 
reinvestment of dividend for existing as well as prospective investors. Units issued on 
reinvestment of dividends shall not be subject to entry and exit load. 
The investor is requested to check the prevailing load structure of the scheme before 
investing. For any change in load structure AMC will issue an addendum and display it 
on the website/Investor Service Centres. An advertisement to this effect will be given in 
one English daily newspaper having nationwide circulation as well as in a newspaper 
published in the language of the region where the Head Office of the AMC is situated. 
Subject to the Regulations, the Trustee reserves the right to modify/alter the load 
structure for redemption by Authorised Participants/ Investors directly with the Fund. 
Such changes will be applicable for prospective investments. The Trustee shall arrange 
to display a notice in the Investor Service Centers of the AMC before the change of the 
then prevalent load structure. The SIDs will be updated in respect of changes in the load 
structure as per the addendum issued. The addendum detailing the changes in the load 
structure will be published by AMC in 2 daily newspapers- one in regional language and 
the other in English language newspaper. Changes in the fundamental attributes may be 
stamped in the acknowledgement slip issued by the Fund after the changes in load. 
Not applicable. 
V. RIGHTS OF UNITHOLDERS. . 
Please refer to SAI for details. 
VI. PENALTIES, PENDING LITIGATION OR PROCEEDINGS, FINDINGS OF INSPECTIONS. . 
OR INVESTIGATIONS FOR WHICH ACTION MAY HAVE BEEN TAKEN OR IS IN THE. . 
PROCESS OF BEING TAKEN BY ANY REGULATORY AUTHORITY. . 
1. All disclosures regarding penalties and action(s) taken against foreign Sponsor(s) may 
be limited to the jurisdiction of the country where the principal activities (in terms of 
income / revenue) of the Sponsor(s) are carried out or where the headquarters of the. 
Sponsor(s) is situated. Further, only top 10 monetary penalties during the last three 
years shall be disclosed. 
2. In case of Indian Sponsor(s), details of all monetary penalties imposed and/ or action 
taken during the last three years or pending with any financial regulatory body or 
governmental authority, against Sponsor(s) and/ or the AMC and/ or the Board of. 
Trustees /Trustee Company. for irregularities or for violations in the financial services 
sector, or for defaults with respect to share holders or debenture holders and 
depositors, or for economic offences, or for violation of securities law. Details of 
settlement, if any, arrived at with the aforesaid authorities during the last three years 
shall also be disclosed. 
Cases pertaining to ICICI Bank Ltd. (the Bank): 
2.1 In November 2017, an overseas regulator imposed a composition sum of 
approximately SGD 8 lacs for non-adherence of rules under AML regulations 
at one of ICICI Banks overseas branches, resulting from regulatory inspection 
conducted in 2013 and pursuant to consultants review of records, relating to 
the period of May 2012 to April 2014. There were no dealings with sanctioned 
entities and the remediation primarily required improvement to the branchs. 
AML/CFT controls, which has since been undertaken. The local regulator in 
that jurisdiction has also acknowledged the efforts undertaken by the branch 
in addressing the issues identified in these reports. 
2.2 As mentioned by RBI in its press release dated March 29, 2018, RBI has 
through an order dated March 26, 2018, imposed a monetary penalty of ` 
589.0 million on ICICI Bank for non-compliance with directions/guidelines. 
issued by RBI. This penalty has been imposed in exercise of powers vested in. 
RBI under the provisions of Section 47A(1) (c) read with Section 46(4)(i) of the. 
Banking Regulation Act, 1949. The Bank has paid the penalty to RBI on April 9, 
2.3 The Bank & ex-Compliance Officer had received a Notice from SEBI on July 
31, 2018 under Rule 4(1) of SCR (Procedure for Holding Inquiry and imposing 
penalties by Adjudicating Officer) Rules 2005 requiring responses on matters 
relating to alleged non-compliance with certain provisions of the erstwhile. 
Listing Agreement with respect to delayed disclosure of an agreement 
relating to merger of the erstwhile Bank of Rajasthan with the Bank. The Bank 
is in the process of taking suitable action. 
2.4 The Bank & its ex-Managing Director & CEO had received a Notice from SEBI 
on May 24, 2018 under Rule 4(1) of SCR (Procedure for Holding Inquiry and 
imposing penalties by Adjudicating Officer) Rules 2005 requiring responses 
on matters relating to alleged non-compliance with certain provisions of the 
erstwhile Listing Agreement and the Securities and Exchange Board of India 
(Listing Obligations and Disclosure Requirements) Regulations, 2015. Matter 
in this regard is under adjudication. 
2.5 RBI has vide its order dated February 25, 2019, imposed a monetary penalty 
of ` 10 million on ICICI Bank for non-compliance with guidelines/directions 
issued by RBI on Time-bound implementation & strengthening of SWIFT 
related operational controls. This penalty has been imposed in exercise of 
powers vested in RBI under section 47(A)(1)(c) read with Section 46(4)(i) of 
the Banking Regulation Act, 1949. 
2.6 The Overseas Branch of the Bank in Singapore had inadvertently claimed 
certain tax deductions from AY2013 to AY2015. This was self-identified by the 
branch in June 2016 and voluntary disclosure of the same was made along 
with revised tax computation for relevant Assessment Years. Owing to the 
above, Inland Revenue Authority of Singapore (IRAS) has levied a penalty of. 
SGD 1,500 on the branch. 
3. Details of all enforcement actions taken by SEBI in the last three years and/ or 
pending with SEBI for the violation of SEBI Act, 1992 and Rules and Regulations 
framed there under including debarment and/ or suspension and/ or cancellation and/ 
or imposition of monetary penalty/adjudication/enquiry proceedings, if any, to which 
the Sponsor(s) and/ or the AMC and/ or the Board of Trustees /Trustee Company and/ 
or any of the directors and/ or key personnel (especially the fund managers) of the. 
AMC and Trustee Company were/ are a party. The details of the violation shall also be 
3.1   In connection with certain investments made by few schemes of ICICI Prudential. 
Mutual Fund, the AMC has ensured compliance with the directions issued by SEBI. 
Further, in the same matter, quasi-judicial proceedings have been initiated by SEBI. 
The AMC had filed an application with SEBI for settling the adjudication 
proceedings, without admission or denial of findings. In this matter, the AMC has 
paid the full settlement amount to SEBI. In light of the above, SEBI vide its 
settlement order dated November 29, 2018 has disposed off the pending 
proceedings against the AMC. 
3.2     Basis certain alleged violations observed during the inspection of ICICI Prudential. 
Mutual Fund under SEBI (Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996, for the period from. 
April 01, 2014 to March 31, 2016, quasi-judicial proceedings have been initiated by. 
SEBI, with respect to following matters: 
a. Investment by schemes as per the investment objective. 
b. Rebalancing of scheme portfolio in case of downgrade of securities. and 
c. Determination of quantum of dividend and fixing of record date for 
declaration of dividend. 
In reference to the above, the AMC and ICICI Prudential Trust Limited (the Trustee. 
Company) have received a show cause notice on August 28, 2018. In response to 
the above, the AMC and the Trustee Company have taken suitable action. 
3.3     Further, details as specified in para 2.3 and 2.4 above shall also form part of 
disclosure under this para. 
4. Any pending material civil or criminal litigation incidental to the business of the. 
Mutual Fund to which the Sponsor(s) and/ or the AMC and/ or the Board of Trustees 
/Trustee Company and/ or any of the directors and/ or key personnel are a party 
should also be disclosed separately. 
4.1     As per the SEBI (Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996, mutual fund schemes are 
permitted to invest in securitised debt. Accordingly, few schemes of ICICI. 
Prudential Mutual Fund (the Fund) had made investment in Pass Through. 
Certificates (PTCs) of certain special purpose vehicles / securitisation trusts (the. 
Trusts). The returns filed by few of these securitisation Trusts whose PTCs were 
held by the Fund were taken up for scrutiny by the Income Tax Authorities for. 
Assessment Years 2007-08, 2008-09, 2009-10 and 2010-11. Arising out of this, the. 
Income Tax Authorities had raised a demand on such Trusts. On failure to recover 
the same from the Trusts, Income Tax Authorities sent demand notices to the Fund 
along with other Mutual Funds as beneficiaries / contributors to such Trusts. The. 
Fund in consultation with its tax & legal advisors has contested the applicability of 
such demand and got the attachment order vacated by Honble High Court of. 
Bombay. The Trusts on their part had contested the matter and the Income Tax. 
Appellate Tribunal upheld their appeal and dismissed the contentions and all the 
cross-appeals filed by the Tax Authorities. The Tax Authorities have now filed an 
appeal with Honble High Court on the matter. 
5. Any deficiency in the systems and operations of the Sponsor(s) and/ or the AMC and/ 
or the Board of Trustees/Trustee Company which SEBI has specifically advised to be 
disclosed in the SID, or which has been notified by any other regulatory agency, shall 
be disclosed. : 
1. Power to make Rules. 
Subject to the Regulations, the Trustee may, from time to time, prescribe such terms and 
make such rules for the purpose of giving effect to the Scheme with power to the AMC 
to add to, alter or amend all or any of the terms and rules that may be framed from time 
to time. 
If any difficulties arise in giving effect to the provisions of the Scheme, the Trustee may, 
subject to the Regulations, do anything not inconsistent with such provisions, which 
appears to it to be necessary, desirable or expedient, for the purpose of removing such 
3. Scheme to be binding on the Unitholders: 
Subject to the Regulations, the Trustee may, from time to time, add or otherwise vary or 
alter all or any of the features of investment plans and terms of the Scheme after 
obtaining the prior permission of SEBI and Unitholders (where necessary), and the same 
shall be binding on all the Unitholders of the Scheme and any person or persons 
claiming through or under them as if each Unitholder or such person expressly had 
agreed that such features and terms shall be so binding. 
Notwithstanding anything contained in this Scheme Information Document, the 
provisions of the SEBI (Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996 and the guidelines there under 
shall be applicable. 
Note: The Scheme under this Scheme Information Document (SID) was approved by the. 
Directors of ICICI Prudential Trust Limited vide resolution dated April 03, 2019. The. 
Trustees have ensured that ICICI Prudential Bank ETF approved by them is a new 
product offered by ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund and is not a minor modification of the 
exiting Scheme/fund/product. 
For and on behalf of the Board of Directors of. 
Nimesh Shah. 
Managing Director. 
Sd/-. 
ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund Official Points of Acceptance 
1.Ahmedabad: 307, 3rd Floor, Zodiac Plaza, Beside Nabard Vihar, Near St. Xaviers. 
College Corner, H.L. Collage Road, Off C. G. Road, Ahmedabad 380009, Gujarat -. 
Amritsar: Eminent Mall, 2nd amar Floor, Kennedy Avenue, 10 The Mall, Amritsar - 
143001, Punjab - Anand: 109-110, Maruti Sharnam Complex, Opp. Nandbhumi Party. 
Plot, Anand Vallabh Vidyanagar Road, Anand - 388001, Gujarat - Aurangabad: Ground. 
Floor, Shop no. 137/B, Samarth Nagar, Aurangabad - 431001, Maharashtra - Allahabad : 
Shop No. FF-1, FF-2, Vashishtha Vinayak Tower, 38/1, Tashkant Marg, Civil Lines, 
Allahabad 211 001 - Bangalore (M G Road): Phoenix Pinnacle, First Floor, Unit 101 -104, 
No 46, Ulsoor Road, Bangalore 560042, Karnataka - Bangalore: Yoshitha Hitech. 
International, No. 120B, EPIP Industrial area, Opp Mariott Hotel, Whitefield, Bangalore : 
560066- New Delhi: Unit No. 6, First Floor, Shankar Vihar, Vikas Marg,Opposite Metro. 
Pillar No. 75, Delhi-110092 - Bangalore: No. 311/7, Ground Floor 9th Main, 5th Block, 
Road, Alkapuri, Vadodara 390007, Gujarat -Bharuch: First Floor, Unit No. 107/108, Nexus. 
Business Hub, Cit Survey No. 2513, Ward No. 1, Beside Rajeshwar Petrol Pump, Opp. 
Gangotri Plaza, Opp. Daxinamurti School, Waghawadi Road, Bhavnagar, Gujarat 364002 
2. Bhopal: Kay Kay Business Center, Ram Gopal Maheshwari Marg, Zone 1, Maharana. 
Pratap Nagar, Bhopal-462023, Madhya Pradesh - Bhubhaneshwar: Plot No. 381, Khata 
84, MZ Kharvel Nagar, (Near Ram Mandir), Dist :Khurda, Bhbaneshwar, 751001 Orissa -. 
Pune: Ground Floor, Office no. 6, Chetna CHS Ltd, General Thimayya Marg, Camp Pune, 
411 011 - Chandigarh: SCO 137-138, F.F, Sec-9C, Chandigarh 160017, Chandigarh -105, 
Amar Chamber, Opp. Lal School, Near HDFC Bank, Station Road, Gujarat, Valsad, 
Senraleigh Road, Upcar Garden, Ground Floor, Near AXIS Bank, Asansol, West Bengal 
713 304- Chennai- Lloyds Road: Abithil Square,189, Lloyds Road,Royapettah, Chennai 
600014, Tamil Nadu - Chennai- N R Dave Complex, 1st Floor, No: 201/C34, 2nd Avenue. 
Anna Nagar west, Chennai - 600 040 - Chennai-Door No 24, Ground Floor, GST Road, 
Tambaram Sanitorium, Chennai 600 047 - Chennai No. 66, Door No. 11A, III Floor, B R. 
Complex, Ramakrishna Iyer Street, Opp. National Cinema Theatre, West Tambaram, 
No. 292, Old Mahabalipuram Road, Sholinganallur, Chennai - 600 119,- Cochin: #956/3 
& 956/4 2nd Floor, Teepeyam Towers, Kurushupally Road, Off MG Road, Ravipuram , 
Kochi 682015, Kerala - Cochin: Ground and First Floor, Parambil Plaza, Kaloor. 
No. 1334, Thirumoorthy Layout, Thadagam Road, R.S. Puram, Behind Venkateswara. 
Lokenath Mansion, Sahid Khudiram Sarani, CityCentre, Durgapur 713216, West Bengal -. 
Gujarat: Ground Floor, Unit No. 2 & 3, Bhayani Mansion, Gurudwara Road, Jamnagar - 
361001, Gujarat - Gujarat Office No. 23-24 , Pooja-B, Near ICICI Bank, Station Road,Bhuj-. 
Kutch 370001, Gujarat- Patiala: SCO-64, Near Income Tax Office, New Leela Bhawan, 
Patiala 147001, Punjab - Gujarat: Ground Floor, Unit no. A6, Goyal Palladium, 
Vipul Agora Bulding, Unit no 109, 1st Floor, Opp. JMD Regedt Sq, Gurgaon - 122001 -. 
Basement, HUDA Shopping Centre,(Below Axis Bank). Faridabad 121002, Haryana 
3.,Hyderabad-Begumpet: Gowra Plaza, 1st Floor, No: 1-8-304-307/381/444,S.P. Road,. 
Begumpet, Secunderabad, Hyderabad 500003, Andhra Pradesh - Shimla: Attic, Bell. 
Villa, Above IndusInd Bank, The Mall Shimla,, Shimla 171001, Himachal Pradesh -. 
Hyderabad: Door No. 1-98/2/11/3, Shrishti Tower, 1st floor, Shop no. 3, Arunodaya. 
Colony, Hi Tech City Road, Madhapur, Ranga Reddy District, Hyderabad - 500081 -. 
Indore: Unit no. G3 on Ground Floor and unit no. 104 on First Floor, Panama Tower, 
Manorama Ganj Extension, Near Crown Palace Hotel,Indore 452001, Madhya Pradesh -. 
Business Park, Subhash Marg,C Scheme , Jaipur 302001, Rajasthan - Jalandhar: Unit. 
No. 22, Ground Floor, City Square Building, EH197, Civil Lines, Jalandhar - 144001, 
Floor, Plot No 3, Sindhi Colony, Shastri Nagar Jodhpur Rajasthan -Kalyan: Ground Floor, 
Unit no. 317, Kan Chamber, 14/113, Civil Lines, Kanpur 208001- Kalyani: B- 9/14 (C.A), 
1st Floor, Central Park, Dist- Nadia, Kalyani 741224, West Bengal -Moradabad Plot No. 
Pradesh- Kanpur: Unit No. G-5, Sai Square 16-116, (45), Bhargava Estate Civil Lines, 
B.C High School, Cross Road 3, Ambala Cantt. Haryana - 133001 - Kolhapur: 1089, E. 
Ward, Anand Plaza, Rajaram Road, Kolhapur 416001, Maharashtra- Bengaluru 1st Floor, 
AARYAA Centre, No. 1, MIG, KHB Colony, 1A Cross, 5th Block, Koramangala, Bengaluru 
: 560095 Karnataka- Kolkata :1st Floor, 1/393 Garihat Road (South) Opp. Jadavpur. 
Police station Prince Anwar Shah Road Kolkata - 700068 - Kolkata - Dalhousie: Room. 
No. 409, 4th Floor, Oswal Chambers, 2, Church Lane Kolkata - 700001, West Bengal -. 
B, Kolkata 700020, West Bengal - Lucknow: 1st Floor Modern Business Center,19 Vidhan. 
Sabha Marg, Lucknow 226001, Uttar Pradesh - Lucknow: Unit no. 8 & 9, Saran. 
Ludhiana: SCO 121, Ground Floor, Feroze Gandhi Market, Ludhiana 141001, Punjab -. 
Margao: UG-20, Vasant Arcade, Behind Police Station, Comba, Margao, Goa - 403601 -. 
Ground Floor, Suchitra Enclave Maharashtra Lane, Borivali (West), Mumbai 400092, 
Maharashtra - Mumbai - Fort: ICICI Prudential Asset Management Co Ltd, 2nd Floor, 
Brady House,12/14 Veer Nariman Road Fort, Mumbai 400001, Maharashtra - Mumbai -. 
Ghatkopar: Ground Floor, Unit No 4 & 5, Platinum Mall, Opposite Ghatkopar Railway. 
Station, Jawahar Road, Ghatkopar East, Mumbai 400077 - Mumbai - Ghatkopar: Office. 
No. 307, 3rd Floor, Platinum Mall, Jawahar Road, Ghatkopar East, Mumbai - 400077-. 
Mumbai - Goregaon: 2nd Floor, Block B-2, Nirlon Knowledge Park, Western Express. 
Highway, Goregaon, Mumbai 400013, Maharashtra - Mumbai: ICICI Prudential Mutual. 
Mumbai-Thane: ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund, Dev Corpora, 1st Floor, Office no. 102, 
Cadbury Junction, Eastern Express Highway, Thane (West) - 400 601, Maharashtra - Sri. 
Kamakshi Sadan No. 44/1, 1st Floor, 4th cross, Malleswaram, Bangalore 560 003 -. 
Mumbai-Vashi: ICICI Prudential AMC Ltd, Devavrata Co-op Premises, Plot No 83, Office. 
No 26, Gr Floor, Sector 17, Vashi, Navi Mumbai 400703, Maharashtra - Palghar: Shop. 
No. A1, Ground Floor, Dhaiwat Viva Swarganga, Next to ICICI Bank, Aghashi Road, Virar 
(West), Palghar - 401303, Maharashtra - Nagpur: 1st Floor, Mona Enclave, WHC Road, 
Near Coffee House Square, Above Titan Eye Showroom, Dharampeth, Nagpur 440010, -. 
New Delhi: 12th Floor Narain Manzil,23 Barakhamba Road, New Delhi 110501, New Delhi 
4. Navsari: 1st Floor, Unit No. 106, Prabhakunj Heights,Sayaji Station Road,Opposite ICICI. 
Bank,, Gujarat, Navsari 396445 - Noida: K-20, First Floor, Sector 18, Noida, Uttar. 
Pradesh, Pincode 201301 - New Delhi: Ground Floor, Block F, Unit No. 17-24, S-1 level, 
Delhi: Plot No. C-1, 2, 3 Shop No. 112, Above ICICI Bank, First Floor, P.P Towers, Netaji. 
Block, Janak Puri, New Delhi 110558 - Panaji: 1st Floor, Unit no. F3, Lawande Sarmalkar. 
Ward No. 8, 1st Floor, Above Federal Bank, Opp. Bhatak Chowk, G.T. Road, Panipat -. 
Sambhaji Park, J M Road, Pune 411054, Maharashtra - Pune: Ground Floor, Shop No. 3 
and 4, Saloni Apartments, Lot No. 9, S. No. 129/9, CTS No. 830, Ideal Colony, Kothrud, 
Pune - 411 038, Maharashtra - Raipur: Shop No. 10, 11 & 12, Ground Floor, Raheja. 
Sevoke Road, Siliguri 734001, West Bengal - Ground Floor, 107/1,, A. C. Road, 
Baharampur,, Murshidabad,, West Bengal 742 103 - Surat: HG 30, B Block, International. 
Trade Center, Majura Gate, Surat 395002, Gujarat - Udaipur: Shop No. 2, Ratnam, Plot. 
No. 14, Bhatt Ji Ki Badi,Udaipur 313001, Rajasthan -Uttar Pradesh: Unit No. C-65, 
Ground Floor, Raj Nagar, District Centre, Ghaziabad 201002, Uttar Pradesh - Vadodara: 
First Floor, Unit no. 108, 109 & 110, Midtown Heights, Opp. Bank of Baroda, Jetalpur, 
Yatra Crossing, Varanasi 221010, Uttar Pradesh - Jaipur: Shop No. NFS/3&4, Nehru. 
Place, Tonk Road, Jaipur, Rajasthan 302018- TC 15/1926, Near Ganapathy Temple, 
Bakery Junction, Vazhuthacaud Road, Thycaud, Thiruvananthapuram, Kerala - 695 014 - 
#230/1, New No. Ch13, 1st Floor, 5th Cross,12th Main, Saraswathipuram, Mysore , 
Karnataka- 570 009 - Agra: No. 2 & 9, Block No. 54/4, Ground Floor, Prateek Tower, 
Light House Hill Road, Mangalore - 575001. State: Karnataka. 
TrxnDelhi@icicipruamc.com, TrxnNRI@icicipruamc.com. 
Toll Free Numbers: (MTNL/BSNL) 1800222999. (Others) 18002006666 - Website: 
www.icicipruamc.com. 
Other Cities: Additional official transaction acceptance points 
(CAMS Transaction Points) 
5. Agartala: Advisor Chowmuhani (Ground Floor) Krishnanagar, Agartala 799001, Tripura 
6. Agra: No. 8, II Floor Maruti Tower Sanjay Place, Agra 282002, Uttar Pradesh -. 
Ellis Bridge , Ahmedabad, Ahmedabad 380006, Gujarat - Nadiad: F -134, First Floor, 
Floor, Shree Krishna Complex, Near Kanhayya Sweets, M G Road Vijayapur (Bijapur) - 
586101 - Ajmer: Shop No.S-5, Second Floor Swami Complex, Ajmer 305001, Rajasthan. 
City Enclave, Opp. Kumar Nursing Home Ramghat Road, Aligarh 202001, Uttar Pradesh -. 
Allahabad: 30/2, A&B, Civil Lines Station, Besides Vishal Mega Mart, Strachey Road, 
Allahabad 211051, Uttar Pradesh -Assam: Kanak Tower 1st Floor, Opp. IDBI Bank/ICICI. 
Bank, C.K.Das Road, Tezpur Sonitpur, Assam - 784 001- Alleppey: Doctors Tower. 
Building, Door No. 14/2562, 1st floor, North of Iorn Bridge, Near Hotel Arcadia Regency, 
Alleppey 688011, Kerala - Alwar: 256A, Scheme No:1, Arya Nagar, Alwar 301001, 
Rajasthan - - Sikar: Pawan Travels Street, Opposite City Centre Mall, Sikar 332001, 
134003, Haryana - Jalpaiguri: Babu Para, Beside Meenaar Apartment, Ward No VIII, 
Kotwali Police Station, PO & Dist Jalpaiguri, Pincode: 735101, West Bengal - Amritsar: 
SCO - 18J, C Block, Ranjit Avenue, Amritsar 140001, Punjab - Anand: 101, A.P. Tower, 
B/H, Sardhar Gunj Next to Nathwani Chambers , Anand 388001, Gujarat - Anantapur: 
15-570-33, I Floor Pallavi Towers, Anantapur 515001, Andhra Pradesh - Andhra. 
Mumbai ISC): CTS No 411, Citipoint, Gundivali, Teli Gali, Above C.T. Chatwani Hall, 
Complex,Opp Old Colony, Near Valia Char Rasta, G.I.D.C., Ankleshwar 393002, Gujarat -. 
Ushagram, Asansol 713303, West Bengal - N. N. Road, Power House Choupathi, 
of Hotel Blue Diamon, Ground Floor, T. P. Nagar, Korba 495677 - Ward No. 5, 
Basantapur More, PO Arambag, Hoogly, Aramnbagh 712 601, West Bengal - Usha. 
Complex, Ground Floor, Punjab Bank Building, Hospital Road, Silchar - 788005 -. 
Aurangabad:2nd Floor, Block D-21-D-22, Motiwala Trade Centre, Nirala Bazar, New. 
Samarth Nagar, Opp. HDFC Bank, Aurangabad 431001, Maharashtra - Balasore: B C Sen. 
Road, Balasore 756001, Orissa - Bangalore: Trade Centre, 1st Floor 45, Dikensen Road 
(Next to Manipal Centre), Bangalore 560042, Karnataka - Karnataka :Shop No. 2, 1st. 
Floor, Shreyas Complex, Near Old Bus Stand, Bagalkot - 587 101, Karnataka -. 
Bankura: CAMS Service Center, Cinema Road, Nutunganj, Beside Mondal Bakery, P. 0. &. 
Dist. Bankura 722101 - Bareilly: F-62, 63, Second Floor,, Butler Plaza Civil Lines, Bareilly 
243001, Uttar Pradesh - Belgaum: Classic Complex, Block no. 104, 1st Floor, Saraf. 
Colony Khanapur Road, Tilakwadi, Belgaum - 590 006, Karnataka - Bellary: CAMS. 
Service centre, 18/47/A, Govind Nilaya, Ward No. 20, Sangankal Moka Road, 
Gandhinagar, Ballari - 583102, Karnataka - Berhampur: First Floor, Upstairs of Aaroon. 
Printers Gandhi Nagar Main Road, Berhampur 760001, Orissa - Bhagalpur: Dr R P Road. 
Khalifabag Chowk, Bhagalpur 812002, Bihar - Bharuch: A-111, First Floor, R K Casta, 
Behind Patel Super Market, Station Road, Bharuch - 392001, Gujarat - Bhatinda: 2907. 
GH,GT Road Near Zila Parishad, Bhatinda 151001, Punjab - Bhavnagar: 305-306, Sterling. 
Point Waghawadi Road Opp. HDFC Bank, Bhavnagar 364002, Gujarat - Bhilai: Shop No. 
117,Ground Floor, Khicharia Complex, Opposite IDBI Bank, Nehru Nagar Square, Bhilai 
490020, Chattisgarh - Bhilwara: Indraparstha tower Shop Nos 209-213, Second floor, 
No . 10, 2nd floor, Alankar Complex, Near ICICI Bank, M P Nagar, Zone II, Bhopal 462011, 
Madhya Pradesh - Bhubaneswar: 101/ 7, Janpath, Unit-III, Bhubaneswar 751001, Orissa 
7. Bhuj:Office No. 4-5, 1st Floor RTO, Relocation Commercial, Complex - B, Opp. Fire. 
Station,, Near RTO Circle, Bhuj, Kutch 370001, Gujarat - Bolpur: Room No. FB26, 1st. 
Tower, B/H B.N Chambers, Ankleshwar Mahadev Road, Godhra - 389001, Gujarat -. 
Nalanda: R-C Palace, Amber Station Road, Opp.: Mamta Complex, Bihar Sharif (Nalanda). 
Bihar 803 101. - Bhusawal (Parent: Jalgaon TP): 3, Adelade Apartment Christain Mohala, 
Behind Gulshan-E-Iran Hotel Amardeep Talkies Road Bhusawal, Bhusawal 425201, 
Maharashtra - Bikaner: Behind Rajasthan patrika, in front of Vijaya Bank, 1404 Amar. 
Singh Pura, Bikaner 334 001, Rajasthan - Bilaspur: Shop No. B-104, First Floor, Narayan. 
Plaza, Link Road, Bilaspur, (C.G), 495 001 Contact:9203900626 - Bokaro: Mazzanine. 
Floor, F-4, City Centre Sector 4, Bokaro Steel City 827004, Bokaro 827004, Jharkhand -. 
Burdwan: 1st floor, Above Exide Showroom, 399 G T Road, Burdwan, 713101- Calicut: 
29/97G 2nd Floor Gulf Air Building Mavoor Road Arayidathupalam, Calicut 673016, 
Kerala - Chandigarh: Deepak Towers, SCO 154-155, 1st Floor, Sector17-C, Chandigarh 
160017, Punjab -Mandi 328/12, Ram Nagar, 1st Floor, Above Ram Traders, Mandi : 
175001 Himachal Pradesh-Vijaynagaram Portion 3, First Floor, No. 3-16, Behind NRI. 
Hospital, NCS Road, Srinivasa Nagar, Vijaynagaram 535003 Andhra Pradesh -Haryana : 
Sco-11-12,1st Floor, Pawan Plaza, Model Town, Atlas Road, Subhash Chowk, Sonepat- 
131001- Maharashtra: 1st Floor, Shraddha Niketan,Tilakwadi, Opp. Hotel City Pride, 
Sharanpur Road Nasik - 422 002 - Maharashtra: Dev Corpora, 1st Floor, Office no. 102, 
Cadbury Junction, Eastern Express Highway, Thane (West) - 400 601 1 - Maharashtra: st. 
Floor, Shraddha Niketan, Tilakwadi, Opp. Hotel City Pride, Sharanpur Road Nasik - 422 
002- Chandrapur: Opp. Mustafa Dcor, Near Bangalore Bakery, Kasturba Road, 
No.178/10, Kodambakkam High Road Opp. Hotel Palmgrove Nungambakkam, Chennai 
600034, Tamil Nadu - Chennai: 7th floor, Rayala Tower - III,158, Annasalai,Chennai, 
Chennai 600002, Tamil Nadu - Chennai: Ground floor, Rayala Tower- I,158, Annasalai, 
Chennai, Chennai 600002, Tamil Nadu - Cochin: Door No. 39/2638 DJ, 2nd Floor, 2A, M. 
G. Road, Modayil Building,, Cochin - 682 016. Tel.: (0484) 6060188/6400210 -. 
Coimbatore: Old # 66 New # 86, Lokamanya Street (West) Ground Floor R.S. Puram, 
Coimbatore 641002, Tamil Nadu - Cuttack: Near Indian Overseas Bank Cantonment. 
Road Mata Math, Cuttack 753001, Orissa - Davenegere: 13, Ist Floor, Akkamahadevi. 
Samaj Complex Church Road P.J.Extension, Devengere 577002, Karnataka - Dehradun: 
204/121 Nari Shilp Mandir Marg Old Connaught Place, Dehradun 248001, Uttaranchal -. 
Delhi: CAMS Collection Centre, Flat no.512, Narain Manzil, 23, Barakhamba Road, 
Connaught Place, New Delhi 110501, New Delhi - Delhi 306, 3rd Floor, DDA - 2 Building, 
District Centre, Janakpuri, New Delhi - 110058 - Deoghar: S S M Jalan Road Ground 
floor Opp. Hotel Ashoke Caster Town, Deoghar 814112, Jharkhand - Dewas: Tarani. 
Towers Room No: 111(1st Floor) Bank More, Dhanbad 826001, Jharkhand - Dhule: 
House No. 3140, Opp. Liberty Furniture, Jamnalal Bajaj Road, Near Tower Garden, Dhule 
424001 - Durgapur: City Plaza Building, 3rd floor, City Centre, Durgapur 713216, West. 
Bengal - Erode: 197, Seshaiyer Complex Agraharam Street, Erode 638001, Tamil Nadu -. 
Faridhabad: B-49, Ist Floor Nehru Ground Behind Anupam Sweet House NIT, Faridhabad 
121001, Haryana - Gaya: North Bisar Tank, Upper Ground floor, Near - I.M.A Hall, Gaya, 
Pradesh -First Floor, Canara Bank Building, Dhundhi Katra Mirzapur, Uttar Pradesh 231 
Wings, Desai Market, Gandhi Road, Bardoli, 394 601, Contact No: 8000791814, Email ID: 
camsbrd@camsonline.com -Hyderabad: No. 15-31-2M-1/4, 1st floor, 14-A, MIG, KPHB. 
Colony, Kukatpally, Hyderabad 500072- Lawande Sarmalkar Bhavan, 1st Floor, Office. 
No. 2, Next to Mahalaxmi temple, Panaji Goa, 403 001- Gondal: Parent CSC -. 
Rajkot,A/177, Kailash Complex, Khedut Decor, Gondal 360311, Gujarat - Gandhinagar : 
507, 5th Floor, Shree Ugati Corporate Park, Opposite Pratik Mall, Near HDFC Bank, 
The Mall, AD Tiraha, Bank Road,Gorakhpur 273001, Uttar Pradesh - Gobindgarh: 
Opposite State Bank of Bikaner and Jaipur, Harchand Mill Road, Motia Khan, Mandi. 
Sankar Hotel, Guntur 522002, Andhra Pradesh - Gurgaon: SCO - 17, 3rd Floor, Sector- 
14, Gurgaon 122001, Haryana - Guwahati: Piyali Phukan Road, K.C Path, House No.-1. 
Rehabari, Guwahati 781008, Assam -H. No 1-3-110, Rajendra Nagar, Mahabubnagar, 
Telangana, 509001 -B1, 1st floor, Mira Arcade, Library Road, Amreli, 365601- Gwalior:. 
G-6, Global Apartment Phase-II,Opposite Income Tax Office, Kailash Vihar City Centre, 
Gwalior 474001, Madhya Pradesh - Hotel Heritage Sikkim, Ground Floor, Diesel Power. 
3, Hotel Shaurya, New Model Colony, Haridwar, Uttarkhand, 249408 - Hassan: 2nd Floor, 
Hazaribag: Municipal Market Annanda Chowk, Hazaribagh 825301, Jharkhand - Hisar: 
12, Opp. Bank of Baroda Red Square Market, Hisar 125001, Haryana - Hubli: No.204 - 
Karnataka - Hyderabad: 208, II Floor, Jade Arcade Paradise Circle, Secunderabad 
500003, Andhra Pradesh - Indore: 101, Shalimar Corporate Centre 8-B, South Tukogunj, 
Opp.Greenpark, Indore 452001, Madhya Pradesh - Jabalpur: 975, Chouksey Chambers, 
Near Gitanjali School, 4th Bridge, Napier Town, Jabalpur 482001, Madhya Pradesh -. 
Jaipur: R-7, Yudhisthir Marg, C-Scheme Behind Ashok Nagar Police Station, Jaipur 
302001, Rajasthan - Jalandhar: 367/8, Central Town Opp. Gurudwara Diwan Asthan, 
Jalandhar 144001, Punjab - Jalgaon: Rustomji Infotech Services 70, Navipeth Opp. Old. 
Bus Stand, Jalgaon 425001, Maharashtra - Jalna C.C. (Parent: Aurangabad): Shop No 6, 
Ground Floor, Anand Plaza Complex, Bharat Nagar, Shivaji Putla Road, Jalna 431203, 
Maharashtra - Jammu: JRDS Heights, Lane Opp. S&S Computers,Near RBI Building, 
Sector 14, Nanak Nagar, Jammu 180004, Jammu & Kashmir - Jamnagar: 207, Manek. 
Centre, P N Marg, Jamnagar 361001, Gujarat. Tel.: (0288) 6540116 - Jamshedpur: 
Millennium Tower, R Road Room No:15 First Floor, Bistupur, Jamshedpur 831001, 
Jharkhand - Jhansi: 372/18 D, 1st floor, Above IDBI Bank, Beside V-Mart, Near. 
RASKHAN, Gwalior Road, Jhansi 284001 - Jodhpur: 1/5, Nirmal Tower Ist Chopasani. 
Road, Jodhpur 342003, Rajasthan - Jorhat: Jail Road Dholasatra, Near Jonaki Shangha. 
Choksi Bazar Kaman, Gujarat, Junagadh 362001, Gujarat - Kadapa: Bandi Subbaramaiah. 
Complex, D.No:3/1718, Shop No: 8, Raja Reddy Street, Besides Bharathi Junior College, 
Kadapa 516001, Andhra Pradesh, West Bengal - R. N. Tagore Road, Kotwali P. 
S.,Krishnanagar, Nadia, West Bengal. Pin code - 741101 -Kangra: C/O Dogra Naresh and. 
Kommireddy vari street, Beside Warf Road, Opp Swathi Medicals, Kakinada 533001, 
Andhra Pradesh - Kalyani: A - 1/50, Block - A, Dist Nadia, Kalyani 741224, West Bengal 
1. Kannur: Room No.14/435 Casa Marina Shopping Centre Talap, Kannur 670004, Kerala 
2. Kanpur: I Floor 106 to 108 CITY CENTRE Phase II 63/ 2, The Mall, Kanpur 208001, Uttar. 
Pradesh - Karimnagar: HNo.7-1-257, Upstairs S B H Mangammathota, Karimnagar 
505001, Andhra Pradesh - Karnal (Parent: Panipat TP): 29 Avtar Colony, Behind Vishal. 
Mega Mart, Karnal 132001- Karur: # 904, 1st Floor Jawahar Bazaar, Karur 639001, Tamil. 
Nadu - Kasaragod: KMC XXV/88, 1st and 2nd Floor, Stylo Complex, Above Canara Bank, 
Bank Road, Kasaragod - 671121, Kerala - Kashipura: Dev Bazaar, Bazpur Road, Kashipur 
: 244713, Uttarkhand - Kharagpur: 623/1 Malancha Main Road, PO Nimpura, Ward No - 
19, Kharagpur 721304, West Bengal - Kharagpur: Silver Palace, OT Road, Inda : 
B, 3rd Floor, Ayodhya Towers,Station Road, Kolhapur 416001, Maharashtra -Kolkata: 
RBC Road, Ground Floor, Near Barasat Kalikrishna Girls High School, Barasat - 700124, 
House (4th floor), Kolkata 700013 - Kolkata: Saket Building, 44 Park Street, 2nd Floor, 
Kolkata 700071, West Bengal -Kadakkan Complex, Opp Central School, Malappuram 670 
504- 53, 1st Floor, Shastri Market, Sadar Bazar, Firozabad 283 203- Kollam: 
Kochupilamoodu Junction Near VLC, Beach Road, Kollam 691001, Kerala - Kota: B-33. 
Kalyan Bhawan Triangle Part ,Vallabh Nagar, Kota 324007, Rajasthan - Kottayam: Door. 
No - XIII/658, Thamarapallil Building, M L Road, Near KSRTC Bus Stand Road, Kottayam - 
686001- Kumbakonam: Jailani Complex 47, Mutt Street, Kumbakonam 612001, Tamil. 
Nadu - Kurnool: H.No.43/8, Upstairs Uppini Arcade, N R Peta, Kurnool 518004, Andhra. 
Pradesh - Lucknow: Off # 4,1st Floor,Centre Court Building, 3/C, 5 - Park Road,. 
Hazratganj, Lucknow 226001, Uttar Pradesh - Ludhiana: U/ GF, Prince Market, Green. 
Field Near Traffic Lights, Sarabha Nagar Pulli Pakhowal Road, Ludhiana 141002, Punjab -. 
Madurai: Cams Service Centre, # Ist Floor,278, North Perumal, Maistry Street (Nadar. 
Lane), Madurai 625001, Tamil Nadu - Mangalore: No. G 4 & G 5, Inland Monarch Opp. 
Karnataka Bank Kadri Main Road, Kadri, Mangalore 575003, Karnataka - Mapusa: Office 
no.CF-8, 1st Floor, Business Point, Above Bicholim Urban Co-Op Bank Ltd, Angod, 
Pajifond, Margao, Goa 403601- Meerut: 108 Ist Floor Shivam Plaza Opposite Eves. 
Cinema, Hapur Road, Meerut 250002, Uttar Pradesh - Mehsana: 1st Floor, Subhadra. 
Complex Urban Bank Road, Mehsana 384002, Gujarat - Moradabad: H 21-22, 1st. 
Floor,Ram Ganga Vihar Shopping Complex, Opposite Sales Tax Office,, Uttar Pradesh -. 
L.T. Road, Borivali West, Mumbai 400 092. - Mumbai - Ghatkopar: Office no. 307, 3rd. 
Rajabahdur Compound, Ground Floor Opp Allahabad Bank, Behind ICICI Bank 30, 
Mumbai Samachar Marg, Fort, Mumbai 400023, Maharashtra - Navi Mumbai:CAMS. 
Service Centre BSEL Tech Park, B-505, Plot no 39/5 & 39/5A, Sector 30A, Opp. Vashi. 
Railway Station, Vashi, Navi Mumbai - 400705- Muzaffarnagar 235, Patel Nagar,Near. 
Ramlila Ground,New Mandi,, Muzaffarnagar - 251001 - Muzzafarpur: Brahman toli, 
Durgasthan Gola Road, Muzaffarpur 842001, Bihar - Mysore: No.1, 1st Floor CH.26 7th. 
Main, 5th Cross (Above Trishakthi Medicals) Saraswati Puram, Mysore 570009, 
Karnataka - Nadiad: F 142, First Floor, Gantakaran Complex, Gunj Bazar, Nadiad 387001, 
Gujarat - Nagpur: 145 Lendra Park, Behind Indus Ind Bank New Ramdaspeth, Nagpur 
440010, Maharashtra - Nagercoil IV Floor, Kalluveettil Shyras Center 47, Court Road, 
Nagercoil - 629 001 - Nanded: Shop No.8 and 9 Cellar, Raj Mohd. complex, Main Road. 
Tilakwadi, Opp. Hotel City Pride,Sharanpur Road, Nasik 422005, Maharashtra - Navsari: 
CAMS Service Center,16, 1st Floor, Shivani Park, Opp. Shankheswar Complex, 
Kaliawadi, Navsari, Navasari 396445, Gujarat - Nagaland: House no. 436, Ground Floor, 
MM Apartment, Dr. Hokishe Sema Road, Near Bharat Petroleum, Lumthi Colony, 
Ranganayakulapet Road, Santhapet, Nellore 524001, Andhra Pradesh - New Delhi: 
Aggarwal Cyber Plaza-II, Commercial Unit no. 371, 3rd Floor, Plot No. C-7, Netaji Subhash. 
Barakhamba Road Cannaugt Place, New Delhi 110501, New Delhi -Nizamabad: CAMS. 
Service Centre, 5-6-208, Saraswathi Nagar, Opposite Dr. Bharathi Rani Nursing Home, 
Factory, Noida 201301, Uttar Pradesh - Palakkad: 10 / 688, Sreedevi Residency. 
Mettupalayam Street, Palakkad 678001, Kerala - Panipat: 83, Devi Lal Shopping. 
Complex Opp ABN Amro Bank, G.T. Road, Panipat 132103, Haryana - Patiala: 35 New. 
Lal Bagh, Opposite Polo Ground,Patiala 147001, Punjab - Patna: G-3, Ground Floor, Om. 
Vihar Complex, SP Verma Road, Patna 800001, Bihar - Pathankot: 13-A, 1st Floor, 
Gurjeet Market, Dhangu Road, Pathankot 145001, Punjab -Port Blair CAMS Service. 
Centre 1st Floor, Above Mahesh Graphics, Nandanam Complex, Beside Old CCS. 
Nehru Street (New Complex, Opp. Indian Coffee House), Pondicherry 605001, 
Pondichery - Pune: Vartak Pride, First Floor, Suvery No. 46, City Survey No. 1477, 
Hingne Budruk, D.P Road, Behind Dinanath Mangeshkar Hospital, Karvenagar, Pune - 
411052, Maharashtra -Raipur: HIG,C-23, Sector - 1, Devendra Nagar, Raipur 492004, 
Chattisgarh - Rajahmundry: Cabin 101 D.no 7-27-4 1st Floor Krishna Complex Baruvari. 
Street T Nagar, Rajahmundry 533101, Andhra Pradesh - Rajkot: Office 207 - 210, Everest. 
Building Harihar Chowk, Opp Shastri Maidan, Limda Chowk, Rajkot 360001, Gujarat -. 
Ranchi: 4, HB Road, No: 206, 2nd Floor Shri Lok Complex, Ranchi 834001, Jharkhand -. 
Rohtak: 205, 2ND Floor, Blg. No. 2, Munjal Complex, Delhi Road, Rohtak 124001, 
Haryana - Rourkela: JBS Market complex, 2nd Floor, Udit Nagar, Rourkela - 769012, 
Odisha - Saharanpur: I Floor, Krishna Complex Opp. Hathi Gate Court Road, Saharanpur 
247001, Uttar Pradesh - Salem: No.2, I Floor Vivekananda Street, New Fairlands, Salem 
636016, Tamil Nadu - Sambalpur: C/o Raj Tibrewal & Associates Opp.Town High. 
School, Sansarak, Sambalpur 768001, Orissa - Sangli: Jiveshwar Krupa Bldg, Shop. No. 
2, Ground Floor, Tilak Chowk, Harbhat Road, Sangli 416416, Contact No.: 0233-6600510 
1.Satna: 1st Floor, Shri Ram Market, Beside Hotel Pankaj, Birla Road, Satna 485001, 
Madhya Pradesh -Satara: 117 / A / 3 / 22, Shukrawar Peth Sargam Apartment, Satara 
415002, Maharashtra - Shillong: 3rd Floor, RPG Complex, Keating Road, Shillong 
793001, Meghalaya, Tel: (0364) 2502511 - Shimla: I Floor, Opp. Panchayat Bhawan Main 
gate Bus stand, Shimla 171001, Himachal Pradesh - Shimoga: Nethravathi Near Gutti. 
Nursing Home Kuvempu Road, Shimoga 577201, Karnataka - Sikar: Pawan Travels. 
Haren Mukherjee Road, Beside SBI Hakimpara, Siliguri - 734001, West Bengal - Solapur: 
4, Lokhandwala Tower, 144, Sidheshwar Peth, Near Z.P. Opp. Pangal High School, 
Solapur 413001, Maharashtra - Sriganganagar: 18 L Block, Sri Ganganagar 335001, 
Rajasthan - Srinagar: Near New Era Public School, Rajbagh, Srinagar 190008. Contact 
no. 0194-2311428. - 47/5/1, Raja Rammohan Roy Sarani, PO Mallickpara, Dist Hoogly, 
Sreerampur 712203 - Surat: Office No 2 Ahura -Mazda Complex First Floor, Sadak Street. 
Timalyawad, Nanpura, Surat 395001, Gujarat - Shop No. G-5, International Commerce. 
Center, Near Kadiwala School, Majura Gate, Ring Road, Surat , Gujarat- 395 002-Thane : 
3rd floor, Nalanda Chambers, B Wing, Gokhale Road, Near Hanuman Temple, Naupada, 
Thane (West) 400 062 - Thiruppur: 1(1), Binny Compound, II Street, Kumaran Road, 
Thiruppur 641601, Tamil Nadu - Thiruvalla: Central Tower,Above Indian Bank Cross. 
Junction, Tiruvalla 689101, Kerala - Tirunelveli: III Floor, Nellai Plaza 64-D, Madurai. 
Road, Tirunelveli 627001, Tamil Nadu - Tirunelvli: No. F4, Magnem Suraksha. 
Apartments, Thiruvananthapuram Road, Tirunelveli - 627 002, Kerala -Tirupathi: Shop. 
No: 6, Door No: 19-10-8 (Opp to Passport Office), AIR Bypass Road Tirupati - 517501, 
Andhra Pradesh, Tel: (0877) 6561003 - Trichur: Room No. 26 & 27,DEE PEE. 
PLAZA,Kokkalai, Trichur 680001, Kerala - Trichy: No 8, I Floor, 8th Cross West Extn. 
Thillainagar, Trichy 620018, Tamil Nadu - Trivandrum: R S Complex Opposite of LIC. 
Building Pattom PO, Trivandrum 695004, Kerala - Udaipur: 32, Ahinsapuri, Fatehpura 
Aries Complex, BPC Road, Off R.C. Dutt Road, Alkapuri, Vadodara 390007, Gujarat -. 
Valsad: Ground Floor Yash Kamal -B Near Dreamland Theater Tithal Road, Valsad 
396001, Gujarat - VAPI: 208, 2nd Floor, Heena Arcade, Opp. Tirupati Tower, Near. 
G.I.D.C., Char Rasata, Vapi 396195, Gujarat - Varanasi: Office no 1, Second floor, 
Bhawani Market, Building No. D-58/2-A1, Rathyatra, Beside Kuber Complex Varanasi - 
221010, Uttar Pradesh - Vellore: No.1, Officers Line, 2nd Floor, MNR Arcade, Opp. ICICI. 
Bank, Krishna Nagar, Vellore 632001, Tamil Nadu - Vijayawada: 40-1-68, Rao & Ratnam. 
Complex Near Chennupati Petrol Pump M.G Road, Labbipet, Vijayawada 520010, Andhra. 
Pradesh - Himachal Pradesh: 328/12, Ram Nagar, 1st Floor, Above Ram Traders, Mandi 
: 175001 - Visakhapatnam: Door No. 48-3-2, Flat No. 2, 1st Floor, Sidhi Plaza, Near. 
Mall, Near Old Bus Depot Road, F-7, 1st Floor, Ramnagar, Hanamkonda, Warangal 
506001, Andhra Pradesh - Yamuna Nagar: 124-B/R Model Town Yamunanagar, Yamuna. 
Mathigiri, Above Time Kids School, Opposite to Kuttys Frozen Foods, Hosur - 635 
TP Lite Centres 
1.Ahmednagar: B, 1+3, Krishna Encloave Complex, Near Hotel Natraj, Nagar-. 
Aurangabad Road, Ahmednagar 414001, Maharashtra - Basti: Office # 3, 1st Floor, 
Jamia Shopping Complex, Opp Pandey School, Station Road, Basti 272002, Uttar. 
Pradesh - Chhindwara: Office No - 1, Parasia Road, Near Mehta Colony, Chhindwara 
480001, Madhya Pradesh - Chittorgarh: CAMS Service centre, 3 Ashok Nagar,Near. 
Heera Vatika, Chittorgarh, Chittorgarh 312001, Rajasthan - Darbhanga: Shahi. 
Complex,1st Floor Near RB Memorial hospital,V.I.P. Road, Benta Laheriasarai, Darbhanga. 
Dharmapuri, Dharmapuri 636701, Tamil Nadu - Shop No 26 and 27, Door No. 39/265A 
and 39/265B, Second Floor, Skanda Shopping Mall, Old Chad Talkies, Vaddageri, 39th. 
Tower Garden, Dhule 424001, Maharashtra - Faizabad: Amar Deep Building, 3/20/14, 
IInd floor, Niyawan, Faizabad-224001- Gandhidham: Office No. 4,, Ground Floor, 
Pal Complex, Ist Floor Opp. City Bus Stop, SuperMarket, Gulbarga 585101, Karnataka -. 
Haldia: 2nd Floor, New Market Complex, Durgachak Post Office, Purba Medinipur. 
District, Haldia 721602, West Bengal - Haldwani: Durga City Centre, Nainital Road. 
Haldwani, Haldwani 263139, Uttaranchal - Himmatnagar: D-78 First Floor, New Durga. 
Bazar, Near Railway Crossing, Himmatnagar 383001, Gujarat - Hoshiarpur: Near Archies. 
Gallery Shimla Pahari Chowk, Hoshiarpur 146001, Punjab - Hosur: No.303, SIPCOT Staff. 
Housing Colony, Hosur 635126, Tamil Nadu - Jaunpur: 248, Fort Road, Near Amber. 
Hotel, Jaunpur 222001, Uttar Pradesh - Katni: 1st Floor, Gurunanak Dharmakanta, 
Jabalpur Road, Bargawan, Katni 483501, Madhya Pradesh - Khammam: Shop No: 11 - 2 
2. 31/3, 1st floor, Philips Complex, Balajinagar, Wyra Road, Near Baburao Petrol Bunk, 
Khammam 507001, Andhra Pradesh - Malda: Daxhinapan Abasan, Opp Lane of Hotel. 
Kalinga, SM Pally, Malda 732101, West Bengal - Manipal: CAMS Service Centre, 
Basement floor, Academy Tower, Opposite Corporation Bank, Manipal 576104, 
Karnataka - Mathura: 159/160 Vikas Bazar, Mathura 281001, Uttar Pradesh - Moga: 
Gandhi Road, Opp Union Bank of India, Moga 142001, Punjab - Namakkal: 156A / 1, First. 
Floor, Lakshmi Vilas Building Opp. To District Registrar Office, Trichy Road, Namakkal 
637001, Tamil Nadu - Palanpur: Gopal Trade Centre, Shop No. 13-14, 3rd Floor, Near BK. 
Mercantile Bank, Opp. Old Gunj, Palanpur 385001, Gujarat - Rae Bareli: No.17 Anand. 
Nagar Complex, Rae Bareli 229001, Uttar Pradesh - Rajapalayam: D. No. 59 A/1, Railway. 
Feeder Road Near Railway Station, Rajapalayam 626117, Tamil Nadu - Ratlam: Dafria &. 
Co 81, Bajaj Khanna, Ratlam 457001, Madhya Pradesh - Ratnagiri: Kohinoor Complex. 
Near Natya Theatre Nachane Road, Ratnagiri 415639, Maharashtra - Roorkee: Cams. 
Service Center, 22 Civil Lines Ground, Floor, Hotel Krish Residency, (Haridwar), Roorkee 
247667, Uttaranchal - Sagar: Opp. Somani Automobiles Bhagwanganj, Sagar 470002, 
Madhya Pradesh - Shahjahanpur: Bijlipura, Near Old Distt Hospital, Jail Road, 
Shahjahanpur 242001, Uttar Pradesh - - Sirsa: Bansal Cinema Market, Beside. 
Overbridge, Next to Nissan car showroom, Hissar Road, Sirsa 125055, Haryana -. 
Sitapur: Arya Nagar Near Arya Kanya School, Sitapur 262001, Uttar Pradesh - Solan: 1st. 
Floor, Above Sharma General Store Near Sanki Rest house The Mall, Solan 173212, 
Himachal Pradesh - Srikakulam: Door No 4-4-96, First Floor. Vijaya Ganapathi Temple. 
Back Side, Nanubala Street, Srikakulam 532001, Andhra Pradesh - Sultanpur: 967, Civil. 
Lines Near Pant Stadium, Sultanpur 228001, Uttar Pradesh - Surendranagar: 2 M I Park, 
Near Commerce College Wadhwan City, Surendranagar 363035, Gujarat - Tinsukia: 
Dhawal Complex, Ground Floor, Durgabari Rangagora Road, Near Dena Bank, PO. 
Tinsukia, Tinsukia 786125, Assam - Tuticorin: 4B / A-16 Mangal Mall Complex,Ground. 
Floor, Mani Nagar, Tuticorin 628003, Tamil Nadu - Ujjain: 123, 1st Floor, Siddhi. 
Vinanyaka Trade Centre,Saheed Park, Ujjain 456010, Madhya Pradesh - Vasco: No DU 8, 
Upper Ground Floor, Behind Techoclean Clinic, Suvidha Complex,Near ICICI Bank, Vasco. 
da gama 403802, Goa - Yavatmal: Pushpam, Tilakwadi, Opp. Dr. Shrotri Hospital, 
Yavatmal 445001, Maharashtra. 
In addition to the existing Official Point of Acceptance of transactions, Computer Age. 
Management Services Pvt. Ltd. (CAMS), the Registrar and Transfer Agent of ICICI. 
Prudential Mutual Fund, having its office at New No 10. Old No. 178, Opp. to Hotel Palm. 
Grove, MGR Salai (K.H.Road), Chennai - 600 034 shall be an official point of acceptance 
for electronic transactions received from the Channel Partners with whom ICICI. 
Prudential Asset Management Company Limited has entered or may enter into specific 
arrangements for all financial transactions relating to the units of mutual fund schemes. 
Additionally, the secure Internet sites operated by CAMS will also be official point of 
acceptance only for the limited purpose of all channel partners transactions based on 
agreements entered into between IPMF and such authorized entities. Additionally, the. 
Internet site(s) operated by the AMC and online applications of the AMC (including. 
Iprutouch) will also be official point of acceptance. The AMC also accepts applications 
received on designated FAX numbers. 
In addition to the existing Official Point of Acceptance of transactions, authorized Points 
of Service (POS) of MF Utilities India Private Limited (MFUI) shall be an official point of 
acceptance for all financial and non- financial transactions. The updated list of POS of. 
MFUI is available on www.mfuindia.com. The online transaction portal of MFU is 
www.mfuonline.com. Further, Investors can also subscribe units of the Scheme during 
the NFO Period by availing the platforms/facilities made available by the Stock. 
SCHEME INFORMATION DOCUMENT. . 
ICICI PRUDENTIAL BANK ETF. . 
(An open-ended Exchange Traded Fund tracking Nifty Bank Index). 
ICICI Prudential Bank ETF is suitable for investors who are seeking*: 
Long term wealth creation. 
An exchange traded fund that aims to provide 
returns that closely correspond to the returns 
provided by Nifty Bank Index, subject to 
tracking error. 
Continuous Offer of Units at NAV based prices on an on-going basis. 
INVESTMENT MANAGER. . 
Name of Asset Management Company: ICICI Prudential Asset Management Company. 
Corporate Identity Number: U99999DL1993PLC054135. 
website:www.icicipruamc.com, 
email id: enquiry@icicipruamc.com. 
Name of Trustee Company: ICICI Prudential Trust Limited. 
Corporate Identity Number: U74899DL1993PLC054134. 
The particulars of ICICI Prudential Bank ETF (the Scheme) has been prepared in 
accordance with the Securities and Exchange Board of India (Mutual Funds) Regulations 
1996, (hereinafter referred to as SEBI (MF) Regulations) as amended till date, and filed 
with SEBI, along with a Due Diligence Certificate from the AMC. The units being offered 
for public subscription have not been approved or recommended by SEBI nor has SEBI 
certified the accuracy or adequacy of the Scheme Information Document (SID). 
The Scheme Information Document (SID) sets forth concisely the information about the. 
Scheme that a prospective investor ought to know before investing. Before investing, 
investors should also ascertain about any further changes pertaining to the Scheme 
such as features, load structure, etc. made to this SID by issue of addenda / notice after. 
Centres/Website/Distributors or Brokers. 
The investors are advised to refer to the Statement of Additional Information (SAI) for 
details of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund, Tax and Legal issues and general information on 
www.icicipruamc.com. 
SAI is incorporated by reference (is legally a part of the Scheme Information Document). 
For a free copy of the current SAI, please contact your nearest Investor Service Centre or 
log on to our website. 
The SID should be read in conjunction with the SAI and not in isolation. 
This Scheme Information Document is dated July 15, 2019. 
Disclaimer of BSE Limited: 
BSE Limited (the Exchange) has given vide its letter dated April 08, 2019 permission 
to ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund to use the Exchanges name in this SID as one of the. 
Stock Exchanges on which this Mutual Funds Units are proposed to be listed. The. 
Exchange has scrutinized this SID for its limited internal purpose of deciding on the 
matter of granting the aforesaid permission to ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund. The. 
Exchange does not in any manner:- 
i.     warrant, certify or endorse the correctness or completeness of any of the contents 
of this SID. or 
ii)    warrant that this schemes unit will be listed or will continue to be listed on the. 
iii)   take any responsibility for the financial or other soundness of this Mutual fund, its 
promoters, its management or any scheme or project of this Mutual Fund. 
and it should not for any reason be deemed or construed that this SID has been cleared 
or approved by the Exchange. Every person who desires to apply for or otherwise 
acquires any unit of ICICI Prudential Bank ETF of this Mutual Fund may do so pursuant to 
independent inquiry, investigation and analysis and shall not have any claim against the. 
Exchange whatsoever by reason of any loss which may be suffered by such person 
consequent to or in connection with such subscription/acquisition whether by reason of 
anything stated or omitted to be stated herein or for any reason whatsoever. 
Disclaimer of National Stock Exchange of India Limited: 
As required, a copy of this Scheme Information Document has been submitted to. 
National Stock Exchange of India Limited (hereinafter referred to as NSE). NSE has given 
vide its letter NSE/LIST/5129 dated April 08, 2019 permission to the Mutual Fund to use 
the Exchanges name in this Scheme Information Document as one of the stock 
exchanges on which the Mutual Funds units are proposed to be listed subject to, the. 
Mutual Fund fulfilling various criteria for listing. The Exchange has scrutinized this. 
Scheme Information Document for its limited internal purpose of deciding on the matter 
of granting the aforesaid permission to the Mutual Fund. It is to be distinctly understood 
that the aforesaid permission given by NSE should not in any way be deemed or 
construed that the Scheme Information Document has been cleared or approved by. 
NSE. nor does it in any manner warrant, certify or endorse the correctness or 
completeness of any of the contents of this Scheme Information Document. nor does it 
warrant that the Mutual Funds units will be listed or will continue to be listed on the. 
Exchange. nor does it take any responsibility for the financial or other soundness of the. 
Mutual Fund, its sponsors, its management or any scheme of the Mutual Fund. 
Every person who desires to apply for or otherwise acquire any units of the Mutual Fund 
may do so pursuant to independent inquiry, investigation and analysis and shall not have 
any claim against the Exchange whatsoever by reason of any loss which may be 
suffered by such person consequent to or in connection with such subscription 
/acquisition whether by reason of anything stated or omitted to be stated herein or any 
other reason whatsoever. 
Disclaimer of NSE Indices Limited (NSE Indices): 
The Product(s) are not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by NSE Indices Limited (. 
NSE Indices). NSE Indices does not make any representation or warranty, express or 
implied, to the owners of the Product(s) or any member of the public regarding the 
advisability of investing in securities generally or in the Product(s) particularly or the 
ability of the Nifty Bank Index to track general stock market performance in India. The 
relationship of NSE Indices to the Issuer is only in respect of the licensing of certain 
trademarks and trade names of its Index which is determined, composed and calculated 
by NSE Indices without regard to the Issuer or the Product(s). NSE Indices does not have 
any obligation to take the needs of the Issuer or the owners of the Product(s) into 
consideration in determining, composing or calculating the Nifty Bank Index. NSE. 
Indices is not responsible for or has participated in the determination of the timing of, 
prices at, or quantities of the Product(s) to be issued or in the determination or 
calculation of the equation by which the Product(s) is to be converted into cash. NSE. 
Indices has no obligation or liability in connection with the administration, marketing or 
trading of the Product(s). 
NSE Indices do not guarantee the accuracy and/or the completeness of the Nifty Bank. 
Index or any data included therein and they shall have no liability for any errors, 
omissions, or interruptions therein. NSE Indices does not make any warranty, express or 
implied, as to results to be obtained by the Issuer, owners of the product(s), or any other 
person or entity from the use of the Nifty Bank Index or any data included therein. NSE. 
Indices makes no express or implied warranties, and expressly disclaim all warranties of 
merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose or use with respect to the index or any 
data included therein. Without limiting any of the foregoing, NSE Indices expressly 
disclaim any and all liability for any damages or losses arising out of or related to the. 
Products, including any and all direct, special, punitive, indirect, or consequential 
damages (including lost profits), even if notified of the possibility of such damages. 
TABLE OF CONTENTS. . 
ABBREVIATIONS. 5. . 
HIGHLIGHTS/SUMMARY OF THE SCHEME . 6. . 
I. INTRODUCTION . 9. . 
A. RISK FACTORS . 9. . 
B. REQUIREMENT OF MINIMUM INVESTORS IN THE SCHEME . 17. . 
C. SPECIAL CONSIDERATIONS, if any . 17. 
D. DEFINITIONS . 18. . 
E. DUE DILIGENCE BY THE ASSET MANAGEMENT COMPANY . 22. . 
II. INFORMATION ABOUT THE SCHEME . 23. . 
A. TYPE OF THE SCHEME . 23. . 
B. WHAT IS THE INVESTMENT OBJECTIVE OF THE SCHEME? . 23. . 
C. HOW WILL THE SCHEME ALLOCATE ITS ASSETS? . 23. . 
D. WHERE WILL THE SCHEME INVEST? . 24. . 
E. WHAT ARE THE INVESTMENT STRATEGIES? . 30. . 
F: FUNDAMENTAL ATTRIBUTES . 36. . 
G. HOW WILL THE SCHEME BENCHMARK ITS PERFORMANCE? . 37. . 
H. WHO MANAGES THE SCHEME? . 37. . 
I. WHAT ARE THE INVESTMENT RESTRICTIONS? . 38. . 
J. HOW HAS THE SCHEME PERFORMED?. 40. . 
K. ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES . 40. . 
L. HOW IS THE SCHEME IS DIFFERENT FROM OTHER SCHEMES . 40. . 
III. UNITS AND OFFER . 46. . 
A. NEW FUND OFFER DETAILS . Error! Bookmark not defined. 
B. ONGOING OFFER DETAILS . 46. . 
C. PERIODIC DISCLOSURES . 60. . 
D. COMPUTATION OF NAV: . 64. . 
IV. FEES AND EXPENSES . 65. . 
A. NEW FUND OFFER (NFO) EXPENSES . 65. . 
B. ANNUAL SCHEME RECURRING EXPENSES . 65. . 
C. LOAD STRUCTURE . 67. . 
D. WAIVER OF LOAD FOR DIRECT APPLICATIONS. 69. . 
V. RIGHTS OF UNITHOLDERS . 69. . 
VI. PENALTIES, PENDING LITIGATION OR PROCEEDINGS, FINDINGS OF INSPECTIONS. . 
OR INVESTIGATIONS FOR WHICH ACTION MAY HAVE BEEN TAKEN OR IS IN THE. . 
PROCESS OF BEING TAKEN BY ANY REGULATORY AUTHORITY . 69. . 
AMC                              ICICI Prudential Asset Management Company Limited. 
AML                              Anti Money Laundering. 
BSE                              BSE Limited. 
DP                               Depository Participant. 
FPI                              Foreign Portfolio Investors. 
NAV                              Net Asset Value. 
NSE                              National Stock Exchange of India Limited. 
NRI                              Non-Resident Indian. 
SID                              Scheme Information Document. 
RBI                              Reserve Bank of India. 
IMA                              Investment Management Agreement. 
Regulations, 1996, as amended from time to time. 
For all purposes of this SID, except as otherwise expressly provided or unless the 
context otherwise requires: 
The terms defined in this SID include the plural as well as the singular. 
Pronouns having a masculine or feminine gender shall be deemed to include the. 
All references to US$ refer to United States Dollars and Rs./INR/ ` refer to. 
Indian Rupees. A Crore means ten million and a Lakh means a hundred 
Words not defined here has the same meaning as defined in The Regulations. 
HIGHLIGHTS/SUMMARY OF THE SCHEME. . 
Name of the Scheme ICICI Prudential Bank ETF. 
Type of the Scheme An open-ended Exchange Traded Fund tracking Nifty Bank Index. 
underlying index subject to tracking errors. 
However, there can be no assurance or guarantee that the 
investment objective of the Scheme would be achieved. 
BSE Limited and National Stock Exchange of India Limited (NSE). 
Buying or selling of units of the Scheme by investors can be 
done on all the Trading Days of the stock exchanges. The 
minimum number of units that can be bought or sold is 1 (one). 
Directly with the Fund: Authorised Participant(s)/ Investor(s) can 
subscribe/redeem the units of the Scheme directly with the Fund 
only in creation unit size i.e. 10,000 units and in multiples thereof. 
The subscription & redemption of units would be based on the 
portfolio deposit & cash component as defined by the Fund for 
that respective business day. The Fund may allow cash 
purchases/cash redemption of the units of the Scheme or by 
depositing basket of securities comprising the underlying index 
in Creation Unit Size by Authorised Participant(s)/ Investor(s). 
Purchase/redemption request shall be made by such investors to 
the Fund whereupon the Fund shall arrange to buy/sell the 
underlying portfolio of securities on behalf of the investor. In 
case of shares bought and sold by the AMC on behalf of the 
investor, entire proceeds of portfolio deposit and other cost and 
charges related to the purchase and sale of basket of underlying 
securities for servicing the subscription or redemption 
transaction would be borne by the investor. 
Investors, other than Authorised Participants, can sell units in less 
than Creation Unit Size of the Scheme directly to the Mutual Fund 
without any exit load in the certain cases. Kindly refer to the 
section Load Structure for more details. 
Nifty Bank Index. 
For more details on the benchmark, kindly refer Information on. 
Nifty Bank Index. 
schemes under a separate head on the AMCs website and on 
the website of AMFI. NAV will be determined on every Business. 
Day except in special circumstances. NAV of the Scheme shall be 
made available at all Customer Service Centres of the AMC. 
AMC shall update the NAV on the website of Association of. 
Mutual Funds in India - AMFI (www.amfiindia.com) and AMC 
website (www.icicipruamc.com) by 9.00 p.m. on every business 
day. In case of any delay, the reasons for such delay would be 
explained to AMFI and SEBI by the next day. If the NAVs are not 
available before commencement of business hours on the 
following day due to any reason, the Fund shall issue a press 
release providing reasons and explaining when the Fund would 
be able to publish the NAVs. 
The AMC shall disclose portfolio of the scheme (along with ISIN) 
as on the last day of the month / half-year on AMCs website i.e. 
www.icicipruamc.com and on the website of AMFI within 10 days 
from the close of each month / half-year respectively. Since the. 
Scheme is a new scheme, Top 10 holdings and sector wise 
holdings are not available. 
The AMC shall publish an advertisement in all India edition of at 
least two daily newspapers, one each in English and Hindi, every 
half year disclosing the hosting of the half-yearly statement of the 
schemes portfolio on the AMCs website and on the website of. 
The AMC shall send via email both the monthly and half-yearly 
statement of scheme portfolio within 10 days from the close of 
each month / half-year respectively. The unitholders whose e- 
mail addresses are not registered with the Fund are requested to 
update / provide their email address to the Fund for updating the. 
The AMC shall provide a physical copy of the statement of 
scheme portfolio, without charging any cost, on specific request 
received from a unit holder. 
In terms of circular no. SEBI/IMD/CIR No. 4/168230/09 dated June 
30, 2009, SEBI has notified that, w.e.f. August 01, 2009 there will 
be no entry load charged to the schemes of the Fund and the 
upfront commission to distributors will be paid by the investor 
directly to the distributor, based on his assessment of various 
factors including the service rendered by the distributor. 
Exit Load. 
There will be no exit load for units sold through the secondary 
market on the stock exchanges where the Scheme will be listed. 
Currently, the Scheme is listed on BSE and NSE. Investors shall 
note that the brokerage on sales of the units of the scheme on 
the stock exchanges shall be borne by the investors. 
Redemption of units can be made directly with the Fund in 
creation unit size. Currently there is no exit load applicable for the 
said transactions. 
For more details on Loads, please refer section on Load. 
for     Application/ in round lot of 1 unit and in multiples thereof. 
An investor can buy/ sell units on a continuous basis in the 
normal market segment of National Stock Exchange of India. 
Limited (NSE)/ BSE Limited or any other stock exchange where 
the Scheme will be listed, during the trading hours like any other 
publicly traded stock at prices which are quoted on the stock 
exchanges. These prices may be close to the actual NAV of the. 
Scheme. There is no minimum investment, although units are to 
be purchased in lots of 1 (one) unit. 
Directly with the Mutual Fund: Authorised Participant(s)/. 
Investor(s) can buy/sell units of the Scheme in Creation Unit Size 
viz. 10,000 units and in multiples thereof. 
For more details of the Underlying Index, refer section on. 
Information on Nifty Bank Index. 
ongoing basis and would seek to minimize tracking error to the 
maximum extent possible. Under normal circumstances, the. 
AMC will endeavour that the tracking error of the Scheme does 
not exceed 2% per annum. However, this may vary due to 
various reasons mentioned below or any other reasons that may 
arise and particularly when the markets are very volatile. 
For more details on Tracking Error, kindly refer Tracking Error. 
Risk under Scheme Specific Risk Factors. 
I. INTRODUCTION. . 
A. RISK FACTORS. . 
Standard Risk Factors: 
Investment in Mutual Fund Units involve investment risks such as trading volumes, 
settlement risks, liquidity risks, default risks, including the possible loss of principal. 
Mutual Funds and securities investments are subject to market risks and there is no 
assurance or guarantee that the objectives of the Scheme will be achieved. 
As the price/value/interest rates of the securities in which the Scheme invests 
fluctuates, the value of your investements in the Scheme may go up or down. 
The past performance of the mutual funds managed by the Sponsors / Mutual Fund /. 
Asset Management Company and their affiliates/associates does not guarantee 
future performance of the Scheme. 
The name of the Scheme and do not in any manner indicate either the quality of the. 
Scheme or its future prospects and returns. 
The Sponsors are not responsible or liable for any loss resulting from the operation 
of the Scheme beyond the contribution of an amount of Rs. 22.2 lakhs collectively 
made by them towards setting up the Fund and such other accretions and additions 
to the corpus set up by the Sponsors. 
The present scheme is not a guranteed scheme or assured return scheme. 
The Scheme is an Exchange Traded Fund (ETF).There can be no assurance that an 
active secondary market will develop or be maintained. 
The NAV of the Scheme may be affected by changes in the general level of interest 
rates and trading volumes. 
The NAV of the Scheme may be affected by settlement periods and transfer. 
In the event of receipt of inordinately large number of redemption requests or of a 
restructuring of the Schemes portfolios, there may be delays in the redemption of. 
The Liquidity of the Schemes investments is inherently restricted by trading. 
Investors in the Scheme are not being offered any guaranteed returns. 
Mutual funds being vehicles of securities investments are subject to market and 
other risks and there can be no guarantee against loss resulting from investing in the. 
Scheme. The various factors which impact the value of the Schemes investments 
include, but are not limited to, fluctuations in interest rates, prevailing political and 
economic environment, changes in government policy, factors specific to the issuer 
of the securities, tax laws, liquidity of the underlying instruments, settlement periods, 
trading volumes etc. 
Investment decisions made by the AMC may not always be profitable. 
From time to time and subject to the Regulations, the Sponsors, the Mutual Funds 
and investment companies managed by them, their affiliates, their associate 
companies, subsidiaries of the Sponsors, and the AMC may invest either directly or 
indirectly in any or all the Schemes. The funds managed by these affiliates, 
associates, the Sponsors, subsidiaries of the Sponsors and /or the AMC may acquire 
a substantial portion of the Schemes Units and collectively constitute a major 
investor in the Scheme. Accordingly, redemption of Units held by such funds, 
affiliates/associates and Sponsors might have an adverse impact on the Units of the. 
Scheme because the timing of such redemption may impact the ability of other Unit 
holders to redeem their Units. 
Further, as per the Regulation, in case the AMC invests in any of the Schemes 
managed by it, it shall not be entitled to charge any fees on such investments. 
The Scheme may invest in other schemes managed by the AMC or in the schemes of 
any other Mutual Funds, provided it is in conformity with the investment objective of 
the Scheme and in terms of the prevailing Regulations. As per the Regulations, no 
investment management fees will be charged for such investments and the 
aggregate inter-scheme investment made by all Schemes of the Fund or in Schemes 
under the management of other asset management companies shall not exceed 5% 
of the Net Asset Value of the Mutual Fund. 
Scheme Specific Risk Factors: 
1. Risks associated with investing in Equities. 
The value of the Schemes investments, may be affected generally by factors affecting 
securities markets, such as trading volumes, settlement periods and transfer procedures, 
price and volume volatility in the capital markets, interest rates, currency exchange rates, 
changes in policies of the Governments, taxation laws or any other appropriate authority 
policies and other political and economic developments which may have an adverse 
bearing on individual securities, a specific sector or all sectors including equity and debt 
markets. Consequently, the NAV of the Units of the Scheme may fluctuate and can go 
up or down. 
Market Risk. 
The Schemes NAV will react to the stock market movements. The Investors could lose 
money over short periods due to fluctuation in the Schemes NAV in response to factors 
such as economic and political developments, changes in interest rates and perceived 
trends in stock prices and market movements, and over longer periods during market. 
Absence of Prior Active Market: Although units of the Scheme are to be listed on the. 
Exchanges, there can be no assurance that an active secondary market will develop 
or be maintained. 
Lack of Market Liquidity: Trading in units of the respective Scheme on the Exchange 
may be halted because of market conditions or for reasons that in the view of the. 
Market Authorities or SEBI, trading in units of the Scheme are not advisable. In 
addition, trading in units of the Scheme is subject to trading halts caused by 
extraordinary market volatility and pursuant to BSE/NSE and SEBI circuit filter 
rules. There can be no assurance that the requirements of the Market necessary to 
maintain the listing of units of the Scheme will continue to be met or will remain. 
Units of the Scheme may trade at Prices Other than NAV: Units of the Scheme may 
trade above or below its NAV. The NAV of the Scheme will fluctuate with changes in 
the market value of Schemes holdings. The trading prices of units of the Scheme will 
fluctuate in accordance with changes in their NAVs as well as market supply and 
demand of units of the Scheme. However, given that units can be created and 
redeemed only in Creation Units directly with the Fund, it is expected that large. 
discounts or premiums to the NAVs of the Scheme will not sustain due to arbitrage 
possibility available. 
Regulatory Risk: Any changes in trading regulations by the Stock Exchange/s or SEBI 
may affect the ability of market maker to arbitrage resulting into wider premium/ 
discount to NAV. Although, the units are listed on BSE and NSE, the AMC and the. 
Trustees will not be liable for delay in listing of Units of the Scheme on the stock 
exchanges / or due to connectivity problems with the depositories and/or due to the 
occurrence of any event beyond their control. 
Settlement Risk: In certain cases, settlement periods may be extended significantly 
by unforeseen circumstances. The inability of the Scheme to make intended 
securities purchases due to settlement problems could cause the Scheme to miss 
certain investment opportunities as in certain cases, settlement periods may be 
extended significantly by unforeseen circumstances. Similarly, the inability to sell 
securities held in the Scheme portfolio may result, at times, in potential losses to the. 
Scheme, and there can be a subsequent decline in the value of the securities held in 
the Schemes portfolio. 
Portfolio Concentration Risk. 
To the extent that the Scheme may concentrate its investments in the Securities of 
companies of certain sectors, the Scheme will therefore be subject to the risks 
associated with such concentration. In addition, the Scheme may be exposed to higher 
levels of volatility and risk than would generally be the case in a more diverse fund 
portfolio of equity Securities. Such risks may impact the Scheme to the extent that it 
invests in particular sectors even in cases where the investment objective is more. 
The equity markets and derivative markets are volatile and the value of securities, 
derivative contracts and other instruments correlated with the equity markets may 
fluctuate dramatically from day to day. This volatility may cause the value of investment 
in the Scheme to decrease. 
Redemption Risk. 
Investors should note that even though the Scheme is an open ended Scheme, 
subscription/redemptions directly with the Fund would be limited to such investors who 
have the ability to subscribe/redeem the units of the Scheme in the creation unit size. 
Generally, this lot size is larger as compared to normal funds. However, investors 
wishing to subscribe/redeem units in other than specific lot size can do so by 
buying/selling the same on the Stock Exchange. Investors can also approach the Fund 
directly for redemption in other than Creation Unit Size on occurrence of various events 
as listed in this document. 
Passive Investments. 
The Scheme is a passively managed scheme and may be affected by a general decline in 
the Indian markets relating to its Underlying Index. The Scheme invests in the securities 
included in its Underlying Index regardless of their investment merit. The AMC does not 
attempt to individually select stocks or to take defensive positions in declining markets. 
Tracking Error Risk. 
Factors such as the fees and expenses of the Scheme, corporate actions, cash balance, 
changes to the Underlying Index and regulatory policies may affect the AMCs ability to 
achieve close correlation with the Underlying Index of the Scheme. The Schemes 
returns may therefore deviate from those of their Underlying Index. Tracking Error is 
defined as the standard deviation of the difference between daily returns of the index 
and the NAV of the Scheme. Tracking Error may arise due to the following reasons: -. 
Expenditure incurred by the Scheme. 
Any delay experienced in the purchase or sale of shares due to illiquidity of the 
market, settlement and realization of sale proceeds and the registration of any 
securities transferred and any delays in receiving cash and dividends and resulting 
delays in reinvesting them. 
Securities trading may halt temporarily due to circuit filters. 
The underlying index reflects the prices of securities at close of business hours. 
However, the Fund may buy or sell the securities at different points of time during 
the trading session at the then prevailing prices which may not correspond to the 
closing prices on the exchange. 
Index Service Provider undertakes the periodical review of the scrips that comprise 
the underlying index and may either drop or include new securities. In such an event, 
the Fund will endeavor to reallocate its portfolio but the available investment/ 
disinvestment opportunities may not permit precise mirroring of the Index. 
The potential for trades to fail which may result in the Scheme not having acquired 
shares at a price necessary to track the index. 
The holding of a cash position (0-5% of the Net Assets to meet the redemptions and 
other liquidity requirements) and accrued income prior to distribution and accrued. 
Disinvestments to meet redemptions, recurring expenses, dividend payouts etc. 
Under normal circumstances, such tracking errors are not expected to exceed 2% per 
annum. However, this may vary due to the reasons mentioned above or any other 
reasons that may arise and particularly when the markets are very volatile. The AMC 
would monitor the tracking error of the Scheme on an ongoing basis and would seek to 
minimize tracking error to the maximum extent possible. 
1.   Interest Rate risk: This risk is associated with movements in interest rate, which 
depend on various factors such as government borrowing, inflation, economic 
performance etc. The values of investments will appreciate/depreciate if the interest 
rates fall/rise. 
2.   Credit risk: This risk arises due to any uncertainty in counterpartys ability or 
willingness to meet its contractual obligations. This risk pertains to the risk of default 
of payment of principal and interest. 
3.   Liquidity risk: The liquidity of a security may change depending on market conditions 
leading to changes in the liquidity premium linked to the price of the security. At the 
time of selling the security, the security can become illiquid leading to loss in the 
value of the portfolio. 
3. Risks associated with investing in ADR/ GDR/ Foreign securities: 
The Scheme will not invest in ADR/GDR/Foreign securities. 
4. Risks associated with investing in Derivatives: 
The Schemes may use various derivative products as permitted by the Regulations. 
Use of derivatives requires an understanding of not only the underlying instrument 
but also of the derivative itself. Other risks include the risk of mis-pricing or improper 
valuation and the inability of derivatives to correlate perfectly with underlying assets, 
rates and indices. 
The Scheme may use derivatives instruments like Stock Index Futures or other 
derivative instruments for the purpose of hedging and portfolio balancing, as 
permitted under the Regulations and guidelines. Usage of derivatives will expose the. 
Schemes to certain risks inherent to such derivatives. 
Derivative products are leveraged instruments and can provide disproportionate 
gains as well as disproportionate losses to the investor. Execution of such strategies 
depends upon the ability of the fund manager to identify such opportunities. 
Identification and execution of the strategies to be pursued by the fund manager 
involve uncertainty and decision of fund manager may not always be profitable. No 
assurance can be given that the fund manager will be able to identify or execute such. 
Thus, derivatives are highly leveraged instruments. Even a small price movement in 
the underlying security could have a large impact on their value. Also, the market for 
derivative instruments is nascent in India. 
The specific risk factors arising out of a derivative strategy used by the Fund Manager 
may be as below: 
Lack of opportunity available in the market. 
The risk of mispricing or improper valuation and the inability of derivatives to 
correlate perfectly with underlying assets, rates and indices. 
Execution Risk: The prices which are seen on the screen need not be the same at 
which execution will take place. 
The Scheme will not have any exposure to Debt Derivatives. Please refer section on. 
Derivatives for further details. 
5. Risks associated with investing in securitzed debt: 
The Scheme will not invest in securitized debt. 
6. Risks associated with Short Selling. 
7. Risks associated with Securities Lending and Borrowing: 
The Scheme may engage in Securities Lending activity. 
Securities lending is lending of securities through an approved intermediary to a 
borrower under an agreement for a specified period with the condition that the borrower 
will return equivalent securities of the same type or class at the end of the specified 
period along with the corporate benefits accruing on the securities borrowed. 
The risks in security lending consist of the failure of intermediary / counterparty, to 
comply with the terms of agreement entered into between the lender of securities i.e. the. 
Scheme and the intermediary / counterparty. Such failure to comply can result in the 
possible loss of rights in the collateral put up by the borrower of the securities, the 
inability of the approved intermediary to return the securities deposited by the lender 
and the possible loss of any corporate benefits accruing to the lender from the securities 
deposited with the approved intermediary. The scheme may not be able to sell lent out 
securities, which can lead to temporary illiquidity & loss of opportunity. 
Investors are requested to refer to section How will the Scheme allocate its assets? for 
maximum permissible exposure to Securities Lending. 
The AMC shall report to the Trustee on a quarterly basis as to the level of lending in 
terms of value, volume and the names of the intermediaries and the earnings/losses 
arising out of the transactions, the value of collateral security offered etc. The Trustees 
shall offer their comments on the above aspect in the report filed with SEBI under sub- 
regulation 23(a) of Regulation 18. 
8. Risks associated with investing in Tri Party Repo through CCIL (TREPS): 
The mutual fund is a member of securities segment and Tri-party Repo trade 
settlement of the Clearing Corporation of India (CCIL). All transactions of the 
mutual fund in government securities and in Tri-party Repo trades are settled 
centrally through the infrastructure and settlement systems provided by CCIL. 
thus reducing the settlement and counterparty risks considerably for transactions 
in the said segments. 
CCIL maintains prefunded resources in all the clearing segments to cover 
potential losses arising from the default member. In the event of a clearing 
member failing to honour his settlement obligations, the default Fund is utilized to 
complete the settlement. The sequence in which the above resources are used is 
known as the Default Waterfall. 
As per the waterfall mechanism, after the defaulters margins and the defaulters 
contribution to the default fund have been appropriated, CCILs contribution is 
used to meet the losses. Post utilization of CCILs contribution if there is a residual 
loss, it is appropriated from the default fund contributions of the non-defaulting. 
Thus the scheme is subject to risk of the initial margin and default fund 
contribution being invoked in the event of failure of any settlement obligations. In 
addition, the fund contribution is allowed to be used to meet the residual loss in 
case of default by the other clearing member (the defaulting member). 
However, it may be noted that a member shall have the right to submit 
resignation from the membership of the Security segment if it has taken a loss 
through replenishment of its contribution to the default fund for the segments 
and a loss threshold as notified have been reached. The maximum contribution. 
of a member towards replenishment of its contribution to the default fund in the 7 
days (30 days in case of securities segment) period immediately after the afore- 
mentioned loss threshold having been reached shall not exceed 5 times of its 
contribution to the Default Fund based on the last re-computation of the Default. 
Fund or specified amount, whichever is lower. 
Further, it may be noted that, CCIL periodically prescribes a list of securities 
eligible for contributions as collateral by members. Presently, all Central. 
Government securities and Treasury bills are accepted as collateral by CCIL. The 
risk factors may undergo change in case the CCIL notifies securities other than. 
Government of India securities as eligible for contribution as collateral. 
RISK MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES. . 
The Fund by utilizing a holistic risk management strategy will endeavor to manage risks 
associated with investing in equity markets. The risk control process involves identifying 
& measuring the risk through various risk measurement tools. 
Risks associated with Equity investment. 
Market Risk. 
Scheme. The value of the underlying. 
Scheme investments, may be affected 
generally by factors affecting securities 
markets, such as price and volume, volatility 
in the capital markets, interest rates, currency 
exchange rates, changes in policies of the. 
Government, taxation laws or any other 
appropriate authority policies and other 
political and economic developments which 
may have an adverse bearing on individual 
securities, a specific sector or all sectors 
including equity and debt markets. 
the underlying stocks. 
risk):                                              Concentration risk): 
Scheme are to closely track the 
performance of the Underlying Index. 
Risk and Description. 
Risks associated with Equity investment. 
As and when the Scheme trades in the 
derivatives market there are risk factors and 
issues concerning the use of derivatives 
since derivative products are specialized 
techniques and risk analyses different from 
those associated with stocks and bonds. 
Risks associated with Debt investment. 
Market Risk/ Interest Rate Risk. 
As with all debt securities, changes in 
interest rates may affect the Schemes Net. 
Asset Value as the prices of securities 
generally increase as interest rates decline 
and generally decrease as interest rates 
rise. Prices of long-term securities generally 
fluctuate more in response to interest rate 
changes than do short-term securities. 
Indian debt markets can be volatile leading 
to the possibility of price movements up or 
down in fixed income securities and 
thereby to possible movements in the NAV. 
Liquidity or Marketability Risk. 
This refers to the ease with which a security 
can be sold at or near to its valuation yield- 
to-maturity (YTM). 
Credit Risk. 
Credit risk or default risk refers to the risk 
that an issuer of a fixed income security 
may default (i.e., will be unable to make 
timely principal and interest payments on 
the security). 
Risk mitigants / management strategy 
over the same period, subject to 
tracking error. The Scheme would 
endeavor to maintain a low tracking 
error by actively aligning the portfolio 
in line with the Index. 
Derivatives will be used in the form of. 
Index Options, Index Futures and 
other Instruments as may be 
permitted by SEBI. All derivatives 
trade will be done only on the 
exchange with guaranteed settlement. 
No OTC contracts will be entered into. 
The Scheme may invest only in 
money market instruments having a 
residual maturity upto 91 days 
volatility due to interest rate 
changes generally associated with 
long-term securities. 
The Scheme may invest only in 
government securities and money 
market instruments. The liquidity 
risk for government securities, 
money market instruments is 
generally low. 
Management analysis will be used 
for identifying company specific 
risks. Managements past track 
record will also be studied. In order 
to assess financial risk a detailed 
assessment of the issuers financial 
statements will be undertaken to 
review its ability to undergo stress 
on cash flows and asset quality. A 
detailed evaluation of accounting 
comments and disclosure standards 
will also be made to assess the 
overall financial risk of the potential. 
B. REQUIREMENT OF MINIMUM INVESTORS IN THE SCHEME. . 
Investors in the Scheme are not being offered any guaranteed returns. 
Investors are advised to consult their Legal /Tax and other Professional Advisors 
in regard to tax/legal implications relating to their investments in the Scheme and 
before making decision to invest in or redeem the Units. 
Investors are urged to study the terms of the SID carefully before investing in the. 
Scheme, and to retain this SID for future reference. 
The Mutual Fund/AMC have not authorised any person to give any information or 
make any representations, either oral or written, not stated in this SID in 
connection with issue of Units under the Scheme. Prospective investors are 
advised not to rely upon any information or representations not incorporated in 
this SID as the same have not been authorised by the Mutual Fund or the AMC. 
Any subscription, purchase or sale made by any person on the basis of 
statements or representations which are not contained in this SID or which are 
inconsistent with the information contained herein shall be solely at the risk of 
the investor. 
Suspicious Transaction Reporting: If after due diligence, the AMC believes that 
any transaction is suspicious in nature as regards money laundering, the AMC 
shall report any such suspicious transactions to competent authorities under. 
PMLA and rules / guidelines issued there under by SEBI and / or RBI, furnish of 
any such information in connection therewith to such authorities and take any 
other actions as may be required for the purposes of fulfilling its obligations 
under PMLA and rules / guidelines issued there under by SEBI and / or RBI 
without obtaining the prior approval of the investor / Unit Holder / any other. 
The AMC is also engaged in portfolio management services (PMS) since October 
2000 under SEBI Registration No. INP000000373. The AMC is also rendering. 
Advisory Services to SEBI registered foreign portfolio investors (FPIs) and their 
sub-accounts. The AMC is also providing investment management services to. 
Alternative Investment Funds registered under SEBI (Alternative Investment. 
Funds) Regulations, 2012. The AMC has a common research team. These 
activities are not in conflict with the activities of the Mutual Fund. In the situations 
of unavoidable conflicts of interest, the AMC undertakes that it shall satisfy itself 
that adequate disclosures are made of sources of conflict, potential material risk 
or damage to investor interest and develop parameters for the same. 
The Mutual Fund may disclose details of the investors account and transactions 
thereunder to those intermediaries whose stamp appears on the application 
form. In addition, the Mutual Fund may disclose such details to the bankers / its 
agents, as may be necessary for the purpose of effecting payments to the 
investor. Further, the Mutual Fund may disclose details of the investors account 
and transactions thereunder to any Regulatory/Statutory entities as per the 
provisions of law. 
D. DEFINITIONS :. . 
In this Scheme Information Document, the following words and expressions shall have 
the meaning specified herein, unless the context otherwise requires: 
As the Scheme is an Exchange Traded Fund (ETF) and the units 
of the Scheme are listed on the stock exchanges, in the interest 
of the investors/ unitholders, the operational processes of the. 
Schemes with respect to all the provisions of Uniform cut-off 
timings for applicability of Net Asset Value (NAV) issued by SEBI 
from time to time shall stand modified. 
Unless otherwise stated in this document, Applicable NAV is the. 
Net Asset Value per Unit of the Scheme as declared by the Fund 
and applicable for valid Purchase/ Redemption of Units of the. 
Scheme, based on the Business Day and Cut-off time at which 
the application is received and accepted and also subject to 
compliance with other conditions as mentioned in this. 
AMC            or for the schemes of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund. 
and their nominated entities/ person or any other person(s) who 
is/ would be appointed by the AMC/Fund to act as Authorised. 
Business Day / A day other than. 
2. a day on which the Stock Exchange, Mumbai and National. 
Stock Exchange are closed whether or not Banks are open. or 
3. a day on which the Sale and Redemption of Units is 
suspended by the Trustee. 
However, AMC reserves the right to declare any day as a non- 
business day at any of its locations at its sole discretion. 
Cash Component The Cash Component represents the difference between the 
for Creation Unit applicable net asset value of a Creation Unit and the market value 
of the Portfolio Deposit. This difference may include accrued 
dividends, accrued annual charges including management fees 
and residual cash in the Scheme. In addition, the Cash. 
Component may include transaction cost as charged by the. 
Custodian/Depository Participant, equalization of dividend, effect 
of rounding-off of number of shares in portfolio Deposit and 
other incidental expenses for Creating Units. The Cash. 
Component will vary from time to time and will be computed and. 
announced by the AMC on its website every Business Day. 
exchanged for a basket of securities underlying the index called 
the Portfolio Deposit and a Cash Component or equivalent value 
in terms of cash. 
Creation Unit for the Scheme is 10,000 units. 
The Portfolio Deposit and Cash Component will change from 
time to time. The Creation Unit Size may be changed by the AMC 
at its discretion and the notice of the same shall be published on. 
AMCs website. 
acting as Custodian of the Scheme, or any other custodian who 
is approved by the Trustee. 
For details about the custodian, refer Statement of Additional. 
Cut-off time for Investors / Unit holders to note that the below mentioned Cut-off 
transactions undertaken at the Official Points of Acceptance. 
As the Scheme is an Exchange Traded Fund (ETFs) and the units 
of the Scheme are listed on the stock exchanges, in the interest 
of the investors/ unitholders, the operational processes of the. 
Scheme with respect to all the provisions of Uniform cut-off 
timings for applicability of Net Asset Value (NAV) issued by SEBI 
from time to time shall stand modified. 
The Fund may allow subscription/ redemption in Creation Unit. 
Size and in multiples thereof by investor(s)/ authorised 
participant(s) based on the Portfolio Deposit/ equivalent amount 
of cash and Cash Component as defined by the Fund for that 
respective Business Day. 
The Cut-off time for receipt of valid application for subscriptions/ 
redemptions is 3.00 p.m. on any business day. 
which may be close to the NAV of the Scheme. 
ETFs (Exchange Traded Funds) predominantly invests in stocks 
constituting an underlying index. They just trade like stocks so 
they are essentially index stocks that combine the benefits of a 
mutual fund with a listed stock. They are passively managed 
funds providing exposure to the performance of that index. 
Foreign Portfolio Foreign portfolio investor means a person who satisfies the. 
and Exchange Board of India (Foreign Portfolio Investors). 
Regulations, 2014. Any foreign institutional investor or qualified 
foreign investor who holds a valid certificate of registration shall 
be deemed to be a foreign portfolio investor till the expiry of the 
block of three years for which fees have been paid as per the. 
Securities and Exchange Board of India (Foreign Institutional. 
Investors) Regulations, 1995. 
ICICI Prudential ICICI Prudential Bank ETF, an Exchange Traded Fund tracking. 
Investor Service The Investor Service Centres as may be designated by the AMC. 
NAV               Net Asset Value of the Units of Scheme, calculated on every. 
Business Day in the manner provided in this Scheme Information. 
Document or as may be prescribed by Regulations from time to. 
investment, which gives an updated measure of the value of the 
investment based on its assets less its liabilities. An investments. 
NAV is usually calculated at the end of the trading day, but the 
indicative NAV measure gives a more real-time view of this. 
NRI               Non-Resident Indian. 
NSE/ NSE Ltd/ National Stock Exchange of India Limited. 
Portfolio Deposit This is a pre-defined basket of securities that constitute Nifty. 
Prudential Bank. 
requires, its wholly owned subsidiary Prudential Corporation. 
Holdings Limited. 
RBI               Reserve Bank of India, established under the Reserve Bank of. 
India Act, 1934, as amended from time to time. 
dated March 25, 2019, retail investors would mean individual 
investors from whom inflows into the Scheme amount upto Rs. 
2,00,000/- per transaction. 
Underlying Index Nifty Bank Index. 
notice money, certificate of deposit, usance bill and any other like 
instruments as specified by the Reserve Bank of India from time 
to time. 
Securities and Exchange Board of India Act, 1992, as amended 
from time to time. 
Mutual Fund. 
Trading Day. 
Transaction 
handling charges transaction tax, regulatory charges if any, depository participant. 
Unit. 
Unitholder(s). 
Expressions. 
Document and 
not defined. 
of the Indian Trusts Act, 1882. The Fund is registered with SEBI 
vide Registration No.MF/003/93/6 dated October 12, 1993 as ICICI. 
Mutual Fund and has obtained approval from SEBI for change in 
name to Prudential ICICI Mutual Fund vide SEBIs letter dated. 
April 16, 1998. The change of name of the Fund to ICICI. 
Prudential Mutual Fund was approved by SEBI vide Letter No. 
IMD/PM/90170/07 dated April 02, 2007. 
Securities and Exchange Board of India (Mutual Funds). 
Regulations, 1996 as amended from time to time. 
ICICI Prudential Trust Limited, a company set up under the. 
Companies Act, 1956, and approved by SEBI to act as the. 
Trustee for the schemes of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund. 
Tracking Error is defined as the standard deviation of the 
difference between daily returns of the index and the NAV of the. 
A day on which BSE/NSE is open for trading of securities. 
Transaction handling charges include brokerage, Securities 
charges, uploading charges and such other charges that the. 
Fund may have to incur in the course of cash 
subscription/redemption or accepting the portfolio deposit or for 
giving a portfolio of securities as consideration for a redemption 
request. Such transaction handling charges shall be recoverable 
from the transacting Authorised Participant or Investor. 
The Trust Deed dated August 25, 1993 establishing ICICI Mutual. 
Fund (subsequently renamed ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund), as 
amended from time to time. 
Amounts settled/contributed by the Sponsors towards the 
corpus of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund and additions/accretions. 
The interest of an investor, which consists of, one undivided 
share in the Net Assets of the respective Scheme. 
A holder of Units in the Scheme of ICICI Prudential Bank ETF as 
contained in this Scheme Information Document. 
E. DUE DILIGENCE BY THE ASSET MANAGEMENT COMPANY. . 
It is confirmed that: 
(i) the Scheme Information Document (SID) forwarded to SEBI is in accordance with the. 
SEBI (Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996 and the guidelines and directives issued by. 
SEBI from time to time. 
(ii) all legal requirements connected with the launching of the Scheme as also the 
guidelines, instructions, etc., issued by the Government and any other competent 
authority in this behalf, have been duly complied with. 
(iii) the disclosures made in the Scheme Information Document are true, fair and 
adequate to enable the investors to make a well informed decision regarding 
investment in the proposed Scheme. 
Supriya Sapre. 
Sd/-. 
II. INFORMATION ABOUT THE SCHEME. . 
A. TYPE OF THE SCHEME. . 
An open-ended Exchange Traded Fund tracking Nifty Bank Index. 
B. WHAT IS THE INVESTMENT OBJECTIVE OF THE SCHEME?. . 
The investment objective of the scheme is to provide returns before expenses that 
closely correspond to the total return of the underlying index subject to tracking errors. 
However, there can be no assurance or guarantee that the investment objective of the. 
Scheme would be achieved. 
C. HOW WILL THE SCHEME ALLOCATE ITS ASSETS?. . 
Under normal circumstances, the asset allocation under the Scheme will be as follows: 
(% of total assets). 
index (Nifty Bank Index). 
maturity not exceeding 91 
days), including TREPS#, cash & 
cash equivalents. 
Derivative instruments on underlying index (stock/ index futures) up to 5% of the. 
Net Assets. Investment in derivatives shall be made in accordance with the SEBI. 
Circular No. Cir/ IMD/ DF/ 11/ 2010 dated August 18, 2010 and such other guidelines 
on derivatives as issued by SEBI from time to time. 
Stock lending up to 20% of its Net Assets. 
The cumulative gross exposure across various asset classes should not exceed 100% of 
the net assets of the scheme. 
In case of any variation of the portfolio from the above asset allocation, the portfolio 
shall be rebalanced within 7 Days to ensure adherence to the above norms. In the event 
of involuntary corporate action, the Fund shall dispose the security not forming part of 
the Underlying index within 7 business days from the date of allotment/ listing. 
The AMC would monitor the tracking error of the Scheme on an ongoing basis and 
would seek to minimize tracking error to the maximum extent possible. Under normal 
circumstances, the AMC will endeavour that the tracking error of the Scheme does not 
exceed 2% per annum. However, this may vary due to various reasons mentioned 
below or any other reasons that may arise and particularly when the markets are very. 
For more details on Tracking Error, kindly refer Tracking Error Risk under Scheme. 
Specific Risk Factors. 
The Scheme does not intend to undertake/ invest/ engage in: 
Repos in corporate debt securities. 
Short selling of securities. 
Unrated instruments (except TREPS/ Government Securities/ T- Bills / Repo and. 
Reverse Repo in Government Securities). 
Foreign securities/ADR/GDR. and. 
Securitised debts. 
Change in Investment Pattern. 
As an index linked ETF, the scheme is passively managed. However, as elsewhere stated 
in this scheme information document, the investment pattern and the percentages stated 
are indicative, and may change for short duration and defensive considerations with the 
intention to protect the interests of the Unit holders. In the event the underlying index is 
dissolved or is withdrawn by index service provider or is not published due to any 
reason whatsoever, the Trustees reserve the right to modify the Scheme so as to track a 
different and suitable index or to suspend tracking the underlying index and appropriate 
intimation will be sent to the Unit holders of the Scheme. In such a case, the investment 
pattern will be modified suitably to match the composition of the securities that are 
included in the new index to be tracked and the Scheme will be subject to tracking 
errors during the intervening period. 
Provided further and subject to the above, any change in the asset allocation affecting 
the investment profile of the Scheme shall be effected only in accordance with the 
provisions of sub regulation (15A) of Regulation 18 of the Regulations. 
D. WHERE WILL THE SCHEME INVEST?. . 
The Scheme invests in the securities included in the Underlying Index regardless of their 
investment merit. 
Subject to the Regulations and the disclosures as made under the Section How the. 
Scheme will allocate its Assets, the corpus of the Scheme can be invested in any (but 
not exclusive) of the following securities/ instruments: 
1) Equity and equity related securities forming part of underlying index, including 
warrants carrying the right to obtain equity shares. 
2) Money market instruments as defined under SEBI (Mutual Funds) Regulations, 
1996, having maturities of up to 91 Days, or in alternative investment for the call 
money market or any other instruments/securities as permitted by SEBI/RBI from 
time to time. 
3) Derivative instruments like, Stock / Index Futures, Stock / Index Options and such 
other derivative instruments permitted by SEBI. 
4) Units of Liquid schemes of the Fund, subject to applicable regulations. 
Or similar instruments as may be permitted by SEBI/RBI from time to time. 
Subject to the Regulations, the securities mentioned above could be listed, privately 
placed, secured, unsecured, rated or unrated and of varying maturity. 
The Scheme may invest in other schemes managed by the AMC or in the schemes of 
any other Mutual Funds, provided it is in conformity with the investment objective of the. 
Scheme and in terms of the prevailing Regulations. As per the Regulations, no 
investment management fees will be charged for such investments and the aggregate 
inter-scheme investment made by all Schemes of the Fund or in Schemes under the 
management of other asset management companies shall not exceed 5% of the Net. 
Asset Value of the Mutual Fund. 
The Scheme may use derivatives instruments like Stock/ Index Futures or such other 
derivative instruments as may be introduced from time to time, within the limit specified 
under HOW WILL THE SCHEME ALLOCATE ITS ASSETS which may be increased as 
permitted under the Regulations from time to time. 
The following information provides a basic idea as to the nature of the derivative 
instruments proposed to be used by the Scheme and the risks attached there with. 
Equity Derivatives. 
The Scheme intends to use derivatives for purposes that may be permitted by the. 
Regulations from time to time. Derivatives instruments may take the form of Futures, 
Options, Swaps or any other instrument, as may be permitted from time to time. 
Position limits for investment in Derivative instruments: 
SEBI has vide its Circular DNPD/Cir-29/2005 dated September 14, 2005 and DNPD/Cir- 
29/2005 dated January 20, 2006 and CIR/IMD/DF/11/2010 dated August 18, 2010 
specified the guidelines pertaining to trading by Mutual Fund in Exchange trades 
derivatives. All Derivative positions taken in the portfolio would be guided by the 
following principles: 
Position limit for the Fund in index options contracts. 
The Fund position limit in all index options contracts on a particular underlying 
index shall be Rs. 500 crore or 15% of the total open interest of the market in index 
options, whichever is higher per Stock Exchange. 
This limit would be applicable on open positions in all options contracts on a 
particular underlying index. 
Position limit for the Fund in index futures contract. 
The Fund position limit in all index futures contracts on a particular underlying 
index shall be Rs. 500 crore or 15% of the total open interest of the market in index 
futures, whichever is higher, per Stock Exchange. 
This limit would be applicable on open positions in all futures contracts on a 
particular underlying index. 
Additional position limit for hedging. 
In addition to the position limits mentioned above, Fund may take exposure in equity 
index derivatives subject to the following limits: 
Short positions in index derivatives (short futures, short calls and long puts) shall 
not exceed (in notional value) the Funds holding of stocks. 
Long positions in index derivatives (long futures, long calls and short puts) shall 
not exceed (in notional value) the Funds holding of cash, government securities, T-. 
Bills and similar instruments. 
Position limit for the Fund for stock based derivative contracts. 
The Fund position limit in a derivative contract on a particular underlying stock, 
i.e. stock option contracts and stock futures contracts, :- 
a. The combined futures and options position limit shall be 20% of the 
applicable Market Wide Position Limit (MWPL). 
b. The MWPL and client level position limits however would remain the same 
as prescribed. 
Position limit for the Scheme. 
The position limits for the Scheme and disclosure requirements are as follow. For 
stock option and stock futures contracts, the gross open position across all 
derivative contracts on a particular underlying stock of a scheme of a Fund shall 
not exceed the higher of: 
1% of the free float market capitalisation (in terms of number of shares). 
5% of the open interest in the derivative contracts on a particular underlying stock 
(in terms of number of contracts. 
This position limit shall be applicable on the combined position in all derivative 
contracts on an underlying stock at a Stock Exchange. 
For index based contracts, the Fund shall disclose the total open interest held by its 
scheme or all schemes put together in a particular underlying index, if such open 
interest equals to or exceeds 15% of the open interest of all derivative contracts on 
that underlying index. 
Various Derivatives Strategies: 
If and where Derivative strategies are used under the Scheme, the Fund Manager will 
employ a combination of the following strategies: 
1.      Index Arbitrage: 
As the Index derives its value from the underlying stocks, the underlying stocks can be 
used to create a synthetic index matching the Index levels. Also, theoretically, the fair 
value of a stock/ index futures is equal to the spot price plus the cost of carry i.e. the 
interest rate prevailing for an equivalent credit risk, in this case is the Clearing. 
Corporation of the NSE/BSE. 
Theoretically, therefore, the pricing of Index futures should be equal to the pricing of the 
synthetic index created by futures on the underlying stocks. However, due to market 
imperfections, the index futures may not exactly correspond to the synthetic index. 
The Index futures normally trades at a discount to the synthetic Index due to large 
volumes of stock hedging being done using the Index futures giving rise to arbitrage. 
The fund manager shall aim to capture such arbitrage opportunities by taking long 
positions in the Index futures and short positions in the synthetic index. The strategy is 
attractive if this price differential (post all costs) is higher than the investors cost-of-. 
Risks Associated with this Strategy. 
Lack of opportunity available in the market. 
The risk of mispricing or improper valuation and the inability of derivatives to 
correlate perfectly with underlying assets, rates and indices. 
Execution Risk: The prices which are seen on the screen need not be the same at 
which execution will take place. 
2.     Cash Futures Arbitrage: (Only one way as the schemes are not allowed to short in 
the cash market). 
The Scheme would look for market opportunities between the spot and the futures 
market. The cash futures arbitrage strategy can be employed when the price of the 
futures exceeds the price of the underlying stock. 
The Scheme will first buy the stocks in cash market and then sell in the futures market to 
lock the spread known as arbitrage return. 
Buying the stock in cash market and selling the futures results into a hedge where the. 
Scheme has locked in a spread and is not affected by the price movement of cash 
market and futures market. The arbitrage position can be continued till expiry of the 
future contracts. The future contracts are settled based on the last half an hours 
weighted average trade of the cash market. Thus, there is a convergence between the 
cash market and the futures market on expiry. This convergence helps the Scheme to 
generate the arbitrage return locked in earlier. However, the position could even be 
closed earlier in case the price differential is realized before expiry or better 
opportunities are available in other stocks. The strategy is attractive if this price 
differential (post all costs) is higher than the investors cost-of-capital. 
Objective of the Strategy. 
The objective of the strategy is to lock-in the arbitrage gains. 
Risk Associated with this Strategy. 
Lack of opportunity available in the market. 
The risk of mispricing or improper valuation and the inability of derivatives to 
correlate perfectly with underlying assets, rates and indices. 
Execution Risk: The prices which are seen on the screen need not be the same at 
which execution will take place 
3.     Hedging and alpha strategy: The Scheme will use exchange-traded derivatives to 
hedge the equity portfolio. The hedging could be either partial or complete depending 
upon the fund managers perception of the markets. The fund manager shall either use 
index futures and options or stock futures and options to hedge the stocks in the. 
portfolio. The Scheme will seek to generate alpha by superior stock selection and 
removing market risks by selling appropriate index. For example, one can seek to 
generate positive alpha by buying an IT stock and selling Nifty IT Index future or a bank 
stock and selling Bank Index futures or buying a stock and selling the Nifty Index. 
Objective of the Strategy. 
The objective of the strategy is to generate alpha by superior stock selection and 
removing market risks by hedging with appropriate index. 
Risk Associated with this Strategy. 
The stock selection under this strategy may under-perform the market and generate 
a negative alpha. 
The risk of mispricing or improper valuation and the inability of derivatives to 
correlate perfectly with underlying assets, rates and indices. 
Execution Risk: The prices which are seen on the screen need not be the same at 
which execution will take place. 
4.      Other Derivative Strategies: As allowed under the Regulations on derivatives, the 
fund manager will employ various other stock and index derivative strategies by buying 
or selling stock/index futures and/or options. 
Objective of the Strategy. 
The objective of the strategy is to earn low volatility consistent returns. 
Risk Associated with this Strategy. 
The risk of mispricing or improper valuation and the inability of derivatives to 
correlate perfectly with underlying assets, rates and indices. 
Execution Risk: The prices which are seen on the screen need not be the same at 
which execution will take place. 
Illustrations of some derivative transactions 
i. Index Futures: 
Benefits 
a. Investment in Stock Index Futures can give exposure to the index without directly 
buying the individual stocks. Appreciation in Index stocks can be effectively captured 
through investment in Stock Index Futures. 
b. The Scheme can sell futures to hedge against market movements effectively without 
actually selling the stocks it holds. 
The Stock Index futures are instruments designed to give exposure to the equity market 
indices. BSE Limited and National Stock Exchange of India Limited have started trading 
in index futures of 1, 2 and 3-month maturities. The pricing of an index future is the 
function of the underlying index and interest rates. 
Spot Index: 1070 
1 month Nifty Future Price on day 1: 1075. 
Fund buys 100 lots. 
Each lot has a nominal value equivalent to 200 units of the underlying index. 
Let us say that on the date of settlement, the future price = Closing spot price = 1085. 
Profits for the Scheme = (1085-1075)* 100 lots * 200 = Rs 200,000. 
Please note that the above example is given for illustration purposes only. 
The net impact for the Scheme will be in terms of the difference between the closing 
price of the index and cost price (ignoring margins for the sake of simplicity). Thus, it is 
clear from the example that the profit or loss for the Fund will be the difference of the 
closing price (which can be higher or lower than the purchase price) and the purchase 
price. The risks associated with index futures are similar to the one with equity 
investments. Additional risks could be on account of illiquidity and hence mispricing of 
the future at the time of purchase. 
ii) Buying Options: 
Benefits of buying a call option: 
Buying a call option on a stock or index gives the owner the right, but not the obligation, 
to buy the underlying stock / index at the designated strike price. Here the downside 
risks are limited to the premium paid to purchase the option. 
For example, if the scheme buys a one month call option on ABC Limited at a strike of. 
Rs. 150, the current market price being say Rs.151. The scheme will have to pay a 
premium of say Rs. 15 to buy this call. If the stock price goes below Rs. 150 during the 
tenure of the call, the scheme avoids the loss it would have incurred had it straightaway 
bought the stock instead of the call option. The scheme gives up the premium of Rs. 15 
that has to be paid in order to protect the scheme from this probable downside. If the 
stock goes above Rs. 150, it can exercise its right and own ABC Limited at a cost price of. 
Rs. 150, thereby participating in the upside of the stock. 
Benefits of buying a put option. 
Buying a put option on a stock originally held by the buyer gives him/her the right, but 
not the obligation, to sell the underlying stock at the designated strike price. Here the 
downside risks are limited to the premium paid to purchase the option. 
For example, if the scheme owns ABC Limited and also buys a three month put option 
on ABC Limited at a strike of Rs. 150, the current market price being say Rs.151. The 
scheme will have to pay a premium of say Rs. 12 to buy this put. If the stock price goes 
below Rs. 150 during the tenure of the put, the scheme can still exercise the put and sell 
the stock at Rs. 150, avoiding therefore any downside on the stock below Rs. 150. The 
scheme gives up the fixed premium of Rs. 12 that has to be paid in order to protect the 
scheme from this probable downside. If the stock goes above Rs. 150, say to Rs. 170, it 
will not exercise its option. The scheme will participate in the upside of the stock, since it 
can now sell the stock at the prevailing market price of Rs. 170. 
The Scheme will not have any exposure to Debt Derivatives. 
Valuation of Derivative Products: 
I.   The traded derivatives shall be valued at market price in conformity with the 
valuation policy of the Mutual Fund. 
valuation method for untraded investments prescribed in sub clauses (i) and (ii) of 
clause 2 of the Eighth Schedule to the Securities and Exchange Board of India 
(Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996 as amended from time to time. 
E.   WHAT ARE THE INVESTMENT STRATEGIES?. . 
The corpus of the Scheme will be invested predominantly in stocks constituting the 
underlying index in the same proportion as in the Index and endeavor to track the 
benchmark index. A very small portion (0-5% of the Net Assets) of the fund may be kept 
liquid to meet the liquidity and expense requirements. The fund may also use various 
derivatives and hedging instruments from time to time, as would be available and 
permitted by SEBI, in an attempt to protect the value of the portfolio and enhance. 
Unitholders interest. 
The performance of the Scheme may not be commensurate with the performance of the 
underlying index on any given day or over any given period. Such variations are 
commonly referred to as the tracking error. The Scheme intends to maintain a low 
tracking error by closely aligning the portfolio in line with the index. The stocks 
comprising the underlying index are periodically reviewed by Index Service Provider. A 
particular stock may be dropped or new securities may be included as a constituent of 
the index. In such an event, the Fund will endeavor to reallocate its portfolio but the 
available investment/ disinvestment opportunities may not permit precise mirroring of 
the underlying index immediately. Similarly, in the event of a constituent stock being 
demerged / merged / delisted from the exchange or due to a major corporate action in a 
constituent stock, the fund may have to reallocate the portfolio and seek to minimize the 
variation from the index. In such events, it may be more prudent for the fund to take 
exposure through derivatives of the index itself or its constituent stocks in order to 
minimize the long term tracking error. 
Equities and equity related instruments: 
The Scheme would invest in stocks comprising the underlying index and endeavor to 
track the benchmark index. 
Fixed Income Securities: 
The Scheme may also invest in units of liquid schemes, money market instrument (with 
maturity not exceeding 91 days), including TREPS, cash & cash equivalents , in 
compliance with Regulations to meet liquidity requirements. The scheme may also 
invest in liquid schemes of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund or other schemes which has 
objective to invest in debt and money market instruments. Money Market Instruments 
include commercial papers, commercial bills, treasury bills, and Government securities 
having an unexpired maturity up to one year, call or notice money, certificate of deposit, 
usance bills, CBLOs and any other like instruments as specified by the Reserve Bank of. 
India from time to time. 
Investment in Derivatives: 
The Scheme may take an exposure to equity derivatives of constituents of the 
underlying Basket when securities of the Basket are unavailable, insufficient or for 
rebalancing at the time of change in Basket or in case of corporate actions, for a short 
period of time. The Scheme may use derivative instruments such as stock futures and 
options contracts, warrants, convertible securities, swap agreements or any other 
derivative instruments that are permissible or may be permissible in future under 
applicable regulations and such investments shall be in accordance with the investment 
objective of the Scheme. 
Implementation of Policies. 
The Scheme, in general, will hold all of the securities that comprise the Underlying Index 
in the same proportion as the index. Expectation is that, over time, the tracking error of 
the Scheme relative to the performance of the Underlying Index will be relatively low. 
The Investment Manager would monitor the tracking error of the Scheme on an ongoing 
basis and would seek to minimize tracking error to the maximum extent possible. There 
can be no assurance or guarantee that the Scheme will achieve any particular level of 
tracking error relative to performance of the Underlying Index. 
Investment Process. 
The Scheme will track the Underlying Index and is a passively managed scheme. The 
investment Decisions will be determined as per the Underlying Index. In case of any 
change in the index due to corporate actions or change in the constituents of the. 
Underlying Index (as communicated by the Index Service Provider), relevant investment 
decisions will be determined considering the composition of the Underlying Index. 
The Scheme may invest in other schemes managed by the AMC or in the schemes of 
any other Mutual Funds, provided it is in conformity with the investment objective of the. 
Scheme and in terms of the prevailing Regulations. As per the Regulations, no 
investment management fees will be charged for such investments and the aggregate 
inter-scheme investment made by all Schemes of the Fund or in Schemes under the 
management of other asset management companies shall not exceed 5% of the Net. 
Asset Value of the Mutual Fund. 
Portfolio Turnover. 
Portfolio turnover is defined as the lower of purchases and sales divided by the average 
assets under management of the respective Scheme during a specified period of time. 
Generally, portfolio turnover of the Scheme will be confined to rebalancing of portfolio 
on account of change in the composition and corporate actions of the Underlying Index. 
INFORMATION ON NIFTY BANK INDEX. . 
Nifty Bank Index is an index comprised of the most liquid and large capitalised Indian. 
Banking stocks. It provides investors and market intermediaries with a benchmark that 
captures the capital market performance of Indian Banks. The index has 12 stocks from 
the banking sector which trade on the National Stock Exchange. 
Constituent weightings. 
Constituents of Nifty Bank Index as on June 18, 2019 is given below: 
Tracking Error. 
The AMC would monitor the tracking error of the Scheme on an ongoing basis and 
would seek to minimize tracking error to the maximum extent possible. Under normal 
circumstances, the AMC will endeavour that the tracking error of the Scheme does not 
exceed 2% per annum. However, this may vary due to various reasons mentioned 
below or any other reasons that may arise and particularly when the markets are very. 
PROCEDURE FOR CREATION OF UNITS. . 
Issue of Units 
1. Each unit of the Scheme will be approximately equal to 1/100th of the Underlying. 
Index closing on the date of allotment. The units being offered will be issued at a 
premium approximately equal to the difference between face value and allotment 
2. As the Scheme will be listed on BSE/NSE, subsequent buying or selling by investors 
can be made from the secondary market on BSE/NSE. The minimum number of units 
that can be bought or sold is 1 (one) unit. 
3. Authorised Participant(s)/ Investor(s) can directly buy / sell in blocks from the Fund in. 
Creation Unit Size. 
Creation of Units: 
Creation Unit is a fixed number of Units of the Scheme, which is exchanged for a 
predefined basket of shares underlying the index called the Portfolio Deposit and a. 
Cash Component. The facility of creating / redeeming units in Creation Unit size is 
available to the Authorised Participant and Investors. 
The number of units, that investors can create / redeem in exchange of the Portfolio. 
Deposit and Cash Component, is 10,000 Units and in multiples thereof. The Portfolio. 
Deposit and Cash Component are defined as follows:- 
a. Portfolio Deposit: This is a pre-defined basket of securities that represent the. 
Underlying Index. Portfolio Deposit can change from time to time. 
Creation Unit and the market value of the Portfolio Deposit. This difference may 
include accrued dividends, accrued annual charges including management fees and 
residual cash in the Scheme. In addition, the Cash Component may include 
transaction cost as charged by the Custodian/Depository Participant, equalization of 
dividend, effect of rounding-off of number of shares in Portfolio Deposit and other 
incidental expenses for Creating Units. The Cash Component will vary from time to 
time and will be computed and announced by the AMC on its website every Business. 
The Creation Unit is made up of 2 components i.e. the Portfolio Deposit and the Cash. 
Component. The Portfolio Deposit will be determined by the Fund as per the weightages 
of each security in the Underlying Index. The value of this portfolio deposit will change 
due to change in prices during the day. The number of shares of each security that 
constitute the portfolio deposit will remain constant unless there is any corporate action 
in the Underlying Index/ change in the constituents of the Underlying Index. 
Example of Creation of Units as on: 
B    Hypothetical NAV (1/100th of Index). 
C    Unit Creation Size. 
F    Cash Component per creation unit size (D-E) 
(figures are for illustrative purposes only) 
#Value of Portfolio Deposit is arrived as follows: 
June 18, 2019 
(In Rs.). 
30,526.50. . 
305.27. . 
10,000.00. . 
2,717.45. . 
The above is just an example to illustrate the calculation of Cash Component. Cash. 
Component will vary depending upon the actual charges incurred like Custodial Charges 
and other incidental charges for creating units. 
Portfolio Concentration Norms: 
Pursuant to provisions of SEBI Circular no. SEBI/HO/IMD/DF3/CIR/P/2019/011 dated. 
January 10, 2019, the Scheme complies with following portfolio concentration norms : 
1. The index shall have a minimum of 10 stocks as its constituents. 
2. For a sectoral/ thematic Index, no single stock shall have more than 35% weight 
in the index. For other than sectoral/ thematic indices, no single stock shall have 
more than 25% weight in the index. 
3. The weightage of the top three constituents of the index, cumulatively shall not 
be more than 65% of the Index. 
Procedure followed for Investment decisions. 
Please refer to Statement of Additional Information (SAI) for details. 
POSITION OF EQUITY MARKET IN INDIA. . 
The Indian stock market is one of the worlds largest stock market. There are two leading 
stock exchanges in India, i.e. BSE Limited (BSE) and National Stock Exchange of India. 
Limited (NSE). BSE was established in 1875 and is the oldest stock exchange in Asia. 
NSE, a more recent establishment which came into existence in 1992, is the largest and 
most advanced stock market in India and is also one of the biggest stock exchanges in. 
Asia in terms of transactions. NSEs flagship index, NIFTY 50, is used extensively by 
investors in India and around the world to take exposure to the Indian equities market. 
BSE has a large number of scrips which are listed. The Indian stock market scene really 
picked up after the opening up of the economy in the early nineties. NSE changed the 
way the Indian markets function, in the early nineties, by replacing floor based trading 
with nationwide screen based electronic trading, which took trading to the doorstep of 
the investor. NSE was mainly set up to bring in transparency in the markets. Instead of 
trading membership being confined to a group of brokers, NSE ensured that anyone 
who was qualified, experienced and met minimum financial requirements was allowed 
to trade. The price information which could earlier be accessed only by a handful of 
people could now be seen by a client in a remote location with the same ease. The 
paper based settlement was replaced by electronic depository based accounts and 
settlement of trades was always done on time. One of the most critical changes was that 
a robust risk management system was set in place, so that settlement guarantees could 
protect investors against broker defaults. The corporate governance rules were gradually 
put in place which initiated the process of bringing the listed companies at a uniform. 
Movement of Nifty 50 Index since inception:*. 
Nifty 50 
*Source for the chart is https://www.nseindia.com and data is as on June 30, 2019. Data 
is of the Total Return Variant of the Index. 
POSITION OF DEBT MARKET IN INDIA. . 
Indian debt markets, in the early nineties, were characterised by controls on pricing of 
assets, segmentation of markets and barriers to entry, low levels of liquidity, limited 
number of players, near lack of transparency, and high transactions cost. Financial 
reforms have significantly changed the Indian debt markets for the better. Most debt 
instruments are now priced freely on the markets. trading mechanisms have been 
altered to provide for higher levels of transparency, higher liquidity, and lower 
transactions costs. new participants have entered the markets, broad basing the types of 
players in the markets. methods of security issuance, and innovation in the structure of 
instruments have taken place. and there has been a significant improvement in the 
dissemination of market information. There are three main segments in the debt markets 
in India, viz., Government Securities, Public Sector Units (PSU) bonds, and corporate 
securities. A bulk of the debt market consists of Government Securities. Other 
instruments available currently include Corporate Debentures, Bonds issued by Financial. 
Institutions, Commercial Paper, Certificates of Deposits and Securitized Debt. Securities 
in the Debt market typically vary based on their tenure and rating. Government. 
Securities have tenures from one year to thirty years whereas the maturity period of the. 
Corporate Debt now goes upto sixty years and more (perpetual). Perpetual bonds are 
now issued by banks as well. Securities may be both listed and unlisted and there is 
increasing trend of securities of maturities of over one year being listed by issuers. While 
in the corporate bond market, deals are conducted over telephone and are entered on 
principal-to-principal basis, due to the introduction of the Reserve Bank of Indias NDS-. 
Order Matching system a significant proportion of the government securities market is 
trading on the new system. 
The yields and liquidity on various securities as on June 30, 2019 are as under: 
F: FUNDAMENTAL ATTRIBUTES. . 
Following are the Fundamental Attributes of the Scheme, in terms of Regulation 18 (15A) 
of the SEBI (MF) Regulations: 
(A) Type of a Scheme. 
Kindly refer INFORMATION ABOUT THE SCHEME para. 
(B) (i) Investment Objective: Kindly refer INFORMATION ABOUT THE SCHEME para. 
(ii) Investment Pattern: Kindly refer to section on HOW WILL THE SCHEME. 
ALLOCATE ITS ASSETS?. . 
(iii) Terms of Issue. 
Kindly refer HIGHLIGHTS/SUMMARY OF THE SCHEME para. 
The Scheme is proposed to be listed and traded on BSE and NSE. However the. 
Trustee reserves the right to list the units of Scheme on any other Stock. 
Exchange without any change in the Fundamental Attribute. 
Aggregate fees and expenses charged to the Scheme: 
Kindly refer section on Fees and Expenses. 
Any safety net or guarantee provided: The present Scheme is not guaranteed or 
assured return scheme. 
Changes in Fundamental Attributes. 
In accordance with Regulation 18(15A) of the SEBI (MF) Regulations, the Trustees shall 
ensure that no change in the fundamental attributes of the Scheme(s) or the trust or fee 
and expenses payable or any other change which would modify the Scheme(s) and 
affect the interests of Unitholders is carried out unless: 
A written communication about the proposed change is sent to each Unitholder and 
an advertisement is given in one English daily newspaper having nationwide 
circulation as well as in a newspaper published in the language of the region where 
the Head Office of the AMC is situated. and. 
The Unitholders are given an option for a period of 30 days to exit at the prevailing. 
Net Asset Value without any exit load. 
G. HOW WILL THE SCHEME BENCHMARK ITS PERFORMANCE?. . 
The performance of the Scheme will be benchmarked against Nifty Bank Index. 
For more details on the benchmark, kindly refer Information on Nifty Bank Index. 
H. WHO MANAGES THE SCHEME?. . 
The investments under the Scheme will be managed by Mr. Kayzad Eghlim. His 
qualifications and experience are as under: 
Manager / Age /. 
~ IDFC Investment Advisors. 
Ltd    - Dealer Equities -. 
September 2006 to June 
1. December 2003 to August. 
Manager - June 2003 to. 
October 2003. 
~ Canbank Mutual Fund -. 
Equity Dealer - June 2000 to. 
June 2003. 
~ Canbank Mutual Fund : 
Assisting the Fund Manager - 
1994 to1997. 
~ Canbank Mutual Fund -. 
Department (IPO) - 1991 to. 
Fund. 
ICICI Prudential Equity : 
ICICI Prudential Nifty 100 ETF. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty Index. 
Fund. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty ETF. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty Low Vol 
30 ETF. . 
ICICI Prudential Nifty Next 50. 
Index Fund. 
ICICI Prudential Sensex Index. 
ICICI Prudential NV20 ETF. 
ICICI Prudential Sensex ETF. 
ICICI Prudential Midcap Select. 
ICICI Prudential S&P BSE 500. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty Next 50. 
ICICI Prudential Bharat 22 FOF. 
I. WHAT ARE THE INVESTMENT RESTRICTIONS?. . 
Pursuant to the Regulations and amendments thereto and subject to the investment 
pattern of the Scheme, following investment restrictions are presently applicable to the. 
Scheme: 
1) The Fund under all its schemes shall not own more than 10% of any companys 
paid up capital carrying voting rights. 
Provided, investment in the asset management company or the trustee company 
of a mutual fund shall be governed by clause (a), of sub-regulation (1), of 
regulation 7B 
2) Transfer of investments from one scheme to another scheme in the same Mutual. 
Fund is permitted provided: 
a. Such transfers are done at the prevailing market price for quoted instruments 
on spot basis (spot basis shall have the same meaning as specified by a Stock. 
Exchange for spot transactions). and 
b. The securities so transferred shall be in conformity with the investment 
objective of the scheme to which such transfer has been made. 
Further the inter scheme transfer of investments shall be in accordance with the 
provisions contained in clause Inter-Scheme transfer of investments, contained in. 
Statement of Additional Information. 
3) The Fund shall get the securities purchased transferred in the name of the Fund 
on account of the concerned scheme, wherever investments are intended to be 
of a long-term nature. 
4) The Fund shall buy and sell securities on the basis of deliveries and shall in all 
cases of purchases, take delivery of relative securities and in all cases of sale, 
deliver the securities and will not make any short sales or engage in carry forward 
transaction or badla finance. Provided that mutual funds shall enter into 
derivatives transactions in a recognised stock exchange for the purpose of 
hedging and portfolio balancing, in accordance with the Regulations. 
5) No loans for any purpose can be advanced by the Scheme. 
6) The Fund shall not borrow except to meet temporary liquidity needs of the Fund 
for the purpose of repurchase/ redemption of units or payment of interest and 
dividend to the Unitholders. Such borrowings shall not exceed more than 20% 
of the net assets of the individual scheme and the duration of the borrowing shall 
not exceed a period of 6 months. 
7) The Fund having an aggregate of securities which are worth Rs.10 crores or 
more, as on the latest balance sheet date, shall subject to such instructions as 
may be issued from time to time by the Board, settle their transactions entered 
on or after January 15, 1998 only through dematerialised securities. Further, all 
transactions in government securities shall be in dematerialised form. 
9) The Scheme may invest in other Schemes under the same AMC or any other. 
Mutual Fund without charging any fees, provided the aggregate inter-Scheme 
investment made by all the Schemes under the same management or in. 
Schemes under management of any other asset management company shall not 
exceed 5% of the Net Asset Value of the Fund. No investment management fees 
shall be charged for investing in other Schemes of the Fund or in the Schemes of 
any other mutual fund. 
10) The Scheme will comply with provisions specified in Circular dated August 18, 
2010 related to overall exposure limits applicable for derivative transactions as 
stated below: 
a. The cumulative gross exposure through equity, debt and derivative positions 
should not exceed 100% of the net assets of the scheme. 
b. Mutual Funds shall not write options or purchase instruments with embedded 
written options. 
c. The total exposure related to option premium paid must not exceed 20% of 
the net assets of the scheme. 
d. Cash or cash equivalents with residual maturity of less than 91 days may be 
treated as not creating any exposure. 
e. Exposure due to hedging positions may not be included in the above 
mentioned limits subject to the following: 
i.   Hedging positions are the derivative positions that reduce possible 
losses on an existing position in securities and till the existing 
position remains. 
ii.   Hedging positions cannot be taken for existing derivative positions. 
Exposure due to such positions shall have to be added and treated 
under limits mentioned in Point 1. 
iii.   Any derivative instrument used to hedge has the same underlying 
security as the existing position being hedged. 
iv.    The quantity of underlying associated with the derivative position 
taken for hedging purpose does not exceed the quantity of the 
existing position against which hedge has been taken. 
f. Exposure due to derivative positions taken for hedging purposes in excess of 
the underlying position against which the hedging position has been taken, 
shall be treated under the limits mentioned in point (i) above. 
g. Definition of Exposure in case of Derivative Positions - Each position taken in 
derivatives shall have an associated exposure as defined under. Exposure is 
the maximum possible loss that may occur on a position. However, certain 
derivative positions may theoretically have unlimited possible loss. Exposure 
in derivative positions shall be computed as follows: 
All investment restrictions shall be applicable at the time of making investment. 
J. HOW HAS THE SCHEME PERFORMED?. . 
This Scheme is a new scheme and does not have any performance track record. 
K. ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES. . 
i. SCHEME PORTFOLIO HOLDINGS 
a. Top 10 holdings: Not Available 
b. Sector wise holdings: Not Available. 
Since the Scheme is a new Scheme, Portfolio Holdings and Sector wise holdings are 
not available. 
ii. PORTFOLIO TURNOVER RATIO. 
Since the Scheme is a new Scheme, Portfolio Turnover ratio is not available. 
iii. INVESTMENT DETAILS: The aggregate investment in the Scheme under the following 
categories: 
a. AMCs Board of Directors 
b. Schemes Fund Manager(s) and 
c. Other key managerial personnel. 
Since the Scheme is a new Scheme, the above Investment Details are not available. 
L. HOW IS THE SCHEME IS DIFFERENT FROM OTHER SCHEMES. . 
In the category of ETF, ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund (the Mutual Fund) offers eleven (11) 
schemes, out of which ten (10) schemes are Index ETF and one is Gold Exchange. 
Traded Fund (a commodity ETF). Index ETF tracks specific Index of the exchange. In the 
nature of open ended Index ETF, the Fund offers the below schemes which track 
different Index as given below: 
The details of other existing Exchange Traded Fund of the Mutual Fund are provided below. 
ICICI Prudential Midcap. 
SENSEX.     residual 
maturity 
The Scheme can take 
exposure upto 20% of 
net assets in stock. 
correspond to the total 
returns of the securities 
as represented by the. 
performance of Scheme 
may differ from that of 
the underlying index due 
to tracking error. There 
can be no assurance or 
investment objective of 
the Scheme will be. 
Management 
(as on June. 
as on June. 
ICICI Prudential Gold ETFICICI Prudential Midcap. 
Select ETF. 
by SEBI 
exposure allowed to the 
debt instruments as per 
above asset allocation. 
gold due to tracking error. 
assurance or guarantee 
objective of the Scheme 
will be achieved. 
The fund is not actively 
managed. It does not 
engage in any activities 
designed to obtain a 
ameliorate losses caused 
by, changes in the price 
of gold. 
tracking Nifty 50 Index. 
Index)           maturity 
upto 91 
The Scheme can take 
exposure upto 20% of 
net assets in stock. 
is to provide returns 
before expenses that 
closely correspond to 
the total return of the. 
errors. However, there 
can be no assurance or 
investment objective of 
the Scheme would be. 
Managemen 
t (as on June. 
as on June. 
tracking Nifty 100 Low. 
Volitility 30 Index. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty 100. 
An open ended exchange 
traded fund tracking Nifty 
100 Index. 
Securities Money Market 
of          Instruments 
companie having 
s           residual 
ng Nifty 91 days 
100 Index. 
Underlyin 
g Index). 
The Scheme can take The Scheme can take 
exposure upto 20% of net exposure upto 20% of net 
assets in stock lending. assets in stock lending. 
The investment objective 
of the Scheme is to 
provide returns before 
expenses that closely 
correspond to the total 
return of the Underlying. 
Index, subject to tracking 
errors. However, there can 
be no assurance or 
investment objective of 
the Scheme would be. 
Rs. 5.13 crore. 
An open ended exchange 
traded fund investing in. 
S&P BSE Bharat 22 Index 
of            Liquid/Money 
s             Mutual Fund. 
ICICI Prudential NV20 ETF. 
An open ended exchange 
traded fund tracking Nifty 
50 Value 20 Index. 
s       of Money Market 
compani Instruments 
es         with maturity 
constituti of upto 91 
ng     the days only. 
Underlyi 
ng Index. 
Value 20. 
The investment objective 
of the scheme is to 
provide returns before 
correspond to the total 
return of the Underlying. 
Index subject to tracking. 
However, there can be no 
assurance or guarantee 
objective of the Scheme 
would be achieved. 
Rs. 5.78 crore. 
ICICI Prudential Nifty Next 
50 ETF. . 
An open ended exchange 
traded fund replicating / 
tracking NIFTY Next 50. 
Equity Units of Liquid 
and      schemes, Money. 
Equity Market. 
Features of 
the Scheme. 
Assets 
Managemen 
t (as on June. 
No. of folios 
as on June. 
Type of Scheme. 
ETF                         ETF. . 
Scheme may differ from 
that of underlying index 
due to tracking error. 
assurance or guarantee 
objective of the Scheme 
would be achieved. 
An open ended exchange traded fund An open ended exchange traded 
tracking / replicating S&P BSE 500 Index fund tracking S&P BSE Liquid. 
Rate Index. 
constituting the Market Instruments 
underlying Index (with maturity not 
(S&P BSE 500 exceeding 91 days), 
The Scheme may also take exposure to: 
Derivative instruments up to 5% of 
the Net Assets. Investment in 
accordance with the SEBI Circular No. 
Cir/ IMD/ DF/ 11/ 2010 dated August 
18, 2010 and such other guidelines on 
derivatives as issued by SEBI from 
time to time. 
Stock lending up to 20% of its Net. 
that closely correspond to the total 
return of the underlying index subject to 
tracking errors. However, there can be 
no assurance or guarantee that the 
investment objective of the Scheme 
would be achieved. 
Management (as 
on June 30, 2019. 
Type of Scheme An open ended exchange traded fund tracking Nifty Bank Index. 
Asset Allocation Equity and Equity related securities Units of Liquid schemes, Money 
as per SID (in %) of companies constituting the Market Instruments (with maturity not. 
TREPS , cash & cash equivalents. 
Or similar instruments as may be permitted by SEBI/RBI from time to time. 
The Scheme may also take exposure to: 
Derivative instruments on underlying index (stock/ index futures) up to. 
schemes, Money. 
Instruments 
not exceeding 91 
days), cash & 
cash equivalents. 
dated January 19, 2009, the. 
Scheme shall make investments 
in / purchase debt and money 
market securities with maturity of 
up to 91 days only. 
The Cumulative Gross Exposure 
will not exceed 100% of the Net. 
Assets of the Scheme. 
The investment objective of the. 
Scheme is to invest in TREPS. 
The Scheme aims to provide 
returns before expenses that 
closely correspond to the returns 
of S&P BSE Liquid Rate Index, 
subject to tracking errors. 
However, there can be no 
assurance or guarantee that the 
investment objective of the. 
Scheme would be achieved. 
Rs. 88.62 crore. 
Features of the. 
Management (as. 
ICICI Prudential Bank ETF 
5% of the Net Assets. Investment in derivatives shall be made in 
accordance with the SEBI Circular No. Cir/ IMD/ DF/ 11/ 2010 dated. 
August 18, 2010 and such other guidelines on derivatives as issued by. 
SEBI from time to time. 
Stock lending up to 20% of its Net Assets. 
The cumulative gross exposure across various asset classes should not 
exceed 100% of the net assets of the scheme. 
The investment objective of the scheme is to provide returns before 
expenses that closely correspond to the total return of the underlying index 
subject to tracking errors. However, there can be no assurance or guarantee 
that the investment objective of the Scheme would be achieved. 
III. UNITS AND OFFER. . 
This section provides details you need to know for investing in the Scheme. 
A. NEW FUND OFFER DETAILS. . 
B. ONGOING OFFER DETAILS. . 
Ongoing Offer Period 
(This is the date from which 
the scheme will reopen for. 
Subscription / Redemption 
after the closure of the NFO. 
subscription/redemption by 
investors. 
This is the price you need to 
pay for purchase /. 
This is the price you will 
receive for redemptions. 
The units of the Scheme are listed on the BSE and. 
NSE. All investors, including Authorised Participant(s) 
may sell their units in the stock exchange(s) on which 
these units are listed on all the Trading Days of the 
stock exchanges. The Fund will repurchase units from. 
Authorised Participant(s) and Investors on any. 
Business Day provided the value of units offered for 
repurchase is not less than Creation Unit Size. The 
redemption consideration shall normally be the basket 
of securities represented by the Underlying Index in 
the same weightage as in the Index or the equivalent 
value of basket in cash and the Cash Component. 
The AMC will not extend credit facility to the. 
participants or investors will get the NAV as and when 
they bring the Portfolio Deposit/ equivalent amount of 
cash and Cash Component. 
Investors, other than Authorised Participants, can sell 
units in less than Creation Unit Size of the Scheme 
directly to the Fund, without any exit load in the certain 
cases. Please refer to the section Load Structure for 
more information. 
The Authorized Participant(s)/ Investor(s) can 
subscribe/redeem the units of the Scheme directly 
with the Fund only in creation unit size and in multiples 
thereof. The subscription & redemption of units would 
be based on the portfolio deposit & cash component 
as defined by the Fund for the respective business 
day. The Fund may allow cash purchases/cash 
redemption of the units of the Scheme in Creation Unit. 
Size by Investor(s)/Authorized Participant(s). 
Purchase/redemption request shall be made by such 
investors to the Fund whereupon the Fund shall 
arrange to buy/sell the underlying portfolio of 
securities on behalf of the investor. In case of shares 
bought and sold by the AMC on behalf of the investor, 
entire proceeds of portfolio deposit and other cost and 
charges related to the purchase and sale of basket of 
underlying securities for servicing the subscription or 
redemption transaction would be borne by the. 
The units would be initially listed on the BSE & NSE to 
provide liquidity through secondary market. It may 
also list on any other exchanges subsequently. All 
categories of Investors may purchase the units 
through secondary market on any trading day. The. 
AMC will appoint Authorized Participant(s) to provide 
liquidity in secondary market on an ongoing basis. The. 
Authorized Participant(s) envisage to offer daily two- 
way quote on exchange. 
The AMC will not extend credit facility to the. 
participants or investors will get the NAV as and when 
they bring the Portfolio Deposit/ equivalent amount of 
cash and Cash Component. 
There is no exit load currently. However transaction 
charges payable to Custodian/ Depository Participants, 
and other incidental charges relating to conversion of 
units into basket of securities may be deducted from 
redemption proceeds. The charges will be notified on 
www.icicipruamc.com from time to time. Investors 
other than Authorized Participant may redeem units at 
the market price plus transaction handling charges on 
stock exchange. 
The Fund shall ensure that the Redemption Price is not 
lower than 93% of the NAV and the Purchase Price is 
not higher than 107% of the NAV, provided that the 
difference between the Redemption Price and. 
Purchase Price of the Units shall not exceed the 
permissible limit of 7% of the Purchase Price, as 
provided for under the Regulations. 
For more details on Loads refer section on Load. 
Payment of Proceeds. 
All redemption requests received prior to the cut-off 
time on any Business Day at the Official Points of. 
Acceptance of Transactions will be considered 
accepted on that Business Day, subject to the 
redemption requests being complete in all respects, 
and will be priced on the basis of Redemption Price for 
that day. Requests received after the cut-off time will 
be treated as though they were accepted on the next. 
Business Day. 
As per the Regulations, the Fund shall dispatch 
redemption proceeds within 10 Business Days 
(working days) of receiving the redemption request. 
Trustees reserve the right to alter or modify the 
number of days taken for redemption of Units under 
the Fund after taking into consideration the actual 
settlement cycle, when announced, as also the 
changes in the settlement cycles that may be 
announced by the Principal Stock Exchanges from 
time to time. 
As per the Regulations, in the event of failure to 
dispatch the redemption or repurchase proceeds 
within 10 working days, the AMC is liable to pay 
interest to the Unit holders @ 15% p.a. SEBI has 
further advised the Funds that in the event of payment 
of interest to the Unit holders, such Unit holders 
should be informed about the rate and the amount of 
interest paid to them. 
credit/ECS/cheque or any other mode as may be 
decided by AMC in the interest of investors. 
subscriptions/ redemptions/ mentioned Cut-off time are not applicable to 
transactions undertaken on a recognised Stock. 
This is the time before which Exchange and are only applicable to transactions 
your application (complete undertaken at the Official Points of Acceptance. 
in all respects) should reach 
acceptance.                    and the units of the Scheme are listed on the stock 
exchanges, in the interest of the investors/ unitholders, 
the operational processes of the Schemes with respect 
to all the provisions of Uniform cut-off timings for 
applicability of Net Asset Value (NAV) issued by SEBI 
from time to time shall stand modified. 
The Fund may allow subscription/ redemption in. 
Creation Unit Size and in multiples thereof by 
investor(s)/ authorised participant(s) based on the. 
Portfolio Deposit/ equivalent amount of cash and Cash. 
Component as defined by the Fund for that respective. 
Business Day. 
The Cut-off time for receipt of valid application for 
subscriptions/ redemptions/ is 3.00 p.m. on any 
business day. 
Switch into the Scheme. 
Other 
requirements/processes. 
Special Products / facilities Not Available 
Where can the applications Duly completed Application Form(s) / Transaction 
for purchase/redemption be Form(s) (along with the instrument for payment, as 
submitted?. 
Purchase/Redemption. 
Not Applicable. 
Transactions without Scheme Name. 
In case of fresh/additional purchases, if the name of a 
particular Scheme on the application form/transaction 
slip differs from the name on the Cheque/Demand. 
Draft, then ICICI Prudential Asset Management. 
Company Limited (the AMC) will process the 
application and allot units at the applicable Net Asset. 
Value, under the Scheme which is mentioned on the 
application form/transaction slip duly signed by the 
investor(s). The AMC reserves the right to call for 
other additional documents as may be required, for 
processing such transactions. The AMC also reserves 
the right to reject such transactions. 
The AMC thereafter shall not be responsible for any 
loss suffered by the investor due to the discrepancy of 
a Scheme name mentioned in the application 
form/transaction slip and Cheque/Demand Draft. 
applicable) for the Purchase / Redemption of Units of 
the Scheme in Creation Unit Size during the Ongoing. 
Offer Period may be submitted to any of the Official. 
Points of Acceptance as notified by the AMC. For 
details, please refer back cover of this SID. 
The AMC has the right to designate additional centers 
as the Official Points of Acceptance during the. 
Ongoing Offer Period and change such centers, if it 
deems fit. 
An investor can buy/ sell units on a continuous basis 
in the normal market segment of BSE/National Stock. 
Exchange of India Limited, or any other stock 
exchange where the Scheme is listed, during the 
trading hours like any other publicly traded stock at 
prices which are quoted on the stock exchanges. 
These prices may be close to the actual NAV of the. 
Scheme. There is no minimum investment, although 
units are to be purchased in lots of 1 (one) unit. 
for On Stock Exchange(s): Investor can buy / sell units of 
the Scheme in round lot of 1 unit and in multiples. 
Participant(s)/Investor(s) can buy/sell units of the. 
Scheme in Creation Unit Size viz. 10,000 units and in 
multiples thereof. 
An investor can buy/ sell units on a continuous basis in 
the normal market segment of BSE Limited/National. 
Stock Exchange of India Limited (NSE) or any other 
stock exchange where the Scheme is listed, during the 
trading hours like any other publicly traded stock at 
prices which are quoted on the stock exchanges. 
These prices may be close to the actual NAV of the. 
Scheme. There is no minimum investment, although 
units are to be purchased in lots of 1 (one) unit. 
settled in dematerialized (electronic) form, the 
statement of holding of the beneficiary account holder 
will be sent by the respective Depository Participant. 
unitholders within 30 days of the date of declaration of 
the dividend. 
In the event of failure to dispatch dividend within 30 
days, the AMC shall be liable to pay interest at 15% 
per annum to the unit holders. 
The treatment of unclaimed redemption & dividend 
amount will be as per SEBI circular dated Feb 25, 2016. 
Plans/options under the Currently, there are no plans/ options under the. 
Units of the Scheme may also be listed on such other 
stock exchange(s) as may be decided from time to 
time. The trading will be as per the normal settlement. 
Investment by Sponsors/ The sponsors or AMC will invest not less than one. 
AMC                       percent of the amount which would be raised in the 
new fund offer or fifty lakh rupees, whichever is less, in 
the growth option of the Scheme and such investment 
will not be redeemed unless the Scheme is wound up. 
Application form for instructions. 
dispatched to the Unit holders within 10 Working Days 
from the date of Redemption or repurchase. 
Settlement of Purchase / Buying / Selling units of the Scheme on the stock. 
Sale on stock exchange(s) exchange is similar to buying / selling of any other 
listed securities. If an investor has bought units, the 
investor has to pay the purchase amount to the broker 
/ sub-broker such that the amount paid is realized 
before funds pay-in day of the settlement cycle on the 
exchange. If an investor has sold units, the investor 
has to deliver the units to the broker/ sub-broker 
before the securities pay-in day of the settlement cycle 
on the exchange. The units (in case of units bought) 
and the funds (in the case of units sold) are paid out to 
the broker on the payout day of the settlement cycle 
on the exchange. The trading member would pay the 
money or units to the investor in accordance with the. 
Rolling Settlement 
time prescribed by the stock exchange regulation. If an 
investor has bought units, he/she should give standing 
instructions for Delivery-In to his/her DP for accepting 
units in his/her beneficiary account. An investor should 
give the details of his/her beneficiary account and the. 
DP-ID of his/her DP to his/her trading member. The 
trading member will transfer the units directly to 
his/her beneficiary account on receipt of the same 
from exchanges clearing corporation. 
An investor who has sold units should instruct his/her. 
Depository Participant (DP) to give Delivery Out 
instructions to transfer the units from his/her 
beneficiary account to the Pool Account of his/her 
trading member through whom he/she has sold the 
units. The details of the Pool Account of investors 
trading member to which the units are to be 
transferred, unit quantity, etc. should be mentioned in 
the delivery out instructions given by him/her to the. 
DP. The instructions should be given well before the 
prescribed securities pay-in day. The exchange 
regulations stipulate that the trading member should 
pay the money or units to the investor within 24 hours 
of the payout. 
All investors including Authorized Participants, may 
sell their units in the stock exchange(s) on which these 
units are listed on all the Trading Days of the stock 
exchange. The Fund will repurchase units from. 
Authorised Participant(s)/Investor(s) on any Business. 
Day provided the units offered for repurchase is not 
less than the Creation Unit Size and multiples. 
The Fund intends to follow the settlement pattern and 
practices of BSE and NSE as per the trade/s executed 
on the respective exchange. 
Rolling Settlement. 
As per the SEBIs circular dated March 4, 2003, the 
rolling settlement on T+2 basis for all trades has 
commenced from April 1, 2003 onwards. The Pay-in 
and Pay-out of funds and the units will take place 2 
working days after the trading date. 
The pay-in and pay-out days for funds and securities 
are prescribed as per the Settlement Cycle. A typical. 
Settlement Cycle of Rolling Settlement is given below: 
Day Activity. 
Day     Activity. 
T       The day on which the transaction is 
executed by a trading member. 
T+1     Confirmation of all trades including. 
Procedure for Purchasing in Creation of Units. 
Creation Unit Size 
custodial trades by 11.00 a.m. 
T+1     Processing and downloading of obligation 
files to brokers /custodians by 1.30 p.m. 
T+2     Pay-in of funds and securities by 11.00 a.m. 
T+2     Pay out of funds and securities by 1.30 p.m. 
While calculating the days from the Trading Day (Day. 
T., weekend days (i.e. Saturday and Sundays) and. 
Bank holidays are not taken into consideration. 
All investors including Authorized Participants, may 
sell their units, in the stock exchange(s) on which 
these units are listed on all the trading days of the 
stock exchange. Mutual fund will repurchase units 
from Authorized Participants on any business day 
provided the units offered for repurchase is not less 
than the creation unit size and multiples thereafter. 
of The Authorised Participant(s)/Investor(s) can directly. 
The Fund creates/ redeems units of the Scheme in 
large blocks known as Creation Unit. The value of the. 
Creation Unit is the basket of the Underlying Index 
securities called as the Portfolio Deposit and a Cash. 
Component which will be exchanged for a fixed 
number of units of the Scheme. The Portfolio Deposit 
and the Cash Component, which defines the Creation. 
Unit are defined separately. The Portfolio Deposit and. 
Cash Component may change from time to time and 
will be announced by AMC/Fund through its website 
and other data providers. 
Note: Units of the Scheme if less than Creation Unit 
cannot be purchased/ redeemed directly with the Fund 
except for certain circumstances as listed in this 
document. In case of redemptions by NRIs, requisite. 
TDS will be deducted from the respective redemption 
The requisite securities constituting the Portfolio. 
Deposit have to be transferred to the DP account of 
the respective Scheme on the day of receipt of the 
application, while the Cash Component, as applicable 
on that business day. has to be paid to the Fund. On 
confirmation of the receipt of Portfolio Deposit/ 
equivalent amount of cash by the Custodian/ AMC, the. 
AMC will credit the equivalent number of units of the. 
Scheme into the investors DP account. 
In case of cash subscription of units of the Schemes in. 
Creation Unit Size, the purchase request for creation 
of units shall be made by such investor to the. 
Fund/AMC where upon the Fund/AMC will arrange to. 
Procedure for Redeeming in Redemption of Units : 
Creation Unit Size 
buy the underlying portfolio of securities on behalf of 
the investor. In case of shares bought by the AMC on 
behalf of the investor, entire proceeds of portfolio 
deposit and other cost and charges related to the 
purchase of basket of underlying securities for 
servicing the subscription transaction would be borne 
by the investor. 
The Portfolio Deposit and Cash Component for units of 
the Scheme may change from time to time due to 
changes in the Underlying Index on account of 
corporate actions and changes to the index. 
The creation request can be made to the AMC/ Fund in 
a duly filled application form. Application Forms for. 
Creation of units can be obtained from any of the. 
Official Points of Acceptance as notified by the AMC. 
For details, refer back cover of the SID. 
The AMC will not extend credit facility to the. 
participants or investors will get the NAV as and when 
they bring the Portfolio Deposit/ equivalent amount of 
cash and Cash Component. 
The requisite number of units of the Scheme 
equivalent to the Creation Unit lot size has to be 
transferred to the DP account of the respective. 
Scheme, while the Cash Component, as applicable on 
that business day to be paid to the Scheme. On 
confirmation of the receipt of unit of the Schemes by 
the Custodian/ AMC, the AMC shall extinguish the 
units and credit the Portfolio Deposit to the investors. 
DP account and pay the Cash Component, as. 
The Fund may allow cash redemption of the units of 
the Scheme in Creation Unit Size. Redemption request 
shall be made by such investor to the Fund before the 
stipulated cut-off time whereupon the Fund shall 
arrange to sell the underlying portfolio of securities on 
behalf of the investor. In case of shares sold by the. 
AMC on behalf of the investor, entire proceeds of 
portfolio deposit and other cost and charges related to 
the sale of basket of underlying securities for servicing 
the redemption transaction would be borne by the 
investor. Payment will then be made to the Investor 
net of all the above mentioned charges. 
The Portfolio Deposit and Cash Component for the 
units of the Scheme may change from time to time 
due to changes in the Underlying Index on account of. 
Transaction Charges 
corporate actions and changes to the index. 
Unit holders to note that the Trustee may declare. 
Dividend from time to time in accordance with the. 
Dividend Policy set out below. 
Dividend Policy: The Trustee may declare Dividend to 
the Unit holders under the Scheme subject to the 
availability of distributable surplus and the actual 
distribution of Dividends and the frequency of 
distribution will be entirely at the discretion of the. 
Trustee. Such Dividend will be payable to the Unit 
holders whose names appear on the register of Unit 
holders on the record date as fixed for the respective. 
Schemes. The Dividend declared will be paid net of 
tax deducted at source, wherever applicable, to the. 
Unit holders within 30 days from the declaration of 
the Dividend. There is no assurance or guarantee to 
the Unit holders as to the rate of Dividend distribution 
nor that will the Dividend be paid regularly. If the Fund 
declares Dividend, the NAV of the respective. 
Schemes will stand reduced by the amount of. 
Dividend and Dividend distribution tax (if applicable) 
paid. All the Dividend payments shall be in 
accordance and compliance with SEBI Regulations, as 
applicable from time to time. 
1. Units of the Scheme will be available only in the. 
Dematerialized form. 
2. The applicant under the Scheme will be required to 
have a beneficiary account with a Depository. 
Participant of NSDL/CDSL and will be required to 
indicate in the application the DPs name, DP ID. 
Number and its beneficiary account number with 
3. The units of the Scheme are to be held, issued/ 
dematerialized form. 
4. Application forms without relevant depository 
details or inactive status of their depository 
account are liable to be rejected. 
Currently, the AMC is not accepting cash investments. 
Notice shall be provided in this regard as and when 
the facility is made available. 
Pursuant to SEBI Circular No. Cir/ IMD/ DF/13/ 2011 
dated August 22, 2011 the transaction charge per 
subscription of Rs.10,000/- and above may be charged 
in the following manner: 
i. The existing investors may be charged Rs. 100/- as 
transaction charge per subscription of Rs.10,000/- and 
above. 
Transfer 
transaction charge per subscription of Rs.10,000/- and. 
There shall be no transaction charge on subscription 
below Rs. 10,000/- and on transactions other than 
purchases/ subscriptions relating to new inflows. 
However, the option to charge transaction charges is 
at the discretion of the distributors. Investors may note 
that distributors can opt to receive transaction charges 
based on type of the Scheme. Accordingly, the 
transaction charges would be deducted from the 
subscription amounts, as applicable. 
Transaction charges shall also be deducted on 
purchases/subscriptions received through non-demat 
mode from the investors investing through a valid. 
ARN holder i.e. AMFI Registered Distributor (provided 
the distributor has opted-in to receive the transaction 
charges) in respect of transactions routed through. 
Stock Exchange(s) platform viz. NSE Mutual Fund. 
Platform (NMF-II) and BSE Mutual Fund Platform 
(BSE STAR MF). . 
The aforesaid transaction charge shall be deducted by 
the Asset Management Company from the 
subscription amount and paid to the distributor, as the 
case may be and the balance amount shall be invested 
subject to deduction of Goods and Services Tax. 
However, upfront commission to distributors will be 
paid by the investor directly to the distributor, based 
on his assessment of various factors including the 
service rendered by such distributor. 
Transaction Charges shall not be deducted if: 
Purchase/Subscription made directly with the fund 
through any mode (i.e. not through any 
distributor/agent). 
Purchase/ subscription made in demat mode 
through stock Exchanges, irrespective of investment 
CAS/ Statement of account shall state the net 
investment (i.e. gross subscription less transaction 
charge) and the number of units allotted against the 
net investment. 
Transfer of units is permissible as per following 
provisions: 
1. Units of the Scheme are transferable. 
2. Transfer would be only in favor of transferees who 
are capable of holding units. The Fund shall not be 
bound to recognize any other transfer. 
This is an indicative list and 
you are requested to consult 
your financial advisor to 
scheme is suitable to your 
risk profile. 
3. The Fund will affect transfer only in electronic form 
provided the intended transferee is otherwise 
eligible to hold the units under the Scheme. 
4. The delivery instructions for transfer of units will 
have to be lodged with the DP in the requisite form 
as may be required from time to time and transfer 
will be effected in accordance with such 
rules/regulations as may be in force governing 
transfer of securities in dematerialized mode. 
The Units can be pledged by the Unitholders as 
security for raising loans subject to the conditions of 
the lending institution and the terms and conditions 
laid down by the Depositories. The Registrar will take 
note of such pledge / charge in its records on. 
As per the directives issued by SEBI, it is mandatory 
for applicants to mention their bank account numbers 
in their applications for purchase or redemption of. 
Units. If the Unit-holder fails to provide the Bank 
mandate, the request for redemption would be 
considered as not valid and the Scheme retains the 
right to withhold the redemption until a proper bank 
mandate is furnished by the Unit-holder and the 
provision with respect of penal interest in such cases 
will not be applicable/ entertained. 
For provisions related to Bank Account Details, 
investors are requested to refer Statement of. 
Additional Information. 
The following persons are eligible and may apply for 
subscription to the Units of the Scheme (subject, 
wherever relevant, to purchase of units of Mutual. 
Funds being permitted under respective constitutions 
and relevant statutory regulations): 
Resident adult individual either singly or jointly(not 
exceeding Four). 
Minor through parent/lawful guardian. 
Companies, Bodies Corporate, Public Sector. 
Undertakings, association of persons or bodies of 
individuals and societies registered under the. 
Societies Registration Act, 1860 (so long as the 
purchase of units is permitted under the respective. 
Religious and Charitable Trusts under the provisions 
of 11(5)(xii) of Income-tax Act, 1961 read with Rule 
17C of Income-Tax Rules, 1962 subject to the 
provisions of the respective constitutions under 
which they are established permits to invest. 
Partnership Firms. 
Karta of Hindu Undivided Family (HUF). 
Banks & Financial Institutions. 
Non-resident Indians/Persons of Indian origin 
residing abroad (NRIs) on full repatriation basis or. 
purchases/ switches in any. 
Schemes of ICICI Prudential. 
Mutual Fund 
on non-repatriation basis. 
Army, Air Force, Navy and other para-military funds. 
Scientific and Industrial Research Organizations. 
Mutual fund schemes, as may be permitted by SEBI 
from time to time. 
Foreign Portfolio Investor (FPI) subject to the 
applicable regulations. 
Any other category of investor who may be notified 
by Trustees from time to time by display on the 
website of the AMC. 
The following persons are not eligible to invest in the. 
Scheme and apply for subscription to the units of the. 
Scheme: 
A person who falls within the definition of the term. 
U.S. Person under Regulation S promulgated 
under the Securities Act of 1933 of the United. 
States, as amended, and corporations or other 
entities organised under the laws of the U.S. are 
not eligible to invest in the schemes and apply for 
subscription to the units of the schemes, except for 
lump sum subscription, systematic transactions 
and switch transactions requests received from. 
Non-resident Indians/Persons of Indian origin who 
at the time of such investment, are present in India 
and submit a physical transaction request along 
with such documents as may be prescribed by. 
ICICI Prudential Asset Management Company. 
Limited (the AMC)/ICICI Prudential Trust Limited 
(the Trustee) from time to time. 
The AMC shall accept such investments subject to 
the applicable laws and such other terms and 
conditions as may be notified by the AMC/the. 
Trustee. The investor shall be responsible for 
complying with all the applicable laws for such. 
The AMC reserves the right to put the transaction 
request/reverse allotted units, as the case may be, 
as and when identified by the AMC, which are not 
in compliance with the terms and conditions 
notified in this regard. 
A person who is resident of Canada. 
Such other individuals/institutions/body corporate 
etc., as may be decided by the AMC from time to. 
A person who falls within the definition of the term. 
U.S. Person as defined in Regulation S 
promulagated under the Securities Act of 1933, as 
amended, and corporations or other entities organised 
under the laws of the U.S. are not eligible to invest in 
the schemes and apply for subscription to the units of 
the schemes, except for lump sum subscription,. 
Third party Cheques 
systematic transactions and switch transactions 
requests received from Non-resident Indians/Persons 
of Indian origin who at the time of such investment, 
are present in India and submit a physical transaction 
request along with such documents as may be 
prescribed by ICICI Prudential Asset Management. 
Company Limited (the AMC)/ICICI Prudential Trust. 
Limited (the Trustee) from time to time. 
The AMC shall accept such investments subject to the 
applicable laws and such other terms and conditions 
as may be notified by the AMC/the Trustee. The 
investor shall be responsible for complying with all the 
applicable laws for such investments. 
The AMC reserves the right to put the transaction 
requests on hold/reject the transaction request/reverse 
allotted units, as the case may be, as and when 
identified by the AMC, which are not in compliance 
with the terms and conditions notified in this regard. 
Investment/subscription made through third party 
cheque(s) will not be accepted for investments in the 
units of ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund. 
Third party cheque(s) for this purpose are defined as: 
i. Investment made through instruments issued from 
an account other than that of the beneficiary 
investor, 
ii) in case the investment is made from a joint bank 
account, the first holder of the mutual fund folio is 
not one of the joint holders of the bank account 
from which payment is made. Third party cheque(s) 
for investment/subscription shall be accepted, only 
in exceptional circumstances, as detailed below: 
1. Payment by Parents/Grand-Parents/related persons 
on behalf of a minor in consideration of natural love 
and affection or as gift. However, this restriction 
will not be applicable for payment made by a 
guardian whose name is registered in the records 
of Mutual Fund in that folio. 
2. Payment by Employer on behalf of employee under. 
Systematic Investment Plans or lump sum/one-time 
subscription through Payroll deductions or 
deductions out of expense reimbursements. 
3. Custodian on behalf of a Foreign Institutional. 
Investor (FII) or a client. 
4. Payment made by the AMC to a Distributor 
empanelled with it on account of commission, 
incentive, etc. in the form of the Mutual Fund units 
of the Schemes managed by such AMC through. 
SIP or lump sum/one time subscription, subject to 
compliance with SEBI Regulations and Guidelines 
issued by AMFI, from time to time. 
redemption / 
repurchase 
proceeds/Refund. 
Updation of Email address Investors are requested to update their own email 
and mobile number. 
Seeding of Aadhaar number Investors are advised to refer to Statement of 
5. Payment made by a Corporate to its. 
Agent/Distributor/Dealer (similar arrangement with. 
Principal-agent relationship) account of commission 
or incentive payable for sale of its goods/services, 
in the form of Mutual Fund units of the Schemes 
managed by such AMC through SIP or lump 
sum/one time subscription, subject to compliance 
with SEBI Regulations and Guidelines issued by. 
AMFI, from time to time. 
6. Payment by registered Stock brokers of recognized 
stock exchanges for their clients having demat. 
The above mentioned exception cases will be 
processed after carrying out necessary checks and 
verification of documents attached along with the 
purchase transaction slip/application form, as stated 
below: 
1. Determining the identity of the Investor and the 
person making payment i.e. mandatory now Your. 
Client (KYC) for Investor and the person making the 
2. Obtaining necessary declaration from the. 
Investor/unitholder and the person making the 
payment. Declaration by the person making the 
payment should give details of the bank account 
from which the payment is made and the 
relationship with the beneficiary. 
3. Verifying the source of funds to ensure that funds 
have come from the drawers account only. 
Please visit www.icicipruamc.com for further details. 
The unit holder/ investor can register multiple bank 
account details under its existing folio by submitting 
separate form available on the website of the AMC at 
www.icicipruamc.com. 
Individuals/HuF can register upto 5 different bank 
accounts for a folio, whereas non-individuals can 
register upto 10 different bank accounts for a folio. 
all investors for making investments in Mutual Funds, 
for more information refer SAI. 
of The Asset Management Company shall be liable to pay 
interest to the unitholders at such rate as may be 
specified by SEBI for the period of such delay 
(presently @ 15% per annum). 
address and mobile number for speed and ease of 
communication in a convenient and cost-effective 
manner, and to help prevent fraudulent transactions. 
Additional Information (SAI) available on website of 
the AMC i.e. www.icicipruamc.com. 
C. PERIODIC DISCLOSURES. . 
Net Asset Value 
scheme on a particular day. 
You can ascertain the value of 
multiplying the NAV with your 
unit balance. 
Portfolio. 
The NAV will be calculated and disclosed at the close 
of every Business Day. The AMC shall prominently 
head on the AMCs website and on the website of. 
AMFI. NAV will be determined on every Business Day 
shall be made available at all Customer Service. 
Centers of the AMC. 
AMC shall update the NAVs on the website of. 
Association of Mutual Funds in India - AMFI 
(www.amfiindia.com) and on the mutual fund website 
: (www.icicipruamc.com) by 9:00 p.m. every Business. 
Day. In case of any delay, the reasons for such delay 
would be explained to AMFI and SEBI by the next day. 
If the NAVs are not available before commencement of 
business hours on the following day due to any 
reason, the Fund shall issue a press release providing 
reasons and explaining when the Fund would be able 
to publish the NAVs. 
In addition to above, the indicative NAV will be 
updated on AMCs website during market hours, on 
regular 1 minute interval basis. 
with ISIN) as on the last day of the month / half-year on. 
AMCs website i.e. www.icicipruamc.com and on the 
website of AMFI within 10 days from the close of each 
month / half-year respectively. Since the Scheme is a 
new Scheme, Top 10 Holdings and Sector wise 
holdings are not available. 
The AMC shall publish an advertisement in all India 
edition of at least two daily newspapers, one each in. 
English and Hindi, every half year disclosing the 
hosting of the half-yearly statement of the schemes 
portfolio on the AMCs website and on the website of. 
The AMC shall send via email both the monthly and 
half-yearly statement of scheme portfolio within 10 
days from the close of each month / half-year 
respectively. The unitholders whose e-mail addresses 
are not registered with the Fund are requested to 
update / provide their email address to the Fund for 
updating the database. 
The AMC shall provide a physical copy of the 
statement of scheme portfolio, without charging any 
cost, on specific request received from a unit holder. 
Half Yearly Financial Results. 
Associate Transactions. 
In terms of Regulations 59 and SEBI circular no. 
CIR/IMD/DF/21/2012 dated September 13, 2012, the. 
AMC shall within one month from the close of each 
half year, that is on 31st March and on 30th. 
September, host a soft copy of its unaudited financial 
results on their website. The half-yearly unaudited 
report shall contain details as specified in Twelfth. 
Schedule and such other details as are necessary for 
the purpose of providing a true and fair view of the 
operations of the Fund. Further, the AMC shall publish 
an advertisement disclosing the hosting of such 
financial results on their website, in atleast one English 
daily newspaper having nationwide circulation and in a 
newspaper having wide circulation published in the 
language of the region where the Head Office of the. 
Fund is situated. 
The scheme wise annual report shall be hosted on the 
website of the AMC and on the website of the AMFI 
soon as may be possible but not later than four 
months from the date of closure of the relevant 
accounts year. The AMC shall publish an 
advertisement every year in all India edition of at least 
two daily newspapers, one each in English and Hindi, 
disclosing the hosting of the scheme wise annual 
report on the website of the AMC. 
The AMC shall display prominently on the AMCs 
website link of the scheme wise annual report and 
physical copy of the same shall be made available to 
the unitholders at the registered / corporate office of 
the AMC at all times. 
The AMC shall email the annual report or an abridged 
summary thereof to the unitholders whose email 
addresses are registered with the Fund. The 
unitholders whose e-mail addresses are not registered 
with the Fund are requested to update / provide their 
email address to the Fund for updating the database. 
Physical copy of scheme wise annual report or 
abridged summary shall be provided to investors who 
have opted to receive the same. 
The AMC shall also provide a physical copy of the 
abridged summary of the Annual Report, without 
charging any cost, on specific request received from. 
As per regulation 56(3A) of the Regulations, copy of. 
Schemewise Annual Report shall be also made 
available to unitholder on payment of nominal fees. 
Please refer to Statement of Additional Information 
(SAI). . 
Equity Scheme(s) will also attract Securities. 
Transaction Tax (STT) at applicable rates. 
Notes: 
1. Income of the Mutual Fund is exempt from 
income tax in accordance with the provisions of. 
Section 10(23D) of the Income-tax Act, 1961 
(the Act). 
2. Under the terms of the Scheme Information. 
Document, this Scheme is classified as equity 
oriented fund. 
As per clause (a) of the explanation to section 
112A, an Equity oriented fund has been 
defined to mean a fund set up under a scheme 
of a mutual fund specified under clause (23D) of 
section 10 and,. 
(i) in a case where the fund invests in the units of 
another fund which is traded on a recognised 
stock exchange,. 
(A) a minimum of ninety per cent of the total 
proceeds of such fund is invested in the units 
of such other fund. and. 
(B) such other fund also invests a minimum of 
ninety per cent of its total proceeds in the 
equity shares of domestic companies listed. 
dividend 
on a recognised stock exchange. and. 
(ii) in any other case, a minimum of sixty-five per 
cent of the total proceeds of such fund is 
invested in the equity shares of domestic 
companies listed on a recognised stock 
Further it is stated that the percentage of equity 
shareholding or unit held in respect of the fund, as the 
case may be, shall be computed with reference to the 
annual average of the monthly averages of the opening 
and closing figures 
3. If the total income of a resident investor (being 
individual or HUF) [without considering such. 
Long-term capital Gains / short term capital 
gains] is less than the basic exemption limit, 
then such Long-term capital gains/short-term 
capital gains should be first adjusted towards 
basic exemption limit and only excess should 
be chargeable to tax. 
4. Non-resident investors may be subject to a 
separate of tax regime / eligible to benefits 
under Tax Treaties, depending upon the facts of 
the case. The same has not been captured 
5. A rebate of up to Rs. 12,500 is available for 
resident individuals whose total income does 
not exceed Rs. 5,00,000. 
* For the purposes of determining the additional 
income-tax payable in accordance with section 115R, 
the amount of distributed income referred therein shall 
be increased to such amount as would, after reduction 
of the additional income-tax on such increased amount 
at the rate specified in section 115R, be equal to the 
amount of income distributed by the mutual fund. The 
rate provided is after grossing up. 
**Aggregate long term capital gains exceeding one 
lakh rupees in a financial year, arising from the transfer 
of units of an equity oriented fund, equity shares and 
units of business trust are chargeable to tax at 10 per 
cent (plus the applicable surcharge, health and 
education cess). 
#excluding applicable surcharge and cess. 
For further details on taxation please refer to the. 
Section on Tax Benefits of investing in the Mutual. 
Fund provided in Statement of Additional Information 
(SAI). . 
and Registrar on complaints and enquiries received 
from investors for resolving them promptly. 
For this purpose, Mr. Yatin Suvarna has been 
appointed the Investor Relations Officer. He can be 
contacted at the Central Service Office of the AMC. The 
address and phone numbers are: 
2nd Floor, Block B-2, Nirlon Knowledge Park, Western. 
Express Highway, Goregaon (East), 
Fax No.: 022-2686 8313 
e-mail - enquiry@ICICIpruamc.com. 
D. COMPUTATION OF NAV:. . 
The NAV of the Units of the Scheme will be computed by dividing the net assets of the. 
Scheme by the number of Units outstanding on the valuation date. The Fund shall value 
its investments according to the valuation norms, as specified in Schedule VIII of the. 
Regulations, or such norms as may be prescribed by SEBI from time to time and as 
stipulated in the Valuation Policy and Procedures of the Fund, provided in SAI. 
The NAV of the Scheme shall be rounded off upto two decimals. 
NAV of units under the Scheme shall be calculated as shown below: 
Market or Fair Value of Schemes investments + Current Assets 
1. Current Liabilities and Provision. 
NAV (Rs.) =______________________________________________________________. 
No. of Units outstanding under Scheme. 
IV. FEES AND EXPENSES. . 
This section outlines the expenses that will be charged to the scheme. 
A. NEW FUND OFFER (NFO) EXPENSES. . 
These expenses are incurred for the purpose of various activities related to the NFO like 
marketing and advertising, registrar expenses, printing and stationary, bank charges etc. 
In accordance with the provisions of SEBI Circular no. SEBI/IMD/CIR No. 1/64057/06 
dated April 04, 2006, no New Fund Offer Expenses will be charged to the Scheme. New. 
Fund Offer Expenses incurred for the Scheme would be borne by the AMC. 
B. ANNUAL SCHEME RECURRING EXPENSES. . 
These are the fees and expenses for operating the scheme. These expenses include. 
Investment Management and Advisory Fee charged by the AMC, Registrar and Transfer. 
Agents fee, marketing and selling costs etc. as given in the table below: 
The AMC has estimated that following percentage of the daily net assets of the scheme 
will be charged to the scheme as expenses. For the actual current expenses being 
charged, the investor should refer to the website of the Fund. The Fund would update 
the current expense ratios on the website at least three working days prior to the 
https://www.icicipruamc.com/Downloads/total-expense-ratio.aspx for Total Expense. 
Ratio (TER) details. 
Estimated Annual Recurring Expenses. 
Bank ETF 
(% p.a. of 
Investment Management and Advisory Fees. 
Trustee fee. 
Audit fees. 
Custodian fees. 
Registrar & Transfer Agents Fees. 
Marketing & Selling expense (including Costs of statutory. 
Advertisements)#. 
Cost related to investor communications. 
Cost of fund transfer from location to location. 
Upto 1.00. 
Cost of providing account statements and dividend redemption 
cheques and warrants. 
Cost towards investor education & awareness (at least 2 bps). 
Brokerage & transaction cost over and above 12 bps and 5 bps for 
cash and derivative market trades respectively. 
Goods and Services tax on expenses other than investment and 
advisory fees. 
Goods and Services tax on brokerage and transaction cost. 
Other Expenses$*. 
(more specifically elaborated below). 
The aforesaid does not include Goods and Services tax on investment management 
and advisory fees. The same is more specifically elaborated below. 
*As permitted under the Regulation 52 of SEBI (MF) Regulations, 1996 and pursuant to. 
SEBI/HO/IMD/DF2/CIR/P/2018/137 dated October 22, 2018 and SEBI (Mutual Funds). 
Second Amendment Regulations, 2012 and Securities and Exchange Board of India 
(Mutual Funds) (Fourth Amendment) Regulations, 2018. 
$ Including exchange listing fee 
#The Scheme shall not incur any distribution expenses/ commision. 
The purpose of the above table is to assist the investor in understanding the various 
costs and expenses that an investor in the Scheme will bear. The above expenses may 
increase/decrease as per actual and/or any change in the Regulations. 
These estimates have been made in good faith as per information available to the. 
Investment Manager based on past experience. Types of expenses charged shall be as 
per the SEBI (MF) Regulations. 
The Scheme can charge expenses within overall maximum limits prescribed under SEBI. 
(MF) Regulations, without any internal cap allocated to any of the expense heads 
specified in the above table. 
As per the Regulations, the maximum recurring expenses that can be charged to the. 
Scheme shall not exceed one percent (1.00%) of daily net assets. 
Pursuant to SEBI circulars no. CIR/IMD/DF/21/2012 dated September 13, 2012, 
SEBI/HO/IMD/DF2/CIR/P/2018/137 dated October 22, 2018 and SEBI (Mutual Funds). 
Second Amendment Regulations, 2012, following additional costs or expenses may be 
charged to the scheme, namely: 
(i) The AMC may charge Goods and Services tax on investment and advisory fees to 
the scheme of the Fund in addition to the maximum limit of total expenses ratio as 
prescribed in Regulation 52 of the Regulations, whereas Goods and Services tax on 
other than investment and advisory fees, if any, shall be borne by the scheme within 
the maximum limit as per regulation 52 of the Regulations. 
(ii) expenses not exceeding of 0.30 per cent of daily net assets, if the new inflows from 
retail investors from B30 cities or as may be specified by the Securities and. 
Exchange Board of India, from time to time are at least : 
30 per cent of the gross new inflows from retail investors from B30 cities into 
the scheme, or. 
15 per cent of the average assets under management (year to date) of the 
scheme,. 
Provided that if inflows from retail investors from B30 cities are less than the higher 
of the above, such expenses on daily net assets of the scheme shall be charged on 
proportionate basis. 
Provided further that expenses charged under this clause shall be utilised for 
distribution expenses incurred for bringing inflows from retail investors from B30 
Provided further that amount incurred as expense on account of inflows from retail 
investors from B30 cities shall be credited back to the scheme in case the said 
inflows are redeemed within a period of one year from the date of investment. 
For above purposes, B30 cities shall be beyond Top 30 cities as at the end of the 
previous financial year as communicated by AMFI. Retail investors would mean 
individual investors from whom inflows into the Scheme amount upto Rs. 2,00,000/- per. 
Further, the brokerage and transaction cost incurred for the purpose of execution of 
trade may be capitalized to the extent of 12bps and 5bps for cash market transactions 
and derivatives transactions respectively. Any payment towards brokerage and 
transaction cost, over and above the said 12 bps and 5bps for cash market transactions 
and derivatives transactions respectively may be charged to the scheme within the 
maximum limit of Total Expense Ratio as prescribed under regulation 52 of the SEBI 
(Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996. Goods and Services tax on brokerage and transaction 
cost paid for execution of trade, if any, shall be within the limit prescribed under 
regulation 52 of the Regulations. 
Expenses over and above the prescribed limit shall be charged / borne in accordance 
with the Regulations prevailing from time to time. 
Illustration impact of expense ratio on schemes return (to be revised once the 
percentage of total expenses is finalized). 
C. LOAD STRUCTURE. . 
care of other marketing and selling expenses. Load amounts are variable and are subject 
to change from time to time. For the current applicable structure, please refer to the 
website of the AMC (www.icicipruamc.com) or may call your distributor. 
Entry Load: 
Not Applicable. In terms of SEBI circular no. SEBI/IMD/CIR No. 4/168230/09 dated June 
30, 2009 has notified that, w.e.f. August 01, 2009, there will be no entry load charged to 
the schemes of the Fund and the upfront commission to distributors will be paid by the 
investor directly to the distributor, based on his assessment of various factors including 
the service rendered by the distributor. 
Exit Load: 
There will be no exit load for units sold through the secondary market on the BSE/NSE. 
Investors shall note that the brokerage on sales of the units of the scheme on the stock 
exchanges shall be borne by the investors. 
However, during the process of creation/redemption there may be transaction costs 
and/or other incidental expenses (forming part of the Cash Component), which are liable 
to be borne by the investors/Authorized Participants. 
Investors, other than Authorised Participants, can sell units in less than Creation Unit. 
Size of the Scheme directly to the Fund/the AMC, without any exit load in the following 
cases: 
if the traded price of the ETF units is at a discount of more than 3% to the NAV for 
continuous 30 days. 
if discount of bid price to applicable NAV is more than 3% over a period of 7 
consecutive trading days. 
if no quotes are available on exchange(s) for 3 consecutive trading days. 
when the total bid size on the exchange(s) is less than half creation unit size daily, 
averaged over a period of 7 consecutive trading days. 
Under these circumstances, investors, as specified above and can redeem units of the. 
Scheme directly with the the Fund/the AMC without any exit load. The aforesaid criteria 
for the direct redemption with the the Fund/the AMC are also available at the website of 
the AMC. The Fund/the AMC will track the aforesaid liquidity criteria and display it on its 
website viz., www.icicipruamc.com if the same is triggered, no exit load would be 
applicable in such cases. 
Any imposition or enhancement in the load shall be applicable on prospective 
investments only. However, AMC shall not charge any load on issue of units allotted on 
reinvestment of dividend for existing as well as prospective investors. Units issued on 
reinvestment of dividends shall not be subject to entry and exit load. 
The investor is requested to check the prevailing load structure of the scheme before 
investing. For any change in load structure AMC will issue an addendum and display it 
on the website/Investor Service Centres. An advertisement to this effect will be given in 
one English daily newspaper having nationwide circulation as well as in a newspaper 
published in the language of the region where the Head Office of the AMC is situated. 
Subject to the Regulations, the Trustee reserves the right to modify/alter the load 
structure for redemption by Authorised Participants/ Investors directly with the Fund. 
Such changes will be applicable for prospective investments. The Trustee shall arrange 
to display a notice in the Investor Service Centers of the AMC before the change of the 
then prevalent load structure. The SIDs will be updated in respect of changes in the load 
structure as per the addendum issued. The addendum detailing the changes in the load 
structure will be published by AMC in 2 daily newspapers- one in regional language and 
the other in English language newspaper. Changes in the fundamental attributes may be 
stamped in the acknowledgement slip issued by the Fund after the changes in load. 
Not applicable. 
V. RIGHTS OF UNITHOLDERS. . 
Please refer to SAI for details. 
VI. PENALTIES, PENDING LITIGATION OR PROCEEDINGS, FINDINGS OF INSPECTIONS. . 
OR INVESTIGATIONS FOR WHICH ACTION MAY HAVE BEEN TAKEN OR IS IN THE. . 
PROCESS OF BEING TAKEN BY ANY REGULATORY AUTHORITY. . 
1. All disclosures regarding penalties and action(s) taken against foreign Sponsor(s) may 
be limited to the jurisdiction of the country where the principal activities (in terms of 
income / revenue) of the Sponsor(s) are carried out or where the headquarters of the. 
Sponsor(s) is situated. Further, only top 10 monetary penalties during the last three 
years shall be disclosed. 
2. In case of Indian Sponsor(s), details of all monetary penalties imposed and/ or action 
taken during the last three years or pending with any financial regulatory body or 
governmental authority, against Sponsor(s) and/ or the AMC and/ or the Board of. 
Trustees /Trustee Company. for irregularities or for violations in the financial services 
sector, or for defaults with respect to share holders or debenture holders and 
depositors, or for economic offences, or for violation of securities law. Details of 
settlement, if any, arrived at with the aforesaid authorities during the last three years 
shall also be disclosed. 
Cases pertaining to ICICI Bank Ltd. (the Bank): 
2.1 In November 2017, an overseas regulator imposed a composition sum of 
approximately SGD 8 lacs for non-adherence of rules under AML regulations 
at one of ICICI Banks overseas branches, resulting from regulatory inspection 
conducted in 2013 and pursuant to consultants review of records, relating to 
the period of May 2012 to April 2014. There were no dealings with sanctioned 
entities and the remediation primarily required improvement to the branchs. 
AML/CFT controls, which has since been undertaken. The local regulator in 
that jurisdiction has also acknowledged the efforts undertaken by the branch 
in addressing the issues identified in these reports. 
2.2 As mentioned by RBI in its press release dated March 29, 2018, RBI has 
through an order dated March 26, 2018, imposed a monetary penalty of ` 
589.0 million on ICICI Bank for non-compliance with directions/guidelines. 
issued by RBI. This penalty has been imposed in exercise of powers vested in. 
RBI under the provisions of Section 47A(1) (c) read with Section 46(4)(i) of the. 
Banking Regulation Act, 1949. The Bank has paid the penalty to RBI on April 9, 
2.3 The Bank & ex-Compliance Officer had received a Notice from SEBI on July 
31, 2018 under Rule 4(1) of SCR (Procedure for Holding Inquiry and imposing 
penalties by Adjudicating Officer) Rules 2005 requiring responses on matters 
relating to alleged non-compliance with certain provisions of the erstwhile. 
Listing Agreement with respect to delayed disclosure of an agreement 
relating to merger of the erstwhile Bank of Rajasthan with the Bank. The Bank 
is in the process of taking suitable action. 
2.4 The Bank & its ex-Managing Director & CEO had received a Notice from SEBI 
on May 24, 2018 under Rule 4(1) of SCR (Procedure for Holding Inquiry and 
imposing penalties by Adjudicating Officer) Rules 2005 requiring responses 
on matters relating to alleged non-compliance with certain provisions of the 
erstwhile Listing Agreement and the Securities and Exchange Board of India 
(Listing Obligations and Disclosure Requirements) Regulations, 2015. Matter 
in this regard is under adjudication. 
2.5 RBI has vide its order dated February 25, 2019, imposed a monetary penalty 
of ` 10 million on ICICI Bank for non-compliance with guidelines/directions 
issued by RBI on Time-bound implementation & strengthening of SWIFT 
related operational controls. This penalty has been imposed in exercise of 
powers vested in RBI under section 47(A)(1)(c) read with Section 46(4)(i) of 
the Banking Regulation Act, 1949. 
2.6 The Overseas Branch of the Bank in Singapore had inadvertently claimed 
certain tax deductions from AY2013 to AY2015. This was self-identified by the 
branch in June 2016 and voluntary disclosure of the same was made along 
with revised tax computation for relevant Assessment Years. Owing to the 
above, Inland Revenue Authority of Singapore (IRAS) has levied a penalty of. 
SGD 1,500 on the branch. 
3. Details of all enforcement actions taken by SEBI in the last three years and/ or 
pending with SEBI for the violation of SEBI Act, 1992 and Rules and Regulations 
framed there under including debarment and/ or suspension and/ or cancellation and/ 
or imposition of monetary penalty/adjudication/enquiry proceedings, if any, to which 
the Sponsor(s) and/ or the AMC and/ or the Board of Trustees /Trustee Company and/ 
or any of the directors and/ or key personnel (especially the fund managers) of the. 
AMC and Trustee Company were/ are a party. The details of the violation shall also be 
3.1   In connection with certain investments made by few schemes of ICICI Prudential. 
Mutual Fund, the AMC has ensured compliance with the directions issued by SEBI. 
Further, in the same matter, quasi-judicial proceedings have been initiated by SEBI. 
The AMC had filed an application with SEBI for settling the adjudication 
proceedings, without admission or denial of findings. In this matter, the AMC has 
paid the full settlement amount to SEBI. In light of the above, SEBI vide its 
settlement order dated November 29, 2018 has disposed off the pending 
proceedings against the AMC. 
3.2     Basis certain alleged violations observed during the inspection of ICICI Prudential. 
Mutual Fund under SEBI (Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996, for the period from. 
April 01, 2014 to March 31, 2016, quasi-judicial proceedings have been initiated by. 
SEBI, with respect to following matters: 
a. Investment by schemes as per the investment objective. 
b. Rebalancing of scheme portfolio in case of downgrade of securities. and 
c. Determination of quantum of dividend and fixing of record date for 
declaration of dividend. 
In reference to the above, the AMC and ICICI Prudential Trust Limited (the Trustee. 
Company) have received a show cause notice on August 28, 2018. In response to 
the above, the AMC and the Trustee Company have taken suitable action. 
3.3     Further, details as specified in para 2.3 and 2.4 above shall also form part of 
disclosure under this para. 
4. Any pending material civil or criminal litigation incidental to the business of the. 
Mutual Fund to which the Sponsor(s) and/ or the AMC and/ or the Board of Trustees 
/Trustee Company and/ or any of the directors and/ or key personnel are a party 
should also be disclosed separately. 
4.1     As per the SEBI (Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996, mutual fund schemes are 
permitted to invest in securitised debt. Accordingly, few schemes of ICICI. 
Prudential Mutual Fund (the Fund) had made investment in Pass Through. 
Certificates (PTCs) of certain special purpose vehicles / securitisation trusts (the. 
Trusts). The returns filed by few of these securitisation Trusts whose PTCs were 
held by the Fund were taken up for scrutiny by the Income Tax Authorities for. 
Assessment Years 2007-08, 2008-09, 2009-10 and 2010-11. Arising out of this, the. 
Income Tax Authorities had raised a demand on such Trusts. On failure to recover 
the same from the Trusts, Income Tax Authorities sent demand notices to the Fund 
along with other Mutual Funds as beneficiaries / contributors to such Trusts. The. 
Fund in consultation with its tax & legal advisors has contested the applicability of 
such demand and got the attachment order vacated by Honble High Court of. 
Bombay. The Trusts on their part had contested the matter and the Income Tax. 
Appellate Tribunal upheld their appeal and dismissed the contentions and all the 
cross-appeals filed by the Tax Authorities. The Tax Authorities have now filed an 
appeal with Honble High Court on the matter. 
5. Any deficiency in the systems and operations of the Sponsor(s) and/ or the AMC and/ 
or the Board of Trustees/Trustee Company which SEBI has specifically advised to be 
disclosed in the SID, or which has been notified by any other regulatory agency, shall 
be disclosed. : 
1. Power to make Rules. 
Subject to the Regulations, the Trustee may, from time to time, prescribe such terms and 
make such rules for the purpose of giving effect to the Scheme with power to the AMC 
to add to, alter or amend all or any of the terms and rules that may be framed from time 
to time. 
If any difficulties arise in giving effect to the provisions of the Scheme, the Trustee may, 
subject to the Regulations, do anything not inconsistent with such provisions, which 
appears to it to be necessary, desirable or expedient, for the purpose of removing such 
3. Scheme to be binding on the Unitholders: 
Subject to the Regulations, the Trustee may, from time to time, add or otherwise vary or 
alter all or any of the features of investment plans and terms of the Scheme after 
obtaining the prior permission of SEBI and Unitholders (where necessary), and the same 
shall be binding on all the Unitholders of the Scheme and any person or persons 
claiming through or under them as if each Unitholder or such person expressly had 
agreed that such features and terms shall be so binding. 
Notwithstanding anything contained in this Scheme Information Document, the 
provisions of the SEBI (Mutual Funds) Regulations, 1996 and the guidelines there under 
shall be applicable. 
Note: The Scheme under this Scheme Information Document (SID) was approved by the. 
Directors of ICICI Prudential Trust Limited vide resolution dated April 03, 2019. The. 
Trustees have ensured that ICICI Prudential Bank ETF approved by them is a new 
product offered by ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund and is not a minor modification of the 
exiting Scheme/fund/product. 
For and on behalf of the Board of Directors of. 
Nimesh Shah. 
Managing Director. 
Sd/-. 
ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund Official Points of Acceptance 
1.Ahmedabad: 307, 3rd Floor, Zodiac Plaza, Beside Nabard Vihar, Near St. Xaviers. 
College Corner, H.L. Collage Road, Off C. G. Road, Ahmedabad 380009, Gujarat -. 
Amritsar: Eminent Mall, 2nd amar Floor, Kennedy Avenue, 10 The Mall, Amritsar - 
143001, Punjab - Anand: 109-110, Maruti Sharnam Complex, Opp. Nandbhumi Party. 
Plot, Anand Vallabh Vidyanagar Road, Anand - 388001, Gujarat - Aurangabad: Ground. 
Floor, Shop no. 137/B, Samarth Nagar, Aurangabad - 431001, Maharashtra - Allahabad : 
Shop No. FF-1, FF-2, Vashishtha Vinayak Tower, 38/1, Tashkant Marg, Civil Lines, 
Allahabad 211 001 - Bangalore (M G Road): Phoenix Pinnacle, First Floor, Unit 101 -104, 
No 46, Ulsoor Road, Bangalore 560042, Karnataka - Bangalore: Yoshitha Hitech. 
International, No. 120B, EPIP Industrial area, Opp Mariott Hotel, Whitefield, Bangalore : 
560066- New Delhi: Unit No. 6, First Floor, Shankar Vihar, Vikas Marg,Opposite Metro. 
Pillar No. 75, Delhi-110092 - Bangalore: No. 311/7, Ground Floor 9th Main, 5th Block, 
Road, Alkapuri, Vadodara 390007, Gujarat -Bharuch: First Floor, Unit No. 107/108, Nexus. 
Business Hub, Cit Survey No. 2513, Ward No. 1, Beside Rajeshwar Petrol Pump, Opp. 
Gangotri Plaza, Opp. Daxinamurti School, Waghawadi Road, Bhavnagar, Gujarat 364002 
2. Bhopal: Kay Kay Business Center, Ram Gopal Maheshwari Marg, Zone 1, Maharana. 
Pratap Nagar, Bhopal-462023, Madhya Pradesh - Bhubhaneshwar: Plot No. 381, Khata 
84, MZ Kharvel Nagar, (Near Ram Mandir), Dist :Khurda, Bhbaneshwar, 751001 Orissa -. 
Pune: Ground Floor, Office no. 6, Chetna CHS Ltd, General Thimayya Marg, Camp Pune, 
411 011 - Chandigarh: SCO 137-138, F.F, Sec-9C, Chandigarh 160017, Chandigarh -105, 
Amar Chamber, Opp. Lal School, Near HDFC Bank, Station Road, Gujarat, Valsad, 
Senraleigh Road, Upcar Garden, Ground Floor, Near AXIS Bank, Asansol, West Bengal 
713 304- Chennai- Lloyds Road: Abithil Square,189, Lloyds Road,Royapettah, Chennai 
600014, Tamil Nadu - Chennai- N R Dave Complex, 1st Floor, No: 201/C34, 2nd Avenue. 
Anna Nagar west, Chennai - 600 040 - Chennai-Door No 24, Ground Floor, GST Road, 
Tambaram Sanitorium, Chennai 600 047 - Chennai No. 66, Door No. 11A, III Floor, B R. 
Complex, Ramakrishna Iyer Street, Opp. National Cinema Theatre, West Tambaram, 
No. 292, Old Mahabalipuram Road, Sholinganallur, Chennai - 600 119,- Cochin: #956/3 
& 956/4 2nd Floor, Teepeyam Towers, Kurushupally Road, Off MG Road, Ravipuram , 
Kochi 682015, Kerala - Cochin: Ground and First Floor, Parambil Plaza, Kaloor. 
No. 1334, Thirumoorthy Layout, Thadagam Road, R.S. Puram, Behind Venkateswara. 
Lokenath Mansion, Sahid Khudiram Sarani, CityCentre, Durgapur 713216, West Bengal -. 
Gujarat: Ground Floor, Unit No. 2 & 3, Bhayani Mansion, Gurudwara Road, Jamnagar - 
361001, Gujarat - Gujarat Office No. 23-24 , Pooja-B, Near ICICI Bank, Station Road,Bhuj-. 
Kutch 370001, Gujarat- Patiala: SCO-64, Near Income Tax Office, New Leela Bhawan, 
Patiala 147001, Punjab - Gujarat: Ground Floor, Unit no. A6, Goyal Palladium, 
Vipul Agora Bulding, Unit no 109, 1st Floor, Opp. JMD Regedt Sq, Gurgaon - 122001 -. 
Basement, HUDA Shopping Centre,(Below Axis Bank). Faridabad 121002, Haryana 
3.,Hyderabad-Begumpet: Gowra Plaza, 1st Floor, No: 1-8-304-307/381/444,S.P. Road,. 
Begumpet, Secunderabad, Hyderabad 500003, Andhra Pradesh - Shimla: Attic, Bell. 
Villa, Above IndusInd Bank, The Mall Shimla,, Shimla 171001, Himachal Pradesh -. 
Hyderabad: Door No. 1-98/2/11/3, Shrishti Tower, 1st floor, Shop no. 3, Arunodaya. 
Colony, Hi Tech City Road, Madhapur, Ranga Reddy District, Hyderabad - 500081 -. 
Indore: Unit no. G3 on Ground Floor and unit no. 104 on First Floor, Panama Tower, 
Manorama Ganj Extension, Near Crown Palace Hotel,Indore 452001, Madhya Pradesh -. 
Business Park, Subhash Marg,C Scheme , Jaipur 302001, Rajasthan - Jalandhar: Unit. 
No. 22, Ground Floor, City Square Building, EH197, Civil Lines, Jalandhar - 144001, 
Floor, Plot No 3, Sindhi Colony, Shastri Nagar Jodhpur Rajasthan -Kalyan: Ground Floor, 
Unit no. 317, Kan Chamber, 14/113, Civil Lines, Kanpur 208001- Kalyani: B- 9/14 (C.A), 
1st Floor, Central Park, Dist- Nadia, Kalyani 741224, West Bengal -Moradabad Plot No. 
Pradesh- Kanpur: Unit No. G-5, Sai Square 16-116, (45), Bhargava Estate Civil Lines, 
B.C High School, Cross Road 3, Ambala Cantt. Haryana - 133001 - Kolhapur: 1089, E. 
Ward, Anand Plaza, Rajaram Road, Kolhapur 416001, Maharashtra- Bengaluru 1st Floor, 
AARYAA Centre, No. 1, MIG, KHB Colony, 1A Cross, 5th Block, Koramangala, Bengaluru 
: 560095 Karnataka- Kolkata :1st Floor, 1/393 Garihat Road (South) Opp. Jadavpur. 
Police station Prince Anwar Shah Road Kolkata - 700068 - Kolkata - Dalhousie: Room. 
No. 409, 4th Floor, Oswal Chambers, 2, Church Lane Kolkata - 700001, West Bengal -. 
B, Kolkata 700020, West Bengal - Lucknow: 1st Floor Modern Business Center,19 Vidhan. 
Sabha Marg, Lucknow 226001, Uttar Pradesh - Lucknow: Unit no. 8 & 9, Saran. 
Ludhiana: SCO 121, Ground Floor, Feroze Gandhi Market, Ludhiana 141001, Punjab -. 
Margao: UG-20, Vasant Arcade, Behind Police Station, Comba, Margao, Goa - 403601 -. 
Ground Floor, Suchitra Enclave Maharashtra Lane, Borivali (West), Mumbai 400092, 
Maharashtra - Mumbai - Fort: ICICI Prudential Asset Management Co Ltd, 2nd Floor, 
Brady House,12/14 Veer Nariman Road Fort, Mumbai 400001, Maharashtra - Mumbai -. 
Ghatkopar: Ground Floor, Unit No 4 & 5, Platinum Mall, Opposite Ghatkopar Railway. 
Station, Jawahar Road, Ghatkopar East, Mumbai 400077 - Mumbai - Ghatkopar: Office. 
No. 307, 3rd Floor, Platinum Mall, Jawahar Road, Ghatkopar East, Mumbai - 400077-. 
Mumbai - Goregaon: 2nd Floor, Block B-2, Nirlon Knowledge Park, Western Express. 
Highway, Goregaon, Mumbai 400013, Maharashtra - Mumbai: ICICI Prudential Mutual. 
Mumbai-Thane: ICICI Prudential Mutual Fund, Dev Corpora, 1st Floor, Office no. 102, 
Cadbury Junction, Eastern Express Highway, Thane (West) - 400 601, Maharashtra - Sri. 
Kamakshi Sadan No. 44/1, 1st Floor, 4th cross, Malleswaram, Bangalore 560 003 -. 
Mumbai-Vashi: ICICI Prudential AMC Ltd, Devavrata Co-op Premises, Plot No 83, Office. 
No 26, Gr Floor, Sector 17, Vashi, Navi Mumbai 400703, Maharashtra - Palghar: Shop. 
No. A1, Ground Floor, Dhaiwat Viva Swarganga, Next to ICICI Bank, Aghashi Road, Virar 
(West), Palghar - 401303, Maharashtra - Nagpur: 1st Floor, Mona Enclave, WHC Road, 
Near Coffee House Square, Above Titan Eye Showroom, Dharampeth, Nagpur 440010, -. 
New Delhi: 12th Floor Narain Manzil,23 Barakhamba Road, New Delhi 110501, New Delhi 
4. Navsari: 1st Floor, Unit No. 106, Prabhakunj Heights,Sayaji Station Road,Opposite ICICI. 
Bank,, Gujarat, Navsari 396445 - Noida: K-20, First Floor, Sector 18, Noida, Uttar. 
Pradesh, Pincode 201301 - New Delhi: Ground Floor, Block F, Unit No. 17-24, S-1 level, 
Delhi: Plot No. C-1, 2, 3 Shop No. 112, Above ICICI Bank, First Floor, P.P Towers, Netaji. 
Block, Janak Puri, New Delhi 110558 - Panaji: 1st Floor, Unit no. F3, Lawande Sarmalkar. 
Ward No. 8, 1st Floor, Above Federal Bank, Opp. Bhatak Chowk, G.T. Road, Panipat -. 
Sambhaji Park, J M Road, Pune 411054, Maharashtra - Pune: Ground Floor, Shop No. 3 
and 4, Saloni Apartments, Lot No. 9, S. No. 129/9, CTS No. 830, Ideal Colony, Kothrud, 
Pune - 411 038, Maharashtra - Raipur: Shop No. 10, 11 & 12, Ground Floor, Raheja. 
Sevoke Road, Siliguri 734001, West Bengal - Ground Floor, 107/1,, A. C. Road, 
Baharampur,, Murshidabad,, West Bengal 742 103 - Surat: HG 30, B Block, International. 
Trade Center, Majura Gate, Surat 395002, Gujarat - Udaipur: Shop No. 2, Ratnam, Plot. 
No. 14, Bhatt Ji Ki Badi,Udaipur 313001, Rajasthan -Uttar Pradesh: Unit No. C-65, 
Ground Floor, Raj Nagar, District Centre, Ghaziabad 201002, Uttar Pradesh - Vadodara: 
First Floor, Unit no. 108, 109 & 110, Midtown Heights, Opp. Bank of Baroda, Jetalpur, 
Yatra Crossing, Varanasi 221010, Uttar Pradesh - Jaipur: Shop No. NFS/3&4, Nehru. 
Place, Tonk Road, Jaipur, Rajasthan 302018- TC 15/1926, Near Ganapathy Temple, 
Bakery Junction, Vazhuthacaud Road, Thycaud, Thiruvananthapuram, Kerala - 695 014 - 
#230/1, New No. Ch13, 1st Floor, 5th Cross,12th Main, Saraswathipuram, Mysore , 
Karnataka- 570 009 - Agra: No. 2 & 9, Block No. 54/4, Ground Floor, Prateek Tower, 
Light House Hill Road, Mangalore - 575001. State: Karnataka. 
TrxnDelhi@icicipruamc.com, TrxnNRI@icicipruamc.com. 
Toll Free Numbers: (MTNL/BSNL) 1800222999. (Others) 18002006666 - Website: 
www.icicipruamc.com. 
Other Cities: Additional official transaction acceptance points 
(CAMS Transaction Points) 
5. Agartala: Advisor Chowmuhani (Ground Floor) Krishnanagar, Agartala 799001, Tripura 
6. Agra: No. 8, II Floor Maruti Tower Sanjay Place, Agra 282002, Uttar Pradesh -. 
Ellis Bridge , Ahmedabad, Ahmedabad 380006, Gujarat - Nadiad: F -134, First Floor, 
Floor, Shree Krishna Complex, Near Kanhayya Sweets, M G Road Vijayapur (Bijapur) - 
586101 - Ajmer: Shop No.S-5, Second Floor Swami Complex, Ajmer 305001, Rajasthan. 
City Enclave, Opp. Kumar Nursing Home Ramghat Road, Aligarh 202001, Uttar Pradesh -. 
Allahabad: 30/2, A&B, Civil Lines Station, Besides Vishal Mega Mart, Strachey Road, 
Allahabad 211051, Uttar Pradesh -Assam: Kanak Tower 1st Floor, Opp. IDBI Bank/ICICI. 
Bank, C.K.Das Road, Tezpur Sonitpur, Assam - 784 001- Alleppey: Doctors Tower. 
Building, Door No. 14/2562, 1st floor, North of Iorn Bridge, Near Hotel Arcadia Regency, 
Alleppey 688011, Kerala - Alwar: 256A, Scheme No:1, Arya Nagar, Alwar 301001, 
Rajasthan - - Sikar: Pawan Travels Street, Opposite City Centre Mall, Sikar 332001, 
134003, Haryana - Jalpaiguri: Babu Para, Beside Meenaar Apartment, Ward No VIII, 
Kotwali Police Station, PO & Dist Jalpaiguri, Pincode: 735101, West Bengal - Amritsar: 
SCO - 18J, C Block, Ranjit Avenue, Amritsar 140001, Punjab - Anand: 101, A.P. Tower, 
B/H, Sardhar Gunj Next to Nathwani Chambers , Anand 388001, Gujarat - Anantapur: 
15-570-33, I Floor Pallavi Towers, Anantapur 515001, Andhra Pradesh - Andhra. 
Mumbai ISC): CTS No 411, Citipoint, Gundivali, Teli Gali, Above C.T. Chatwani Hall, 
Complex,Opp Old Colony, Near Valia Char Rasta, G.I.D.C., Ankleshwar 393002, Gujarat -. 
Ushagram, Asansol 713303, West Bengal - N. N. Road, Power House Choupathi, 
of Hotel Blue Diamon, Ground Floor, T. P. Nagar, Korba 495677 - Ward No. 5, 
Basantapur More, PO Arambag, Hoogly, Aramnbagh 712 601, West Bengal - Usha. 
Complex, Ground Floor, Punjab Bank Building, Hospital Road, Silchar - 788005 -. 
Aurangabad:2nd Floor, Block D-21-D-22, Motiwala Trade Centre, Nirala Bazar, New. 
Samarth Nagar, Opp. HDFC Bank, Aurangabad 431001, Maharashtra - Balasore: B C Sen. 
Road, Balasore 756001, Orissa - Bangalore: Trade Centre, 1st Floor 45, Dikensen Road 
(Next to Manipal Centre), Bangalore 560042, Karnataka - Karnataka :Shop No. 2, 1st. 
Floor, Shreyas Complex, Near Old Bus Stand, Bagalkot - 587 101, Karnataka -. 
Bankura: CAMS Service Center, Cinema Road, Nutunganj, Beside Mondal Bakery, P. 0. &. 
Dist. Bankura 722101 - Bareilly: F-62, 63, Second Floor,, Butler Plaza Civil Lines, Bareilly 
243001, Uttar Pradesh - Belgaum: Classic Complex, Block no. 104, 1st Floor, Saraf. 
Colony Khanapur Road, Tilakwadi, Belgaum - 590 006, Karnataka - Bellary: CAMS. 
Service centre, 18/47/A, Govind Nilaya, Ward No. 20, Sangankal Moka Road, 
Gandhinagar, Ballari - 583102, Karnataka - Berhampur: First Floor, Upstairs of Aaroon. 
Printers Gandhi Nagar Main Road, Berhampur 760001, Orissa - Bhagalpur: Dr R P Road. 
Khalifabag Chowk, Bhagalpur 812002, Bihar - Bharuch: A-111, First Floor, R K Casta, 
Behind Patel Super Market, Station Road, Bharuch - 392001, Gujarat - Bhatinda: 2907. 
GH,GT Road Near Zila Parishad, Bhatinda 151001, Punjab - Bhavnagar: 305-306, Sterling. 
Point Waghawadi Road Opp. HDFC Bank, Bhavnagar 364002, Gujarat - Bhilai: Shop No. 
117,Ground Floor, Khicharia Complex, Opposite IDBI Bank, Nehru Nagar Square, Bhilai 
490020, Chattisgarh - Bhilwara: Indraparstha tower Shop Nos 209-213, Second floor, 
No . 10, 2nd floor, Alankar Complex, Near ICICI Bank, M P Nagar, Zone II, Bhopal 462011, 
Madhya Pradesh - Bhubaneswar: 101/ 7, Janpath, Unit-III, Bhubaneswar 751001, Orissa 
7. Bhuj:Office No. 4-5, 1st Floor RTO, Relocation Commercial, Complex - B, Opp. Fire. 
Station,, Near RTO Circle, Bhuj, Kutch 370001, Gujarat - Bolpur: Room No. FB26, 1st. 
Tower, B/H B.N Chambers, Ankleshwar Mahadev Road, Godhra - 389001, Gujarat -. 
Nalanda: R-C Palace, Amber Station Road, Opp.: Mamta Complex, Bihar Sharif (Nalanda). 
Bihar 803 101. - Bhusawal (Parent: Jalgaon TP): 3, Adelade Apartment Christain Mohala, 
Behind Gulshan-E-Iran Hotel Amardeep Talkies Road Bhusawal, Bhusawal 425201, 
Maharashtra - Bikaner: Behind Rajasthan patrika, in front of Vijaya Bank, 1404 Amar. 
Singh Pura, Bikaner 334 001, Rajasthan - Bilaspur: Shop No. B-104, First Floor, Narayan. 
Plaza, Link Road, Bilaspur, (C.G), 495 001 Contact:9203900626 - Bokaro: Mazzanine. 
Floor, F-4, City Centre Sector 4, Bokaro Steel City 827004, Bokaro 827004, Jharkhand -. 
Burdwan: 1st floor, Above Exide Showroom, 399 G T Road, Burdwan, 713101- Calicut: 
29/97G 2nd Floor Gulf Air Building Mavoor Road Arayidathupalam, Calicut 673016, 
Kerala - Chandigarh: Deepak Towers, SCO 154-155, 1st Floor, Sector17-C, Chandigarh 
160017, Punjab -Mandi 328/12, Ram Nagar, 1st Floor, Above Ram Traders, Mandi : 
175001 Himachal Pradesh-Vijaynagaram Portion 3, First Floor, No. 3-16, Behind NRI. 
Hospital, NCS Road, Srinivasa Nagar, Vijaynagaram 535003 Andhra Pradesh -Haryana : 
Sco-11-12,1st Floor, Pawan Plaza, Model Town, Atlas Road, Subhash Chowk, Sonepat- 
131001- Maharashtra: 1st Floor, Shraddha Niketan,Tilakwadi, Opp. Hotel City Pride, 
Sharanpur Road Nasik - 422 002 - Maharashtra: Dev Corpora, 1st Floor, Office no. 102, 
Cadbury Junction, Eastern Express Highway, Thane (West) - 400 601 1 - Maharashtra: st. 
Floor, Shraddha Niketan, Tilakwadi, Opp. Hotel City Pride, Sharanpur Road Nasik - 422 
002- Chandrapur: Opp. Mustafa Dcor, Near Bangalore Bakery, Kasturba Road, 
No.178/10, Kodambakkam High Road Opp. Hotel Palmgrove Nungambakkam, Chennai 
600034, Tamil Nadu - Chennai: 7th floor, Rayala Tower - III,158, Annasalai,Chennai, 
Chennai 600002, Tamil Nadu - Chennai: Ground floor, Rayala Tower- I,158, Annasalai, 
Chennai, Chennai 600002, Tamil Nadu - Cochin: Door No. 39/2638 DJ, 2nd Floor, 2A, M. 
G. Road, Modayil Building,, Cochin - 682 016. Tel.: (0484) 6060188/6400210 -. 
Coimbatore: Old # 66 New # 86, Lokamanya Street (West) Ground Floor R.S. Puram, 
Coimbatore 641002, Tamil Nadu - Cuttack: Near Indian Overseas Bank Cantonment. 
Road Mata Math, Cuttack 753001, Orissa - Davenegere: 13, Ist Floor, Akkamahadevi. 
Samaj Complex Church Road P.J.Extension, Devengere 577002, Karnataka - Dehradun: 
204/121 Nari Shilp Mandir Marg Old Connaught Place, Dehradun 248001, Uttaranchal -. 
Delhi: CAMS Collection Centre, Flat no.512, Narain Manzil, 23, Barakhamba Road, 
Connaught Place, New Delhi 110501, New Delhi - Delhi 306, 3rd Floor, DDA - 2 Building, 
District Centre, Janakpuri, New Delhi - 110058 - Deoghar: S S M Jalan Road Ground 
floor Opp. Hotel Ashoke Caster Town, Deoghar 814112, Jharkhand - Dewas: Tarani. 
Towers Room No: 111(1st Floor) Bank More, Dhanbad 826001, Jharkhand - Dhule: 
House No. 3140, Opp. Liberty Furniture, Jamnalal Bajaj Road, Near Tower Garden, Dhule 
424001 - Durgapur: City Plaza Building, 3rd floor, City Centre, Durgapur 713216, West. 
Bengal - Erode: 197, Seshaiyer Complex Agraharam Street, Erode 638001, Tamil Nadu -. 
Faridhabad: B-49, Ist Floor Nehru Ground Behind Anupam Sweet House NIT, Faridhabad 
121001, Haryana - Gaya: North Bisar Tank, Upper Ground floor, Near - I.M.A Hall, Gaya, 
Pradesh -First Floor, Canara Bank Building, Dhundhi Katra Mirzapur, Uttar Pradesh 231 
Wings, Desai Market, Gandhi Road, Bardoli, 394 601, Contact No: 8000791814, Email ID: 
camsbrd@camsonline.com -Hyderabad: No. 15-31-2M-1/4, 1st floor, 14-A, MIG, KPHB. 
Colony, Kukatpally, Hyderabad 500072- Lawande Sarmalkar Bhavan, 1st Floor, Office. 
No. 2, Next to Mahalaxmi temple, Panaji Goa, 403 001- Gondal: Parent CSC -. 
Rajkot,A/177, Kailash Complex, Khedut Decor, Gondal 360311, Gujarat - Gandhinagar : 
507, 5th Floor, Shree Ugati Corporate Park, Opposite Pratik Mall, Near HDFC Bank, 
The Mall, AD Tiraha, Bank Road,Gorakhpur 273001, Uttar Pradesh - Gobindgarh: 
Opposite State Bank of Bikaner and Jaipur, Harchand Mill Road, Motia Khan, Mandi. 
Sankar Hotel, Guntur 522002, Andhra Pradesh - Gurgaon: SCO - 17, 3rd Floor, Sector- 
14, Gurgaon 122001, Haryana - Guwahati: Piyali Phukan Road, K.C Path, House No.-1. 
Rehabari, Guwahati 781008, Assam -H. No 1-3-110, Rajendra Nagar, Mahabubnagar, 
Telangana, 509001 -B1, 1st floor, Mira Arcade, Library Road, Amreli, 365601- Gwalior:. 
G-6, Global Apartment Phase-II,Opposite Income Tax Office, Kailash Vihar City Centre, 
Gwalior 474001, Madhya Pradesh - Hotel Heritage Sikkim, Ground Floor, Diesel Power. 
3, Hotel Shaurya, New Model Colony, Haridwar, Uttarkhand, 249408 - Hassan: 2nd Floor, 
Hazaribag: Municipal Market Annanda Chowk, Hazaribagh 825301, Jharkhand - Hisar: 
12, Opp. Bank of Baroda Red Square Market, Hisar 125001, Haryana - Hubli: No.204 - 
Karnataka - Hyderabad: 208, II Floor, Jade Arcade Paradise Circle, Secunderabad 
500003, Andhra Pradesh - Indore: 101, Shalimar Corporate Centre 8-B, South Tukogunj, 
Opp.Greenpark, Indore 452001, Madhya Pradesh - Jabalpur: 975, Chouksey Chambers, 
Near Gitanjali School, 4th Bridge, Napier Town, Jabalpur 482001, Madhya Pradesh -. 
Jaipur: R-7, Yudhisthir Marg, C-Scheme Behind Ashok Nagar Police Station, Jaipur 
302001, Rajasthan - Jalandhar: 367/8, Central Town Opp. Gurudwara Diwan Asthan, 
Jalandhar 144001, Punjab - Jalgaon: Rustomji Infotech Services 70, Navipeth Opp. Old. 
Bus Stand, Jalgaon 425001, Maharashtra - Jalna C.C. (Parent: Aurangabad): Shop No 6, 
Ground Floor, Anand Plaza Complex, Bharat Nagar, Shivaji Putla Road, Jalna 431203, 
Maharashtra - Jammu: JRDS Heights, Lane Opp. S&S Computers,Near RBI Building, 
Sector 14, Nanak Nagar, Jammu 180004, Jammu & Kashmir - Jamnagar: 207, Manek. 
Centre, P N Marg, Jamnagar 361001, Gujarat. Tel.: (0288) 6540116 - Jamshedpur: 
Millennium Tower, R Road Room No:15 First Floor, Bistupur, Jamshedpur 831001, 
Jharkhand - Jhansi: 372/18 D, 1st floor, Above IDBI Bank, Beside V-Mart, Near. 
RASKHAN, Gwalior Road, Jhansi 284001 - Jodhpur: 1/5, Nirmal Tower Ist Chopasani. 
Road, Jodhpur 342003, Rajasthan - Jorhat: Jail Road Dholasatra, Near Jonaki Shangha. 
Choksi Bazar Kaman, Gujarat, Junagadh 362001, Gujarat - Kadapa: Bandi Subbaramaiah. 
Complex, D.No:3/1718, Shop No: 8, Raja Reddy Street, Besides Bharathi Junior College, 
Kadapa 516001, Andhra Pradesh, West Bengal - R. N. Tagore Road, Kotwali P. 
S.,Krishnanagar, Nadia, West Bengal. Pin code - 741101 -Kangra: C/O Dogra Naresh and. 
Kommireddy vari street, Beside Warf Road, Opp Swathi Medicals, Kakinada 533001, 
Andhra Pradesh - Kalyani: A - 1/50, Block - A, Dist Nadia, Kalyani 741224, West Bengal 
1. Kannur: Room No.14/435 Casa Marina Shopping Centre Talap, Kannur 670004, Kerala 
2. Kanpur: I Floor 106 to 108 CITY CENTRE Phase II 63/ 2, The Mall, Kanpur 208001, Uttar. 
Pradesh - Karimnagar: HNo.7-1-257, Upstairs S B H Mangammathota, Karimnagar 
505001, Andhra Pradesh - Karnal (Parent: Panipat TP): 29 Avtar Colony, Behind Vishal. 
Mega Mart, Karnal 132001- Karur: # 904, 1st Floor Jawahar Bazaar, Karur 639001, Tamil. 
Nadu - Kasaragod: KMC XXV/88, 1st and 2nd Floor, Stylo Complex, Above Canara Bank, 
Bank Road, Kasaragod - 671121, Kerala - Kashipura: Dev Bazaar, Bazpur Road, Kashipur 
: 244713, Uttarkhand - Kharagpur: 623/1 Malancha Main Road, PO Nimpura, Ward No - 
19, Kharagpur 721304, West Bengal - Kharagpur: Silver Palace, OT Road, Inda : 
B, 3rd Floor, Ayodhya Towers,Station Road, Kolhapur 416001, Maharashtra -Kolkata: 
RBC Road, Ground Floor, Near Barasat Kalikrishna Girls High School, Barasat - 700124, 
House (4th floor), Kolkata 700013 - Kolkata: Saket Building, 44 Park Street, 2nd Floor, 
Kolkata 700071, West Bengal -Kadakkan Complex, Opp Central School, Malappuram 670 
504- 53, 1st Floor, Shastri Market, Sadar Bazar, Firozabad 283 203- Kollam: 
Kochupilamoodu Junction Near VLC, Beach Road, Kollam 691001, Kerala - Kota: B-33. 
Kalyan Bhawan Triangle Part ,Vallabh Nagar, Kota 324007, Rajasthan - Kottayam: Door. 
No - XIII/658, Thamarapallil Building, M L Road, Near KSRTC Bus Stand Road, Kottayam - 
686001- Kumbakonam: Jailani Complex 47, Mutt Street, Kumbakonam 612001, Tamil. 
Nadu - Kurnool: H.No.43/8, Upstairs Uppini Arcade, N R Peta, Kurnool 518004, Andhra. 
Pradesh - Lucknow: Off # 4,1st Floor,Centre Court Building, 3/C, 5 - Park Road,. 
Hazratganj, Lucknow 226001, Uttar Pradesh - Ludhiana: U/ GF, Prince Market, Green. 
Field Near Traffic Lights, Sarabha Nagar Pulli Pakhowal Road, Ludhiana 141002, Punjab -. 
Madurai: Cams Service Centre, # Ist Floor,278, North Perumal, Maistry Street (Nadar. 
Lane), Madurai 625001, Tamil Nadu - Mangalore: No. G 4 & G 5, Inland Monarch Opp. 
Karnataka Bank Kadri Main Road, Kadri, Mangalore 575003, Karnataka - Mapusa: Office 
no.CF-8, 1st Floor, Business Point, Above Bicholim Urban Co-Op Bank Ltd, Angod, 
Pajifond, Margao, Goa 403601- Meerut: 108 Ist Floor Shivam Plaza Opposite Eves. 
Cinema, Hapur Road, Meerut 250002, Uttar Pradesh - Mehsana: 1st Floor, Subhadra. 
Complex Urban Bank Road, Mehsana 384002, Gujarat - Moradabad: H 21-22, 1st. 
Floor,Ram Ganga Vihar Shopping Complex, Opposite Sales Tax Office,, Uttar Pradesh -. 
L.T. Road, Borivali West, Mumbai 400 092. - Mumbai - Ghatkopar: Office no. 307, 3rd. 
Rajabahdur Compound, Ground Floor Opp Allahabad Bank, Behind ICICI Bank 30, 
Mumbai Samachar Marg, Fort, Mumbai 400023, Maharashtra - Navi Mumbai:CAMS. 
Service Centre BSEL Tech Park, B-505, Plot no 39/5 & 39/5A, Sector 30A, Opp. Vashi. 
Railway Station, Vashi, Navi Mumbai - 400705- Muzaffarnagar 235, Patel Nagar,Near. 
Ramlila Ground,New Mandi,, Muzaffarnagar - 251001 - Muzzafarpur: Brahman toli, 
Durgasthan Gola Road, Muzaffarpur 842001, Bihar - Mysore: No.1, 1st Floor CH.26 7th. 
Main, 5th Cross (Above Trishakthi Medicals) Saraswati Puram, Mysore 570009, 
Karnataka - Nadiad: F 142, First Floor, Gantakaran Complex, Gunj Bazar, Nadiad 387001, 
Gujarat - Nagpur: 145 Lendra Park, Behind Indus Ind Bank New Ramdaspeth, Nagpur 
440010, Maharashtra - Nagercoil IV Floor, Kalluveettil Shyras Center 47, Court Road, 
Nagercoil - 629 001 - Nanded: Shop No.8 and 9 Cellar, Raj Mohd. complex, Main Road. 
Tilakwadi, Opp. Hotel City Pride,Sharanpur Road, Nasik 422005, Maharashtra - Navsari: 
CAMS Service Center,16, 1st Floor, Shivani Park, Opp. Shankheswar Complex, 
Kaliawadi, Navsari, Navasari 396445, Gujarat - Nagaland: House no. 436, Ground Floor, 
MM Apartment, Dr. Hokishe Sema Road, Near Bharat Petroleum, Lumthi Colony, 
Ranganayakulapet Road, Santhapet, Nellore 524001, Andhra Pradesh - New Delhi: 
Aggarwal Cyber Plaza-II, Commercial Unit no. 371, 3rd Floor, Plot No. C-7, Netaji Subhash. 
Barakhamba Road Cannaugt Place, New Delhi 110501, New Delhi -Nizamabad: CAMS. 
Service Centre, 5-6-208, Saraswathi Nagar, Opposite Dr. Bharathi Rani Nursing Home, 
Factory, Noida 201301, Uttar Pradesh - Palakkad: 10 / 688, Sreedevi Residency. 
Mettupalayam Street, Palakkad 678001, Kerala - Panipat: 83, Devi Lal Shopping. 
Complex Opp ABN Amro Bank, G.T. Road, Panipat 132103, Haryana - Patiala: 35 New. 
Lal Bagh, Opposite Polo Ground,Patiala 147001, Punjab - Patna: G-3, Ground Floor, Om. 
Vihar Complex, SP Verma Road, Patna 800001, Bihar - Pathankot: 13-A, 1st Floor, 
Gurjeet Market, Dhangu Road, Pathankot 145001, Punjab -Port Blair CAMS Service. 
Centre 1st Floor, Above Mahesh Graphics, Nandanam Complex, Beside Old CCS. 
Nehru Street (New Complex, Opp. Indian Coffee House), Pondicherry 605001, 
Pondichery - Pune: Vartak Pride, First Floor, Suvery No. 46, City Survey No. 1477, 
Hingne Budruk, D.P Road, Behind Dinanath Mangeshkar Hospital, Karvenagar, Pune - 
411052, Maharashtra -Raipur: HIG,C-23, Sector - 1, Devendra Nagar, Raipur 492004, 
Chattisgarh - Rajahmundry: Cabin 101 D.no 7-27-4 1st Floor Krishna Complex Baruvari. 
Street T Nagar, Rajahmundry 533101, Andhra Pradesh - Rajkot: Office 207 - 210, Everest. 
Building Harihar Chowk, Opp Shastri Maidan, Limda Chowk, Rajkot 360001, Gujarat -. 
Ranchi: 4, HB Road, No: 206, 2nd Floor Shri Lok Complex, Ranchi 834001, Jharkhand -. 
Rohtak: 205, 2ND Floor, Blg. No. 2, Munjal Complex, Delhi Road, Rohtak 124001, 
Haryana - Rourkela: JBS Market complex, 2nd Floor, Udit Nagar, Rourkela - 769012, 
Odisha - Saharanpur: I Floor, Krishna Complex Opp. Hathi Gate Court Road, Saharanpur 
247001, Uttar Pradesh - Salem: No.2, I Floor Vivekananda Street, New Fairlands, Salem 
636016, Tamil Nadu - Sambalpur: C/o Raj Tibrewal & Associates Opp.Town High. 
School, Sansarak, Sambalpur 768001, Orissa - Sangli: Jiveshwar Krupa Bldg, Shop. No. 
2, Ground Floor, Tilak Chowk, Harbhat Road, Sangli 416416, Contact No.: 0233-6600510 
1.Satna: 1st Floor, Shri Ram Market, Beside Hotel Pankaj, Birla Road, Satna 485001, 
Madhya Pradesh -Satara: 117 / A / 3 / 22, Shukrawar Peth Sargam Apartment, Satara 
415002, Maharashtra - Shillong: 3rd Floor, RPG Complex, Keating Road, Shillong 
793001, Meghalaya, Tel: (0364) 2502511 - Shimla: I Floor, Opp. Panchayat Bhawan Main 
gate Bus stand, Shimla 171001, Himachal Pradesh - Shimoga: Nethravathi Near Gutti. 
Nursing Home Kuvempu Road, Shimoga 577201, Karnataka - Sikar: Pawan Travels. 
Haren Mukherjee Road, Beside SBI Hakimpara, Siliguri - 734001, West Bengal - Solapur: 
4, Lokhandwala Tower, 144, Sidheshwar Peth, Near Z.P. Opp. Pangal High School, 
Solapur 413001, Maharashtra - Sriganganagar: 18 L Block, Sri Ganganagar 335001, 
Rajasthan - Srinagar: Near New Era Public School, Rajbagh, Srinagar 190008. Contact 
no. 0194-2311428. - 47/5/1, Raja Rammohan Roy Sarani, PO Mallickpara, Dist Hoogly, 
Sreerampur 712203 - Surat: Office No 2 Ahura -Mazda Complex First Floor, Sadak Street. 
Timalyawad, Nanpura, Surat 395001, Gujarat - Shop No. G-5, International Commerce. 
Center, Near Kadiwala School, Majura Gate, Ring Road, Surat , Gujarat- 395 002-Thane : 
3rd floor, Nalanda Chambers, B Wing, Gokhale Road, Near Hanuman Temple, Naupada, 
Thane (West) 400 062 - Thiruppur: 1(1), Binny Compound, II Street, Kumaran Road, 
Thiruppur 641601, Tamil Nadu - Thiruvalla: Central Tower,Above Indian Bank Cross. 
Junction, Tiruvalla 689101, Kerala - Tirunelveli: III Floor, Nellai Plaza 64-D, Madurai. 
Road, Tirunelveli 627001, Tamil Nadu - Tirunelvli: No. F4, Magnem Suraksha. 
Apartments, Thiruvananthapuram Road, Tirunelveli - 627 002, Kerala -Tirupathi: Shop. 
No: 6, Door No: 19-10-8 (Opp to Passport Office), AIR Bypass Road Tirupati - 517501, 
Andhra Pradesh, Tel: (0877) 6561003 - Trichur: Room No. 26 & 27,DEE PEE. 
PLAZA,Kokkalai, Trichur 680001, Kerala - Trichy: No 8, I Floor, 8th Cross West Extn. 
Thillainagar, Trichy 620018, Tamil Nadu - Trivandrum: R S Complex Opposite of LIC. 
Building Pattom PO, Trivandrum 695004, Kerala - Udaipur: 32, Ahinsapuri, Fatehpura 
Aries Complex, BPC Road, Off R.C. Dutt Road, Alkapuri, Vadodara 390007, Gujarat -. 
Valsad: Ground Floor Yash Kamal -B Near Dreamland Theater Tithal Road, Valsad 
396001, Gujarat - VAPI: 208, 2nd Floor, Heena Arcade, Opp. Tirupati Tower, Near. 
G.I.D.C., Char Rasata, Vapi 396195, Gujarat - Varanasi: Office no 1, Second floor, 
Bhawani Market, Building No. D-58/2-A1, Rathyatra, Beside Kuber Complex Varanasi - 
221010, Uttar Pradesh - Vellore: No.1, Officers Line, 2nd Floor, MNR Arcade, Opp. ICICI. 
Bank, Krishna Nagar, Vellore 632001, Tamil Nadu - Vijayawada: 40-1-68, Rao & Ratnam. 
Complex Near Chennupati Petrol Pump M.G Road, Labbipet, Vijayawada 520010, Andhra. 
Pradesh - Himachal Pradesh: 328/12, Ram Nagar, 1st Floor, Above Ram Traders, Mandi 
: 175001 - Visakhapatnam: Door No. 48-3-2, Flat No. 2, 1st Floor, Sidhi Plaza, Near. 
Mall, Near Old Bus Depot Road, F-7, 1st Floor, Ramnagar, Hanamkonda, Warangal 
506001, Andhra Pradesh - Yamuna Nagar: 124-B/R Model Town Yamunanagar, Yamuna. 
Mathigiri, Above Time Kids School, Opposite to Kuttys Frozen Foods, Hosur - 635 
TP Lite Centres 
1.Ahmednagar: B, 1+3, Krishna Encloave Complex, Near Hotel Natraj, Nagar-. 
Aurangabad Road, Ahmednagar 414001, Maharashtra - Basti: Office # 3, 1st Floor, 
Jamia Shopping Complex, Opp Pandey School, Station Road, Basti 272002, Uttar. 
Pradesh - Chhindwara: Office No - 1, Parasia Road, Near Mehta Colony, Chhindwara 
480001, Madhya Pradesh - Chittorgarh: CAMS Service centre, 3 Ashok Nagar,Near. 
Heera Vatika, Chittorgarh, Chittorgarh 312001, Rajasthan - Darbhanga: Shahi. 
Complex,1st Floor Near RB Memorial hospital,V.I.P. Road, Benta Laheriasarai, Darbhanga. 
Dharmapuri, Dharmapuri 636701, Tamil Nadu - Shop No 26 and 27, Door No. 39/265A 
and 39/265B, Second Floor, Skanda Shopping Mall, Old Chad Talkies, Vaddageri, 39th. 
Tower Garden, Dhule 424001, Maharashtra - Faizabad: Amar Deep Building, 3/20/14, 
IInd floor, Niyawan, Faizabad-224001- Gandhidham: Office No. 4,, Ground Floor, 
Pal Complex, Ist Floor Opp. City Bus Stop, SuperMarket, Gulbarga 585101, Karnataka -. 
Haldia: 2nd Floor, New Market Complex, Durgachak Post Office, Purba Medinipur. 
District, Haldia 721602, West Bengal - Haldwani: Durga City Centre, Nainital Road. 
Haldwani, Haldwani 263139, Uttaranchal - Himmatnagar: D-78 First Floor, New Durga. 
Bazar, Near Railway Crossing, Himmatnagar 383001, Gujarat - Hoshiarpur: Near Archies. 
Gallery Shimla Pahari Chowk, Hoshiarpur 146001, Punjab - Hosur: No.303, SIPCOT Staff. 
Housing Colony, Hosur 635126, Tamil Nadu - Jaunpur: 248, Fort Road, Near Amber. 
Hotel, Jaunpur 222001, Uttar Pradesh - Katni: 1st Floor, Gurunanak Dharmakanta, 
Jabalpur Road, Bargawan, Katni 483501, Madhya Pradesh - Khammam: Shop No: 11 - 2 
2. 31/3, 1st floor, Philips Complex, Balajinagar, Wyra Road, Near Baburao Petrol Bunk, 
Khammam 507001, Andhra Pradesh - Malda: Daxhinapan Abasan, Opp Lane of Hotel. 
Kalinga, SM Pally, Malda 732101, West Bengal - Manipal: CAMS Service Centre, 
Basement floor, Academy Tower, Opposite Corporation Bank, Manipal 576104, 
Karnataka - Mathura: 159/160 Vikas Bazar, Mathura 281001, Uttar Pradesh - Moga: 
Gandhi Road, Opp Union Bank of India, Moga 142001, Punjab - Namakkal: 156A / 1, First. 
Floor, Lakshmi Vilas Building Opp. To District Registrar Office, Trichy Road, Namakkal 
637001, Tamil Nadu - Palanpur: Gopal Trade Centre, Shop No. 13-14, 3rd Floor, Near BK. 
Mercantile Bank, Opp. Old Gunj, Palanpur 385001, Gujarat - Rae Bareli: No.17 Anand. 
Nagar Complex, Rae Bareli 229001, Uttar Pradesh - Rajapalayam: D. No. 59 A/1, Railway. 
Feeder Road Near Railway Station, Rajapalayam 626117, Tamil Nadu - Ratlam: Dafria &. 
Co 81, Bajaj Khanna, Ratlam 457001, Madhya Pradesh - Ratnagiri: Kohinoor Complex. 
Near Natya Theatre Nachane Road, Ratnagiri 415639, Maharashtra - Roorkee: Cams. 
Service Center, 22 Civil Lines Ground, Floor, Hotel Krish Residency, (Haridwar), Roorkee 
247667, Uttaranchal - Sagar: Opp. Somani Automobiles Bhagwanganj, Sagar 470002, 
Madhya Pradesh - Shahjahanpur: Bijlipura, Near Old Distt Hospital, Jail Road, 
Shahjahanpur 242001, Uttar Pradesh - - Sirsa: Bansal Cinema Market, Beside. 
Overbridge, Next to Nissan car showroom, Hissar Road, Sirsa 125055, Haryana -. 
Sitapur: Arya Nagar Near Arya Kanya School, Sitapur 262001, Uttar Pradesh - Solan: 1st. 
Floor, Above Sharma General Store Near Sanki Rest house The Mall, Solan 173212, 
Himachal Pradesh - Srikakulam: Door No 4-4-96, First Floor. Vijaya Ganapathi Temple. 
Back Side, Nanubala Street, Srikakulam 532001, Andhra Pradesh - Sultanpur: 967, Civil. 
Lines Near Pant Stadium, Sultanpur 228001, Uttar Pradesh - Surendranagar: 2 M I Park, 
Near Commerce College Wadhwan City, Surendranagar 363035, Gujarat - Tinsukia: 
Dhawal Complex, Ground Floor, Durgabari Rangagora Road, Near Dena Bank, PO. 
Tinsukia, Tinsukia 786125, Assam - Tuticorin: 4B / A-16 Mangal Mall Complex,Ground. 
Floor, Mani Nagar, Tuticorin 628003, Tamil Nadu - Ujjain: 123, 1st Floor, Siddhi. 
Vinanyaka Trade Centre,Saheed Park, Ujjain 456010, Madhya Pradesh - Vasco: No DU 8, 
Upper Ground Floor, Behind Techoclean Clinic, Suvidha Complex,Near ICICI Bank, Vasco. 
da gama 403802, Goa - Yavatmal: Pushpam, Tilakwadi, Opp. Dr. Shrotri Hospital, 
Yavatmal 445001, Maharashtra. 
In addition to the existing Official Point of Acceptance of transactions, Computer Age. 
Management Services Pvt. Ltd. (CAMS), the Registrar and Transfer Agent of ICICI. 
Prudential Mutual Fund, having its office at New No 10. Old No. 178, Opp. to Hotel Palm. 
Grove, MGR Salai (K.H.Road), Chennai - 600 034 shall be an official point of acceptance 
for electronic transactions received from the Channel Partners with whom ICICI. 
Prudential Asset Management Company Limited has entered or may enter into specific 
arrangements for all financial transactions relating to the units of mutual fund schemes. 
Additionally, the secure Internet sites operated by CAMS will also be official point of 
acceptance only for the limited purpose of all channel partners transactions based on 
agreements entered into between IPMF and such authorized entities. Additionally, the. 
Internet site(s) operated by the AMC and online applications of the AMC (including. 
Iprutouch) will also be official point of acceptance. The AMC also accepts applications 
received on designated FAX numbers. 
In addition to the existing Official Point of Acceptance of transactions, authorized Points 
of Service (POS) of MF Utilities India Private Limited (MFUI) shall be an official point of 
acceptance for all financial and non- financial transactions. The updated list of POS of. 
MFUI is available on www.mfuindia.com. The online transaction portal of MFU is 
www.mfuonline.com. Further, Investors can also subscribe units of the Scheme during 
the NFO Period by availing the platforms/facilities made available by the Stock. 
 "}
